<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20071114172105.txt.gz
TIME:20071114172105
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 1  Registrant's Business and Operations
Underwriting Agreement
On November 8, 2007, American Public Education, Inc. (the "Company") entered into an Underwriting Agreement (the "Underwriting Agreement") relating to the sale by the Company of 5,390,625 shares (the "Shares") of the Company's common stock, par value $0.01 per share ("Common Stock"), in the Company's initial public offering of its Common Stock (the "IPO") pursuant to the Company's Registration Statement on Form S-1 (File No. 333-145185) (the "Registration Statement"). Pursuant to the terms of the Underwriting Agreement, the closing of the sale of the shares occurred on November 14, 2007 at a purchase price per share paid to the Company of $18.60 (the offering price to the public of $20.00 per share minus the Underwriters' discount). A copy of the Underwriting Agreement, entered into by and among the Company, William Blair & Company, L.L.C., Piper Jaffray & Co., Stifel, Nicolaus & Company, ThinkEquity Partners LLC, BMO Capital Markets Corp. and Signal Hill Capital Group LLC (collectively, the "Underwriters"), is attached as Exhibit 1.1 to this Form 8-K. The Shares include 703,125 shares of Common Stock sold by the Company pursuant to the full exercise by the Underwriters of an option to purchase additional shares of Common Stock at the initial public offering price to cover overallotments. The Underwriting Agreement includes certain customary representations, warranties and covenants by the Company, and it provides that the Company will indemnify the Underwriters against certain liabilities, including liabilities under the Securities Act of 1933, or contribute to payments the Underwriters may be required to make because of any of those liabilities.
SECTION 3  Securities and Trading Markets
On November 14, 2007, the Company issued 9,412,073 shares of its Common Stock upon the conversion of all outstanding shares of its Class A Common Stock ("Class A Stock"). The Class A Stock converted to shares of Common Stock prior to the closing of the IPO at the election of the holders of a majority of the shares of Class A Stock. The Company relied on the exemption from registration under the Securities Act of 1933 afforded by Section 3(a)(9) thereof for the issuance of shares of Common Stock upon the conversion of the Class A Stock because no commission or other remuneration was paid for soliciting the conversion of the Class A Stock.
SECTION 5  Corporate Governance and Management
On November 14, 2007, in connection with the closing of the IPO, the Company filed its Fifth Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation (the "Restated Charter") with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware. The Restated Charter amended and restated the Company's existing certificate of incorporation in its entirety and became effective in connection with the closing of the IPO. Upon the effectiveness of the Restated Charter, the Second Amended and Restated Bylaws of the Company (the "Restated Bylaws") became effective, which amended and restated the Company's existing bylaws in their entirety.
A summary of the Restated Charter and the Restated Bylaws is described under the caption "Description of Capital Stock" in the Prospectus filed by the Company pursuant to Rule 424(b)(4) on November 9, 2007 (the "Prospectus") in connection with the Company's Registration Statement, which summary is incorporated in this Form 8-K by reference. The descriptions of the Restated Charter and the Restated Bylaws incorporated in this report do not purport to be complete and are qualified in their entirety by reference to the full text of the Restated Charter filed as Exhibit 3.01 to this Form 8-K and the Restated Bylaws filed as Exhibit 3.02 to this Form 8-K.
 
SECTION 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

 
Exhibit 3.01
          American Public Education, Inc. (the ""), a corporation organized and existing under the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (the "), does hereby certify as follows:
Corporation
Delaware General Corporation Law"
Article 1. NAME
     The name of this corporation is American Public Education, Inc.
 
Article 2. REGISTERED OFFICE AND AGENT
     The address of this Corporation's registered office in the State of Delaware is 1209 Orange Street, in the City of Wilmington, County of New Castle 19801. The name of this Corporation's registered agent at such address is The Corporation Trust Company.
Article 3. PURPOSE AND POWERS
     The purpose of the Corporation is to engage in any lawful act or activity for which corporations may be organized under the Delaware General Corporation Law. The Corporation shall have all power necessary or convenient to the conduct, promotion or attainment of such acts and activities.
Article 4. CAPITAL STOCK
     4.1. Authorized Shares
     The total number of shares of all classes of stock that the Corporation shall have the authority to issue is One Hundred Ten Million (110,000,000), of which One Hundred Million (100,000,000) of such shares shall be Common Stock having a par value of $.01 per share (""), and Ten Million (10,000,000)of such shares shall be Preferred Stock, having a par value of $.01 per share ("").
Common Stock
Preferred Stock
     4.2 Common Stock
          4.2.1. Relative Rights
     The Common Stock shall be subject to all of the rights, privileges, preferences and priorities of the Preferred Stock set forth in this Fifth Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation and in a certificate of designations filed to establish the respective series of Preferred Stock. Each share of Common Stock shall have the same relative rights as and be identical in all respects to all the other shares of Common Stock.
          4.2.2. Dividends
     Whenever there shall have been paid, or declared and set aside for payment, to the holders of shares of any class of stock having preference over the Common Stock as to the payment of dividends, the full amount of dividends and of sinking fund or retirement payments, if any, to which such holders are respectively entitled in preference to the Common Stock, then dividends may be paid on the Common Stock and on any class or series of stock entitled to participate therewith as to dividends, out of any assets legally available for the payment of dividends thereon, but only when and as declared by the Board of Directors of the Corporation. Any dividends on the Common Stock will not be cumulative.
 
          4.2.3. Dissolution, Liquidation, Winding Up
     In the event of any dissolution, liquidation, or winding up of the Corporation, whether voluntary or involuntary, the holders of the Common Stock, and holders of any class or series of stock entitled to participate therewith, in whole or in part, as to the distribution of assets in such event, shall become entitled to participate in the distribution of any assets of the Corporation remaining after the Corporation shall have paid, or provided for payment of, all debts and liabilities of the Corporation and after the Corporation shall have paid, or set aside for payment, to the holders of any class of stock having preference over the Common Stock in the event of dissolution, liquidation or winding up the full preferential amounts (if any) to which they are entitled.
          4.2.4. Voting Rights
     Each holder of shares of Common Stock shall be entitled to attend all special and annual meetings. Except as may otherwise be required by law, and subject to the provisions of such resolution or resolutions as may be adopted by the Board pursuant to Section 4.3 of this Article 4 granting the holders of one or more series of Preferred Stock exclusive or special voting powers with respect to any matter, each holder of Common Stock shall have one vote with respect to each share of Common Stock held on all matters voted upon by the stockholders, provided, however, that except as otherwise required by law, holders of Common Stock, as such, shall not be entitled to vote on any amendment to this Fifth Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation (including a certificate of designations relating to any series of Preferred Stock) that relates solely to the terms of one or more outstanding series of Preferred Stock if the holders of such affected series are entitled, either voting separately or together with the holders of one or more other such series, to vote thereon pursuant to this Fifth Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation (including a certificate of designations relating to any series of Preferred Stock) or pursuant to the Delaware General Corporation Law.
          4.2.5 Stockholder Action
     Subject to the rights of any holders of Preferred Stock to act by written consent instead of a meeting, stockholder action may be taken only at an annual meeting or special meeting of stockholders and may not be taken by written consent instead of a meeting, unless the action to be taken by written consent of stockholders and the taking of this action by written consent has been expressly approved in advance by the Board of Directors.
     4.3. Preferred Stock
     The Board of Directors is authorized, subject to limitations prescribed by the Delaware General Corporation Law and the provisions of this Fifth Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation, to provide, by resolution or resolutions from time to time and by filing certificates of designations pursuant to the Delaware General Corporation Law, for the issuance of shares of Preferred Stock in one or more series, to establish from time to time the number of shares to be
 
included in each such series, to fix the voting powers, designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other special rights of the shares of each such series and to fix the qualifications, limitations or restrictions thereof.
     The authority of the Board of Directors with respect to each series shall include, but not be limited to, determination of the following: (1) the number of shares constituting that series and the distinctive designation of that series; (2) the dividend rate on the shares of that series, whether dividends shall be cumulative, and, if so, from which date or dates, and the relative rights of priority, if any, of payment of dividends on shares of that series; (3) whether that series shall have voting rights, in addition to the voting rights provided by law, and, if so, the terms of such voting rights; (4) whether that series shall have conversion privileges, and, if so, the terms and conditions of such conversion, including provision for adjustment of the conversion rate in such events as the Board of Directors shall determine; (5) whether or not the shares of that series shall be redeemable, and, if so, the terms and conditions of such redemption, including the dates upon or after which they shall be redeemable, and the amount per share payable in case of redemption, which amount may vary under different conditions and at different redemption dates; (6) whether that series shall have a sinking fund for the redemption or purchase of shares of that series, and, if so, the terms and amount of such sinking fund; (7) the rights of the shares of that series in the event of voluntary or involuntary liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Corporation, and the relative rights of priority, if any, of payment of shares of that series; and (8) any other relative powers, preferences, and rights of that series, and qualifications, limitations or restrictions on that series.
Article 5. BOARD OF DIRECTORS
     5.1. Number; Election
     The number of directors of the Corporation shall be such number as from time to time shall be fixed by, or in the manner provided in, the bylaws of the Corporation. Unless and except to the extent that the bylaws of the Corporation shall otherwise require, the election of directors of the Corporation need not be by written ballot. Each director of the Corporation shall be entitled to one vote per director on all matters voted or acted upon by the Board of Directors.
     5.2. Management of Business and Affairs of the Corporation
     The business and affairs of the Corporation shall be managed by or under the direction of the Board of Directors.
     5.3 Limitation of Liability
     No director of the Corporation shall be liable to the Corporation or its stockholders for monetary damages for breach of fiduciary duty as a director, provided that this provision shall not eliminate or limit the liability of a director (a) for any breach of the director's duty of loyalty
 
to the Corporation or its stockholders; (b) for acts or omissions not in good faith or which involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law; (c) under Section 174 of the Delaware General Corporation Law; or (d) for any transaction from which the director derived an improper personal benefit. Any repeal or modification of this shall be prospective only and shall not adversely affect any right or protection of, or any limitation of the liability of, a director of the Corporation existing at, or arising out of facts or incidents occurring prior to, the effective date of such repeal or modification.
Article 5.3
Article 6. AMENDMENT OF BYLAWS
     In furtherance and not in limitation of the powers conferred by the Delaware General Corporation Law, the Board of Directors of the Corporation is expressly authorized and empowered to adopt, amend and repeal the bylaws of the Corporation.
Article 7. RESERVATION OF RIGHT TO AMEND CERTIFICATE OF INCORPORATION
     The Corporation reserves the right at any time, and from time to time, to amend, alter, change, or repeal any provision contained in this Fifth Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation, and other provisions authorized by the laws of the State of Delaware at the time in force may be added or inserted, in the manner now or hereafter prescribed by law; and all rights, preferences, and privileges of any nature conferred upon stockholders, directors, or any other persons by and pursuant to this Fifth Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation in its present form or as hereafter amended are granted subject to the rights reserved in this
Article 7.
 
     , this Fifth Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation has been executed by the President and Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation on this 14 day of November, 2007.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF
th

 
Exhibit 3.02
 
 
 
1. OFFICES
     
1.1. Registered Office
          The name and address of the current registered agent in the State of Delaware are: Corporation Service Company, 2711 Centerville Road, Wilmington, Delaware 19808.
     
1.2. Other Offices
          The Corporation may also have offices at such other places, both within and without the State of Delaware, as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine or as may be necessary or useful in connection with the business of the Corporation.
2. MEETINGS OF STOCKHOLDERS
     
2.1. Place of Meetings
          All meetings of the stockholders shall be held at such place as may be fixed from time to time by the Board of Directors, the Chairperson, the Chief Executive Officer or the President. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Board of Directors may determine that the meeting shall not be held at any place, but may instead be held by means of remote communication.
     
2.2. Annual Meetings
          The Corporation shall hold annual meetings of stockholders on such date and at such time as shall be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors, the Chairperson, the Chief Executive Officer or the President, at which stockholders shall elect a Board of Directors and transact such other business as may properly be brought before the meeting.
          Any stockholder wishing to bring business before an annual meeting of stockholders must deliver to the Secretary a written notice of the stockholder's intention to do so. To be timely, the stockholder's notice must be delivered to or mailed and received by the Corporation not more than 120 days, and not less than 90 days, before the anniversary date of the preceding annual meeting, except that if the annual meeting is set for a date that is not within 30 days before or 60 days after such anniversary date, the Corporation must receive the notice not
 
later than the close of business on the tenth day following the day on which the Corporation provides notice or public disclosure of the date of the meeting. The notice must include the following information: (i) the name and address of the stockholder who is making a proposal and the nature of the business being proposed; (ii) a representation that the stockholder is a holder of record of Corporation capital stock entitled to vote at such meeting and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the meeting to introduce the business specified in the notice; (iii) such other information regarding each matter of business to be proposed by such stockholder as would be required to be included in a proxy statement filed under the Securities and Exchange Commission's (the "") proxy rules if the matter had been proposed, or intended to be proposed, by the board of directors; and (vi) such other information that the Board of Directors may request in its discretion.
SEC
     
2.3. Special Meetings
          A special meeting of the stockholders of the Corporation may be called at any time by the Board of Directors pursuant to a resolution adopted by the Board of Directors, but such special meeting may not be called by any other person or persons.
     
2.4. Notice of Meetings
          Notice of any meeting of stockholders, stating the place, if any, date and hour of the meeting, the means of remote communication, if any, by which stockholders and proxyholders may be deemed to be present in person and vote at such meeting, and (if it is a special meeting) the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given to each stockholder entitled to vote at such meeting not less than ten nor more than sixty days before the date of the meeting (except to the extent that such notice is waived or is not required as provided in the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (the "") or these Bylaws). Such notice shall be given in accordance with, and shall be deemed effective as set forth in, Sections 222 and 232 (or any successor section or sections) of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
Delaware General Corporation Law
     
2.5. Waivers of Notice
          Whenever the giving of any notice is required by statute, the Certificate of Incorporation or these Bylaws, a written waiver thereof signed by the person or persons entitled to said notice, or a waiver thereof by electronic transmission by the person entitled to said notice, delivered to the Corporation, whether before or after the event as to which such notice is required, shall be deemed equivalent to notice. Attendance of a stockholder at a meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice (1) of such meeting, except when the stockholder at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting, and (2) (if it is a special meeting) of consideration of a particular matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice, unless the stockholder objects to considering the matter at the beginning of the meeting.
 
     
2.6. Business at Special Meetings
          Business transacted at any special meeting of stockholders shall be limited to the purposes stated in the notice (except to the extent that such notice is waived or is not required as provided in the Delaware General Corporation Law or these Bylaws).
     
2.7. List of Stockholders
          After the record date for a meeting of stockholders has been fixed, at least ten days before such meeting, the officer who has charge of the stock ledger of the Corporation shall make a list of all stockholders entitled to vote at the meeting, arranged in alphabetical order and showing the address of each stockholder (but not the electronic mail address or other electronic contact information, unless the Board of Directors so directs) and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. Such list shall be open to the examination of any stockholder for any purpose germane to the meeting for a period of at least ten days prior to the meeting: (1) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of the meeting, or (2) during ordinary business hours, at the principal place of business of the Corporation. If the meeting is to be held at a place, then such list shall also, for the duration of the meeting, be produced and kept open to the examination of any stockholder who is present at the time and place of the meeting. If the meeting is to be held solely by means of remote communication, then such list shall also be open to the examination of any stockholder during the whole time of the meeting on a reasonably accessible electronic network, and the information required to access such list shall be provided with the notice of the meeting.
     
2.8. Quorum at Meetings
          Stockholders may take action on a matter at a meeting only if a quorum exists with respect to that matter. Except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation, the holders of a majority of the shares entitled to vote at the meeting, and who are present in person or represented by proxy, shall constitute a quorum at all meetings of the stockholders for the transaction of business. Where a separate vote by a class or series or classes or series is required, a majority of the outstanding shares of such class or series or classes or series, present in person or represented by proxy, shall constitute a quorum entitled to take action with respect to that vote on that matter. Once a share is represented for any purpose at a meeting (other than solely to object (1) to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting, or (2) (if it is a special meeting) to consideration of a particular matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice), it is deemed present for quorum purposes for the remainder of the meeting and for any adjournment of that meeting unless a new record date is or must be set for the adjourned meeting. The holders of a majority of the voting shares represented at a meeting, whether or not a quorum is present, may adjourn such meeting from time to time.
 
     
2.9. Voting and Proxies
          Unless otherwise provided in the Delaware General Corporation Law or in the Corporation's Certificate of Incorporation, and subject to the other provisions of these Bylaws, each stockholder shall be entitled to one vote on each matter, in person or by proxy, for each share of the Corporation's capital stock that has voting power and that is held by such stockholder. No proxy shall be voted or acted upon after three years from its date, unless the proxy provides for a longer period. A duly executed appointment of proxy shall be irrevocable if the appointment form states that it is irrevocable and if, and only as long as, it is coupled with an interest sufficient in law to support an irrevocable power. If authorized by the Board of Directors, and subject to such guidelines as the Board of Directors may adopt, stockholders and proxyholders not physically present at a meeting of stockholders may, by means of remote communication, participate in a meeting of stockholders and be deemed present in person and vote at such meeting whether such meeting is held at a designated place or solely by means of remote communication, provided that (1) the Corporation implements reasonable measures to verify that each person deemed present and permitted to vote at the meeting by means of remote communication is a stockholder or proxyholder, (2) the Corporation implements reasonable measures to provide such stockholders and proxyholders a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the stockholders, including an opportunity to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting substantially concurrently with such proceedings, and (3) if any stockholder or proxyholder votes or takes other action at the meeting by means of remote communication, a record of such vote or other action is maintained by the Corporation.
     
2.10. Required Vote
          When a quorum is present at any meeting of stockholders, all matters shall be determined, adopted and approved by the affirmative vote (which need not be by ballot) of the holders of a majority of the shares present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting and entitled to vote with respect to the matter, unless the proposed action is one upon which, by express provision of statutes or of the Certificate of Incorporation, a different vote is specified and required, in which case such express provision shall govern and control with respect to that vote on that matter. If the Certificate of Incorporation provides for more or less than one vote for any share, on any matter, every reference in these Bylaws to a majority or other proportion of stock, voting stock or shares shall refer to a majority or other proportion of the votes of such stock, voting stock or shares. Where a separate vote by a class or classes is required, the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the shares of such class or classes present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting shall be the act of such class. Notwithstanding the foregoing, directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes of the shares present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting and entitled to vote on the election of directors.
 
3. DIRECTORS
     
3.1. Powers
          The business and affairs of the Corporation shall be managed by or under the direction of the Board of Directors, which may exercise all such powers of the Corporation and do all such lawful acts and things, subject to any limitation set forth in the Certificate of Incorporation or as otherwise may be provided in the Delaware General Corporation Law.
     
3.2. Number and Election
          The number of directors which shall constitute the whole Board of Directors shall be determined by resolution of the Board of Directors.
     
3.3. Nomination of Directors
          The Board of Directors shall nominate candidates to stand for election as directors; and other candidates also may be nominated by any Corporation stockholder. Any stockholder wishing to nominate persons for election as directors at an annual meeting must deliver to the Secretary a written notice of such stockholder's intention to do so. To be timely, the stockholder's notice must be delivered to or mailed and received by the Corporation not more than 120 days, and not less than 90 days, before the anniversary date of the preceding annual meeting, except that if the annual meeting is set for a date that is not within 30 days before or 60 days after such anniversary date, the Corporation must receive the notice not later than the close of business on the tenth day following the day on which the Corporation provides notice or public disclosure of the date of the meeting. The notice must include the following information: (i) the name and address of the stockholder who intends to make the nomination and the name and address of the person or persons to be nominated; (ii) a representation that the stockholder is a holder of record of Corporation capital stock entitled to vote at such meeting and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the meeting to nominate the person or persons; (iii) if applicable, a description of all arrangements or understandings between the stockholder and each nominee and any other person or persons, naming such person or persons, pursuant to which the nomination is to be made by the stockholder; (iv) such other information regarding each nominee to be proposed by such stockholder as would be required to be included in a proxy statement filed under the SEC's proxy rules if the nominee had been nominated, or intended to be nominated, by the Board of Directors; (v) if applicable, the consent of each nominee to serve as a director if elected; and (vi) such other information that the Board of Directors may request in its discretion. The Board of Directors may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as it may reasonably require to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as one of its directors.
 
     
3.4. Vacancies
          Vacancies and newly created directorships resulting from any increase in the authorized number of directors elected by all of the stockholders having the right to vote as a single class may be filled by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors then in office, although fewer than a quorum, or by a sole remaining director. Whenever the holders of any class or classes of stock or series thereof are entitled to elect one or more directors by the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, vacancies and newly created directorships of such class or classes or series may be filled by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors elected by such class or classes or series thereof then in office, or by a sole remaining director so elected. Each director so chosen shall hold office until the next election of directors of the class to which such director was appointed, and until such director's successor is elected and qualified, or until the director's earlier death, resignation or removal. In the event that one or more directors resign from the Board of Directors, effective at a future date, a majority of the directors then in office, including those who have so resigned, shall have power to fill such vacancy or vacancies, the vote thereon to take effect when such resignation or resignations shall become effective, and each director so chosen shall hold office until the next election of directors, and until such director's successor is elected and qualified, or until the director's earlier death, resignation or removal.
     
3.5. Meetings
          
3.5.1. Regular Meetings
          Regular meetings of the Board of Directors may be held without notice at such time and at such place as shall from time to time be determined by the Board of Directors.
          
3.5.2. Special Meetings
          Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by the Chairperson, the Chief Executive Officer or the President on one day's notice to each director, either personally or by telephone, express delivery service (so that the scheduled delivery date of the notice is at least one day in advance of the meeting), telegram, facsimile transmission, electronic mail (effective when directed to an electronic mail address of the director), or other electronic transmission, as defined in Section 232(c) (or any successor section) of the Delaware General Corporation Law (effective when directed to the director), and on five days' notice by mail (effective upon deposit of such notice in the mail). The notice need not describe the purpose of a special meeting.
          
3.5.3. Telephone Meetings
          Members of the Board of Directors may participate in a meeting of the Board of Directors by any communication by means of which all participating directors can simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.
 
          
3.5.4. Action Without Meeting
          Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors may be taken without a meeting if the action is taken by all members of the Board of Directors. The action must be evidenced by one or more consents in writing or by electronic transmission describing the action taken, signed by each director, and delivered to the Corporation for inclusion in the minute book.
          
3.5.5. Waiver of Notice of Meeting
          A director may waive any notice required by statute, the Certificate of Incorporation or these Bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. Except as set forth below, the waiver must be in writing, signed by the director entitled to the notice, or made by electronic transmission by the director entitled to the notice, and delivered to the Corporation for inclusion in the minute book. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a director's attendance at or participation in a meeting waives any required notice to the director of the meeting unless the director at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting.
     
3.6. Quorum and Vote at Meetings
          At all meetings of the Board of Directors, a quorum of the Board of Directors consists of a majority of the total number of directors prescribed pursuant to of these Bylaws. The vote of a majority of the directors present at any meeting at which there is a quorum shall be the act of the Board of Directors, except as may be otherwise specifically provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or by these Bylaws.
Section 3.2
     
3.7. Committees of Directors
          The Board of Directors may designate one or more committees, each committee to consist of one or more directors. The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. If a member of a committee shall be absent from any meeting, or disqualified from voting thereat, the remaining member or members present and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may, by unanimous vote, appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of such absent or disqualified member. Any such committee, to the extent provided in the resolution of the Board of Directors, shall have and may exercise all the powers and authority of the Board of Directors in the management of the business and affairs of the Corporation, and may authorize the seal of the Corporation to be affixed to all papers which may require it; but no such committee shall have the power or authority in reference to approving or adopting, or recommending to the stockholders, any action or matter (other than the election or removal of directors) expressly required by the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval or adopting, amending or repealing any bylaw of the Corporation; and
 
unless the resolution designating the committee, these bylaws or the Certificate of Incorporation expressly so provide, no such committee shall have the power or authority to declare a dividend, to authorize the issuance of stock, or to adopt a certificate of ownership and merger pursuant to Section 253 of the Delaware General Corporation Law. Such committee or committees shall have such name or names as may be determined from time to time by resolution adopted by the Board of Directors. Each committee shall keep regular minutes of its meetings and report the same to the Board of Directors, when required. Unless otherwise specified in the Board of Directors' resolution appointing the Committee, all provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law and these Bylaws relating to meetings, action without meetings, notice (and waiver thereof), and quorum and voting requirements of the Board of Directors apply, as well, to such committees and their members. Unless otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation, these Bylaws, or the resolution of the Board of Directors designating the committee, a committee may create one or more subcommittees, each subcommittee to consist of one or more members of the committee, and delegate to a subcommittee any or all of the powers and authority of the committee.
     
3.8. Compensation of Directors
          The Board of Directors shall have the authority to fix the compensation of directors. No such payment shall preclude any director from serving the Corporation in any other capacity and receiving compensation therefor. 
4. OFFICERS
     
4.1. Positions
          The officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairperson, a Chief Executive Officer, a President, a Secretary and a Treasurer, and such other officers as the Board of Directors (or an officer authorized by the Board of Directors) from time to time may appoint, including one or more Vice Chairmen, Executive Vice Presidents, Vice Presidents, Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers. Each such officer shall exercise such powers and perform such duties as shall be set forth below and such other powers and duties as from time to time may be specified by the Board of Directors or by any officer(s) authorized by the Board of Directors to prescribe the duties of such other officers. Any number of offices may be held by the same person, except that in no event shall the President and the Secretary be the same person. As set forth below, each of the Chairperson, Chief Executive Officer, President, and/or any Vice President may execute bonds, mortgages and other contracts under the seal of the Corporation, if required, except where required or permitted by law to be otherwise executed and except where the execution thereof shall be expressly delegated by the Board of Directors to some other officer or agent of the Corporation.
 
     
4.2. Chairperson
          The Chairperson shall (when present) preside at all meetings of the Board of Directors and stockholders, and shall ensure that all orders and resolutions of the Board of Directors and stockholders are carried into effect. The Chairperson may execute bonds, mortgages and other contracts, under the seal of the Corporation, if required, except where required or permitted by law to be otherwise signed and executed and except where the signing and execution thereof shall be expressly delegated by the Board of Directors to some other officer or agent of the Corporation.
     4.3.
Chief Executive Officer
          The Chairperson, President or other officer of the Corporation may be designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Chief Executive Officer shall have general supervision, direction and control of the business of the Corporation. The Chief Executive Officer may execute bonds, mortgages and other contracts, under the seal of the Corporation, if required, except where required or permitted by law to be otherwise signed and executed and except where the signing and execution thereof shall be expressly delegated by the Board of Directors to some other officer or agent of the Corporation.
     4.4.
President
          The President shall be the chief operating officer of the Corporation and shall have full responsibility and authority for management of the day-to-day operations of the Corporation, subject to the authority of the Board of Directors and the Chief Executive Officer, if different. The President may execute bonds, mortgages and other contracts, under the seal of the Corporation, if required, except where required or permitted by law to be otherwise signed and executed and except where the signing and execution thereof shall be expressly delegated by the Board of Directors to some other officer or agent of the Corporation.
     
4.5. Vice President
          In the absence of the President or in the event of the President's inability or refusal to act, the Vice President (or in the event there be more than one Vice President, the Vice Presidents in the order designated, or in the absence of any designation, then in the order of their election) shall perform the duties of the President, and when so acting shall have all the powers of, and be subject to all the restrictions upon, the President.
     
4.6. Secretary
          The Secretary shall have responsibility for preparation of minutes of meetings of the Board of Directors and of the stockholders and for authenticating records of the Corporation. The Secretary shall give, or cause to be given, notice of all meetings of the stockholders and
 
special meetings of the Board of Directors. The Secretary or an Assistant Secretary may also attest all instruments signed by any other officer of the Corporation.
     
4.7. Assistant Secretary
          The Assistant Secretary, or if there be more than one, the Assistant Secretaries in the order determined by the Board of Directors (or if there shall have been no such determination, then in the order of their election), shall, in the absence of the Secretary or in the event of the Secretary's inability or refusal to act, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the Secretary.
     
4.8. Treasurer
          The Treasurer shall be the chief financial officer of the Corporation and shall have responsibility for the custody of the corporate funds and securities and shall see to it that full and accurate accounts of receipts and disbursements are kept in books belonging to the Corporation. The Treasurer shall render to the Chief Executive Officer, the President, and the Board of Directors, upon request, an account of all financial transactions and of the financial condition of the Corporation.
     
4.9. Assistant Treasurer
          The Assistant Treasurer, or if there shall be more than one, the Assistant Treasurers in the order determined by the Board of Directors (or if there shall have been no such determination, then in the order of their election), shall, in the absence of the Treasurer or in the event of the Treasurer's inability or refusal to act, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the Treasurer.
     
4.10. Term of Office
          The officers of the Corporation shall hold office until their successors are chosen and qualify or until their earlier resignation or removal. Any officer may resign at any time upon written notice to the Corporation. Any officer elected or appointed by the Board of Directors may be removed at any time, with or without cause, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Board of Directors.
     
4.11. Compensation
          The compensation of officers of the Corporation shall be fixed by the Board of Directors or by any officer(s) authorized by the Board of Directors to prescribe the compensation of such other officers.
 
     
4.12. Fidelity Bonds
          The Corporation may secure the fidelity of any or all of its officers or agents by bond or otherwise.
5. CAPITAL STOCK
     
5.1. Certificates of Stock; Uncertificated Shares
          The shares of the Corporation shall be represented by certificates, provided that the Board of Directors may provide by resolution that some or all of any or all classes or series of the Corporation's stock shall be uncertificated shares. Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by a certificate until such certificate is surrendered to the Corporation. Every holder of stock represented by certificates shall be entitled to have a certificate (representing the number of shares registered in certificate form) signed in the name of the Corporation by the Chairperson, Chief Executive Officer, President or any Vice President, and by the Treasurer, Secretary or any Assistant Treasurer or Assistant Secretary of the Corporation. Any or all the signatures on the certificate may be a facsimile. In case any officer, transfer agent or registrar whose signature or facsimile signature appears on a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if such person were such officer, transfer agent or registrar at the date of issue.
     
5.2. Lost Certificates
          The Board of Directors, Chairperson, Chief Executive Officer, President or Secretary may direct a new certificate of stock to be issued in place of any certificate theretofore issued by the Corporation and alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed, upon the making of an affidavit of that fact by the person claiming that the certificate of stock has been lost, stolen or destroyed. When authorizing such issuance of a new certificate, the Board of Directors or any such officer may, as a condition precedent to the issuance thereof, require the owner of such lost, stolen or destroyed certificate or certificates, or such owner's legal representative, to advertise the same in such manner as the Board of Directors or such officer shall require and/or to give the Corporation a bond or indemnity, in such sum or on such terms and conditions as the Board of Directors or such officer may direct, as indemnity against any claim that may be made against the Corporation on account of the certificate alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed or on account of the issuance of such new certificate or uncertificated shares.
 
     
5.3. Record Date
          
5.3.1. Actions by Stockholders
          In order that the Corporation may determine the stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall not be more than sixty days nor less than ten days before the date of such meeting. If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting, unless the Board of Directors fixes a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
          
5.3.2. Payments
          In order that the Corporation may determine the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record date shall be not more than sixty days prior to such action. If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
     
5.4. Stockholders of Record
          The Corporation shall be entitled to recognize the exclusive right of a person registered on its books as the owner of shares to receive dividends, to receive notifications, to vote as such owner, and to exercise all the rights and powers of an owner. The Corporation shall not be bound to recognize any equitable or other claim to or interest in such share or shares on the part of any other person, whether or not it shall have express or other notice thereof, except as otherwise may be provided by the Delaware General Corporation Law.
6. INDEMNIFICATION; INSURANCE
     
6.1. Authorization of Indemnification
          Each person who was or is a party or is threatened to be made a party to or is involved in any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative and whether by or in the right of the Corporation or
 
otherwise (a "proceeding"), by reason of the fact that he or she, or a person of whom he or she is the legal representative, is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or is or was serving at the request of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, partner (limited or general) or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, limited liability company, trust or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan, shall be (and shall be deemed to have a contractual right to be) indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation (and any successor to the Corporation by merger or otherwise) to the fullest extent authorized by, and subject to the conditions and (except as provided herein) procedures set forth in the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but any such amendment shall not be deemed to limit or prohibit the rights of indemnification hereunder for past acts or omissions of any such person insofar as such amendment limits or prohibits the indemnification rights that said law permitted the Corporation to provide prior to such amendment), against all expenses, liabilities and losses (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA taxes or penalties and amounts paid or to be paid in settlement) reasonably incurred or suffered by such person in connection therewith; , that the Corporation shall indemnify any such person seeking indemnification in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such person (except for a suit or action pursuant to hereof) only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized by the Board of Directors of the Corporation. Persons who are not directors or officers of the Corporation and are not so serving at the request of the Corporation may be similarly indemnified in respect of such service to the extent authorized at any time by the Board of Directors of the Corporation. The indemnification conferred in this also shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation (and such successor) the expenses (including attorneys' fees) incurred in the defense of or other involvement in any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition; , that, if and to the extent the Delaware General Corporation Law requires, the payment of such expenses (including attorneys' fees) incurred by a director or officer in advance of the final disposition of a proceeding shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an undertaking by or on behalf of such director or officer to repay all amounts so paid in advance if it shall ultimately be determined that such director or officer is not entitled to be indemnified under this or otherwise; and , that, such expenses incurred by other employees and agents may be so paid in advance upon such terms and conditions, if any, as the Board of Directors deems appropriate.
provided,
however
Section 6.2
Section 6.1
provided,
however
Section 6.1
provided
further
     
6.2. Right of Claimant to Bring Action Against the Corporation
          If a claim under is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, the claimant may at any time thereafter bring an action against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim and, if successful in whole or in part, the claimant shall be entitled to be paid also the expense of prosecuting such action. It shall be a defense to any such action (other than an action brought to enforce a claim for expenses incurred in connection with any proceeding in advance of its final disposition where the required undertaking, if any is required, has been tendered to the Corporation) that the claimant has not met the standards of conduct which make it permissible under the Delaware General Corporation Law for the Corporation to indemnify the claimant for
Section 6.1
 
the amount claimed or is otherwise not entitled to indemnification under , but the burden of proving such defense shall be on the Corporation. The failure of the Corporation (in the manner provided under the Delaware General Corporation Law) to have made a determination prior to or after the commencement of such action that indemnification of the claimant is proper in the circumstances because he or she has met the applicable standard of conduct set forth in the Delaware General Corporation Law shall not be a defense to the action or create a presumption that the claimant has not met the applicable standard of conduct. Unless otherwise specified in an agreement with the claimant, an actual determination by the Corporation (in the manner provided under the Delaware General Corporation Law) after the commencement of such action that the claimant has not met such applicable standard of conduct shall not be a defense to the action, but shall create a presumption that the claimant has not met the applicable standard of conduct. 
Section 6.1
     
6.3. Non-exclusivity
          The rights to indemnification and advance payment of expenses provided by hereof shall not be deemed exclusive of any other rights to which those seeking indemnification and advance payment of expenses may be entitled under any bylaw, agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors or otherwise, both as to action in his or her official capacity and as to action in another capacity while holding such office.
Section 6.1
     
6.4. Survival of Indemnification
          The indemnification and advance payment of expenses and rights thereto provided by, or granted pursuant to, hereof shall, unless otherwise provided when authorized or ratified, continue as to a person who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, partner or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the personal representatives, heirs, executors and administrators of such person.
Section 6.1
     
6.5. Insurance
          The Corporation shall have power to purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the Corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, partner (limited or general) or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, limited liability company, trust or other enterprise, against any liability asserted against such person or incurred by such person in any such capacity, or arising out of such person's status as such, and related expenses, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such liability under the provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
 
7. GENERAL PROVISIONS
     
7.1. Inspection of Books and Records
          Any stockholder, in person or by attorney or other agent, shall, upon written demand under oath stating the purpose thereof, have the right during the usual hours for business to inspect for any proper purpose, and to make copies or extracts from: (1) the Corporation's stock ledger, a list of its stockholders, and its other books and records; and (2) other documents as required by law. A proper purpose shall mean a purpose reasonably related to such person's interest as a stockholder. In every instance where an attorney or other agent shall be the person who seeks the right to inspection, the demand under oath shall be accompanied by a power of attorney or such other writing which authorizes the attorney or other agent to so act on behalf of the stockholder. The demand under oath shall be directed to the Corporation at its registered office or at its principal place of business.
     
7.2. Dividends
          The Board of Directors may declare dividends upon the capital stock of the Corporation, subject to the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation and the laws of the State of Delaware.
     
7.3. Reserves
          The directors of the Corporation may set apart, out of the funds of the Corporation available for dividends, a reserve or reserves for any proper purpose and may abolish any such reserve.
     
7.4. Execution of Instruments
          All checks, drafts or other orders for the payment of money, and promissory notes of the Corporation shall be signed by such officer or officers or such other person or persons as the Board of Directors may from time to time designate.
     
7.5. Fiscal Year
          The fiscal year of the Corporation shall end on December 31 of each year, unless otherwise fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors.
     
7.6. Seal
          The corporate seal, if any, shall be in such form as the Board of Directors shall approve. The seal may be used by causing it or a facsimile thereof to be impressed or affixed or otherwise reproduced.

 
Exhibit 10.01
November 8, 2007
William Blair & Company, L.L.C.      As Representative of the Several       Underwriters Named in Schedule A c/o William Blair & Company, L.L.C. 222 West Adams Street Chicago, Illinois 60606
Ladies and Gentlemen:
           American Public Education, Inc. (the ), a Delaware corporation, will have, upon the filing of an Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation (the ), an authorized capital stock consisting of 10,000,000 shares, $0.01 par value, of Preferred Stock, of which no shares will be outstanding as of the First Closing Date hereinafter defined, and 100,000,000 shares, $0.01 par value, of Common Stock (), of which 17,048,772 shares will be outstanding as of the First Closing Date hereinafter defined, excluding shares of Common Stock issued upon the exercise after the date of this Agreement of stock options outstanding as of the date of this Agreement. The Company proposes to issue and sell 4,687,500 shares of its authorized but unissued Common Stock (to the several underwriters named in Schedule A as it may be amended by the Pricing Agreement hereinafter defined (), who are acting severally and not jointly. In addition, the Company proposes to grant to the Underwriters an option to purchase up to 703,125 additional shares of Common Stock () as provided in Section 4 hereof. The Firm Shares and, to the extent such option is exercised, the Option Shares, are hereinafter collectively referred to as the
Section
1. Introductory.
"Company"
"Amended and Restated Charter"
"Common Stock"
"Firm Shares")
"Underwriters"
"Option Shares"
"Shares."
          You have advised the Company that the Underwriters propose to make a public offering of their respective portions of the Shares as soon as you deem advisable after the registration statement hereinafter referred to becomes effective, if it has not yet become effective, and the Pricing Agreement hereinafter defined has been executed and delivered.
           The Company and the Underwriters agree that up to 243,375 of the Shares to be purchased by the Underwriters (the "") shall be reserved for sale by the Underwriters to certain eligible employees of the Company and certain other individuals identified by the officers and directors of the Company (the ""), as part of the distribution of the Shares by the Underwriters, subject to the terms of this Agreement, the applicable rules, regulations and interpretations of the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc. ("") and all other applicable laws, rules and regulations. To the extent that any such Reserved Shares are not orally confirmed for purchase by Invitees by the end of
Reserved Shares
Invitees
NASD
 
 
the first business day after the date of this Agreement, such Reserved Shares may be offered to the public by the Underwriters as part of the public offering contemplated hereby.
          Prior to the purchase and public offering of the Shares by the several Underwriters, the Company and the Representative, acting on behalf of the several Underwriters, shall enter into an agreement substantially in the form of Exhibit A hereto (the ). The Pricing Agreement may take the form of an exchange of any standard form of written telecommunication between the Company and the Representative and shall specify such applicable information as is indicated in Exhibit A hereto. The offering of the Shares will be governed by this Agreement, as supplemented by the Pricing Agreement. From and after the date of the execution and delivery of the Pricing Agreement, this Agreement shall be deemed to incorporate the Pricing Agreement.
"Pricing Agreement"
          The Company hereby confirms its agreement with the Underwriters as follows:
          The Company represents and warrants to the several Underwriters that:
Section
2. Representations and Warranties of the Company.
     (a) A registration statement on Form S-1 (File No. 333-145185) and a related preliminary prospectus with respect to the Shares have been prepared and filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission () by the Company in conformity with the requirements of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (collectively, the unless otherwise indicated all references herein to specific rules are rules promulgated under the 1933 Act); and the Company has so prepared and has filed such amendments thereto, if any, and such amended preliminary prospectuses as may have been required to the date hereof and will file such additional amendments thereto and such amended prospectuses as may hereafter be required The Company will prepare and file a prospectus pursuant to Rule 424(b) that discloses the information previously omitted from the preliminary prospectus in reliance upon Rule 430A. To the extent that the Representative requests, there have been or will promptly be delivered to you one signed copy of such registration statement and amendments, one copy of each exhibit filed therewith, and conformed copies of such registration statement and amendments (but without exhibits) and of the related preliminary prospectus or prospectuses and final forms of prospectus for each of the Underwriters.
"Commission"
"1933 Act;"
.
     Such registration statement (as amended, if applicable) at the time it becomes effective and the prospectus constituting a part thereof (including the information, if any, deemed to be part thereof pursuant to Rule 430A(b)), as from time to time amended or supplemented, are hereinafter referred to as the and the respectively, except that if any revised prospectus shall be provided to the Underwriters by the Company for use in connection with the offering of the Shares which differs from the Prospectus on file at the Commission at the time the Registration Statement became or becomes effective (whether or not such revised prospectus is required to be filed by the Company pursuant to Rule 424(b)), the term Prospectus shall refer to such revised prospectus from and after the time it was provided to the Underwriters for such use. Any registration statement (including any amendment or supplement thereto or information which is deemed part thereof) filed by the Company under Rule 462(b) () shall be deemed to be part of the "Registration Statement" as defined herein, and any prospectus (including any amendment or supplement thereto or information which is deemed part thereof) included in such registration statement shall be deemed to be part of the "Prospectus" as defined herein, as appropriate. The Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder are hereinafter collectively referred to as the
"Registration Statement"
"Prospectus,"
"Rule 
462(b)
Registration Statement"
"Exchange Act."
 
          (b) The Commission has not issued any order preventing or suspending the use of any preliminary prospectus, and each preliminary prospectus has conformed in all material respects with the requirements of the 1933 Act and, as of its date, has not included any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances in which they were made, not misleading; and when the Registration Statement became or becomes effective, and at all times subsequent thereto, up to the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date hereinafter defined, as the case may be, the Registration Statement, including the information deemed to be part of the Registration Statement at the time of effectiveness pursuant to Rule 430A(b), if applicable, and the Prospectus and any amendments or supplements thereto, in all material respects conformed or will in all material respects conform to the requirements of the 1933 Act, and neither the Registration Statement nor the Prospectus, nor any amendment or supplement thereto, included or will include any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or will omit to state a material fact, in the case of the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement thereto, required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading and, in the case of the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
          As of the Applicable Time hereinafter defined, neither (x) the Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectus(es) hereinafter defined issued at or prior to the Applicable Time, the Statutory Prospectus hereinafter defined as of the Applicable Time and the information in Schedule A to the Pricing Agreement, all being considered together (collectively, the "") nor (y) any individual Issuer Limited Use Free Writing Prospectus hereinafter defined issued at or prior to the Applicable Time, when considered together with the Disclosure Package, included any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein not misleading.
Disclosure Package
          As used in this Section 2(b) and elsewhere in this Agreement:
          "" means 4:00 P.M., Chicago Time, on November 8, 2007 or such other time as agreed by the Company and the Representative.
Applicable Time
          "" means any "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433, relating to the Shares that (i) is required to be filed with the Commission by the Company, (ii) is a "road show for an offering that is a written communication" within the meaning of Rule 433(d)(8)(i) whether or not required to be filed with the Commission or (iii) is exempt from filing pursuant to Rule 433(d)(5)(i) because it contains a description of the Shares or of the offering thereof that does not reflect the final terms, in each case in the form filed or required to be filed with the Commission or, if not required to be filed, in the form required to be retained in the Company's records pursuant to Rule 433(g).
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus
          "" means any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus specified in Schedule B hereto.
Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectus
          "" means any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus that is not an Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectus.
Issuer Limited Use Free Writing Prospectus
          "" as of any time means the prospectus relating to the Shares that is included in the Registration Statement immediately prior to that time.
Statutory Prospectus
 
     The Company has made available a "electronic road show," as defined in Rule 433, in compliance with Rule 433(d)(8)(ii) (the "") such that no filing of any "road show" (as defined in Rule 433(h)) is required in connection with the offering of the Shares.
bona fide
Bona Fide Electronic Road Show
     Each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, as of its issue date and at all subsequent times through the completion of the public offer and sale of the Shares or until any earlier date that the Company notified or notifies the Representative as described in Section 5(d), did not, does not and will not include any information that conflicted, conflicts or will conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus, and any preliminary or other prospectus deemed to be a part thereof that has not been superseded or modified.
     Notwithstanding the foregoing, the representations and warranties of the Company set forth in this Section 2(b) shall not apply to information contained in or omitted from any preliminary prospectus, the Registration Statement, the Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by or on behalf of any Underwriter through the Representative specifically for use in the preparation thereof.
     At the time of filing the Registration Statement, any 462(b) Registration Statement and any post-effective amendments thereto and at the date of this Agreement, the Company was not and is not an "ineligible issuer" as defined in Rule 405.
     (c) The Company and its subsidiaries have been duly incorporated and are validly existing as corporations in good standing under the laws of their respective places of incorporation, with corporate power and authority to own their properties and conduct their business as described in the Prospectus; the Company and each of its subsidiaries are duly qualified to do business as foreign corporations under the corporation law of, and are in good standing as such in, each jurisdiction in which they own or lease substantial properties, have an office, or in which substantial business is conducted and such qualification is required except in any such case where the failure to so qualify or be in good standing would not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect upon the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole; and no proceeding of which the Company has knowledge has been instituted in any such jurisdiction, revoking, limiting or curtailing, or seeking to revoke, limit or curtail, such power and authority or qualification. The State of West Virginia and the Commonwealth of Virginia are the only jurisdictions in which the Company or any of its subsidiaries maintains an office or leases property.
     (d) Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Company owns directly or indirectly 100 percent of the issued and outstanding capital stock of each of its subsidiaries, free and clear of any claims, liens, encumbrances or security interests and all of such capital stock has been duly authorized and validly issued and is fully paid and nonassessable.
     (e) The issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company as set forth in the Prospectus have been duly authorized and validly issued, are fully paid and nonassessable, and will, after giving effect to the filing and effectiveness of the Amended and Restated Charter, conform to the description thereof contained in the Prospectus.
     (f) The Shares have been duly authorized and when issued, delivered and paid for pursuant to this Agreement, will be validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable, and will conform to the description thereof contained in the Prospectus.
 
     (g) The making and performance by the Company of this Agreement and the Pricing Agreement have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action and will not (i) violate the Company's charter or bylaws, after giving effect to the filing and effectiveness of the Amended and Restated Charter pursuant to Section 5(q), (ii) result, except as would not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole, in a breach or violation of any of the terms and provisions of, or constitute a default or change of control under (A) any agreement, franchise, license, indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument to which the Company or any subsidiary is a party or by which the Company, any subsidiary or the property of any of them may be bound or affected, or (B) any statute, rule, regulation or order applicable to the Company or any of its subsidiaries of any court, regulatory body, accrediting agency, administrative agency or other governmental body having jurisdiction over the Company or any subsidiary or any of their respective properties, including, without limitation, the Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (the ""), or any order of any court, regulatory body, accrediting agency, administrative agency or other governmental body entered in any proceeding to which the Company or any subsidiary was or is now a party or by which it is bound. No consent, approval, authorization or other order of any court, regulatory body, accrediting agency, administrative agency or other governmental body is required for the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the Pricing Agreement or the consummation of the transactions contemplated herein or therein, except for compliance with the 1933 Act and blue sky laws applicable to the public offering of the Shares by the several Underwriters and clearance of such offering with the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority (""). This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by the Company.
HEA
FINRA
     (h) The accountants who have expressed their opinions with respect to certain of the financial statements and schedules included in the Registration Statement are an independent registered public accounting firm as required by the 1933 Act and such accountants are not in violation of the auditor independence requirements of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (the ).
"Sarbanes-Oxley Act"
     (i) The consolidated financial statements of the Company included in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus present fairly in all material respects the consolidated financial position of the Company as of the respective dates of such financial statements, and the consolidated statements of operations and cash flows of the Company for the respective periods covered thereby, all in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied throughout the periods involved, except as disclosed therein.
     The financial information set forth in the Prospectus under "Summary Consolidated Financial and Operating Data" and "Selected Consolidated Financial and Operating Data" presents fairly in all material respects on the basis stated in the Prospectus, the information set forth therein.
     The pro forma financial statements and other pro forma information included in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus present fairly the information shown therein, have been prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and the Commission's rules and guidelines with respect to pro forma financial statements and other pro forma information, have been properly compiled on the pro forma basis described therein, and, in the opinion of the Company, the assumptions used in the preparation thereof are reasonable and the adjustments used therein are appropriate under the circumstances.
 
     All disclosures contained in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus regarding "non-GAAP financial measures" (as such term is defined by the Commission's rules and regulations) comply with Regulation G of the Exchange Act and Item 10 of Regulation S-K under the 1933 Act, to the extent applicable.
     (j) Neither the Company nor any subsidiary is in violation of its charter or in default under any consent decree, or in default with respect to any material provision of any lease, loan agreement, franchise, license, permit or other contract obligation to which it is a party; and, to the Company's knowledge, there does not exist any state of facts which constitutes an event of default as defined in such documents or which, with notice or lapse of time or both, would constitute such an event of default, in each case, except for defaults that neither singly nor in the aggregate are material to the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole.
     (k) There are no material legal, governmental or accrediting agency proceedings pending, or to the Company's knowledge, threatened to which the Company or any subsidiary is or may be a party or of which material property owned or leased by the Company or any subsidiary is or may be the subject, or related to environmental or discrimination matters that are not disclosed in the Prospectus, or that question the validity of this Agreement or the Pricing Agreement or any action taken or to be taken pursuant hereto or thereto.
     (l) There are no holders of securities of the Company having rights to registration thereof or preemptive rights to purchase Common Stock except as disclosed in the Prospectus. All holders of registration rights have waived such rights with respect to the offering being made by the Prospectus.
     (m) The Company and each of its subsidiaries have good and marketable title to all the properties and assets reflected as owned in the financial statements hereinabove described (or elsewhere in the Prospectus), except to the extent that such properties and assets were disposed of in the ordinary course of business after the date of such financial statements, subject to no lien, mortgage, pledge, charge or encumbrance of any kind except those, if any, reflected in such financial statements (or elsewhere in the Prospectus) or that are not material to the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole. The Company and each of its subsidiaries hold their respective leased properties that are material to the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole under valid and binding leases.
     (n) The Company has not taken and will not take, directly or indirectly, any action designed to or which has constituted or which might reasonably be expected to cause or result, under the Exchange Act or otherwise, in stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company to facilitate the sale or resale of the Shares.
     (o) Subsequent to the respective dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, and except as contemplated by the Prospectus, the Company and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole, have not incurred any material liabilities or obligations, direct or contingent, or entered into any material transactions not in the ordinary course of business and there has not been any material adverse change in their condition (financial or otherwise) or results of operations nor any material change in their capital stock, short-term debt or long-term debt.
     (p) There is no material document of a character required to be described in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus or to be filed as an exhibit to the Registration Statement which is not described or filed as required.
 
     (q) Except as disclosed in the Prospectus, the Company together with its subsidiaries owns and possesses all right, title and interest in and to, or has duly licensed from third parties, all patents, patent rights, trade secrets, inventions, know-how, trademarks, trade names, copyrights, service marks and other proprietary rights () material to the business of the Company and each of its subsidiaries taken as a whole. Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has received any notice of infringement, misappropriation or conflict from any third party as to such material Trade Rights which has not been resolved or disposed of and neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has infringed, misappropriated or otherwise conflicted with material Trade Rights of any third parties, which infringement, misappropriation or conflict would reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect upon the condition (financial or otherwise) or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole.
"Trade Rights"
     (r) The conduct of the business of the Company and each of its subsidiaries is in compliance in all respects with applicable federal, state, local and foreign laws and regulations and with applicable accrediting agency rules, except where the failure to be in compliance would not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect upon the condition (financial or otherwise) or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole.
     (s) The Company and its subsidiaries possess certificates, authorizations, accreditations or permits issued by appropriate governmental agencies or bodies or accrediting agencies necessary to conduct the business now operated by them (except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the Company and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole), including, without limitation, all authorizations required to participate in federal financial aid programs under Title IV of the HEA, and have not received any notice of proceedings relating to the revocation or modification of any such certificate, authorization, accreditation or permit that, if determined adversely to the Company or its subsidiaries, would, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the Company and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
     (t) All offers and sales of the Company's capital stock prior to the date hereof were at all relevant times exempt from the registration requirements of the 1933 Act and all such offers and sales during the twelve months prior to the date hereof were duly registered with or the subject of an available exemption from the registration requirements of the applicable state and local securities or blue sky laws.
     (u) The Company has filed all necessary federal, state and local income and franchise tax returns that were required to be filed prior to the date hereof, after taking into account all applicable extensions obtained, except where the failure to file would not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect upon the condition (financial or otherwise) or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole, and has paid all taxes shown as due thereon, and there is no tax deficiency that has been, or to the knowledge of the Company might be, asserted against the Company or any of its properties or assets that would reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect upon the condition (financial or otherwise) or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole.
     (v) The Company has filed a registration statement pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Exchange Act to register the Common Stock thereunder, has filed an application to list the Shares on The NASDAQ Global Market, and has received notification that the listing has been approved, subject to notice of issuance or sale of the Shares, as the case may be.
 
     (w) The Company has established and maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rules 13a-15 and 15d-15 under the Exchange Act) and such controls and procedures are effective in ensuring that material information relating to the Company, including its subsidiaries, is made known to the principal executive officer and the principal financial officer.
     (x) The Company maintains a system of internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurance that: (i) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorizations; (ii) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and to maintain accountability for assets; (iii) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (iv) amounts reflected on the Company's consolidated balance sheet for assets are compared with existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences.
     (y) The Company is not, and does not intend to conduct its business in a manner in which it would become, an "investment company" as defined in Section 3(a) of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended ().
"Investment Company Act"
     (z) No transaction has occurred between or among the Company and any of its officers or directors, stockholders or any affiliate or affiliates of any such officer or director or stockholder that is required to be described in and is not described in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus.
     (aa) The Company's board of directors has validly appointed an audit committee whose composition satisfies the requirements of Rule 4350(d)(2) of the Rules of NASD (the ), and the board of directors or the audit committee has adopted a charter that satisfies the requirements of Rule 4350(d)(1) of the NASD Rules.
"NASD Rules"
     (bb) The Company and its subsidiaries are insured by insurers of recognized financial responsibility against such losses and risks and in such amounts as are customary in the businesses in which they are engaged or propose to engage after giving effect to the transactions described in the Prospectus. To the knowledge of the Company, all policies of insurance and fidelity or surety bonds insuring the Company, its subsidiaries and their respective businesses, assets, employees, officers and directors are in full force and effect; and the Company and its subsidiaries are in compliance with the terms of such policies and instruments in all material respects.
     (cc) The Company has taken all necessary actions to ensure that, upon the effectiveness of the Registration Statement, it will be in compliance in all material respects with all provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act and all rules and regulations promulgated thereunder or implementing the provisions thereof that are then in effect and which the Company is required to comply with as of the effectiveness of the Registration Statement, and is actively taking steps to ensure that it will be in compliance in all material respects with other provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act not currently in effect, upon the effectiveness of such provisions, or which will become applicable to the Company at all times after the effectiveness of the Registration Statement.
     (dd) None of the Company and its subsidiaries is involved in any labor dispute nor, to the knowledge of the Company, is any such dispute threatened. The Company is not aware of any threatened or pending litigation between the Company and any of its executive officers and,
 
except as disclosed in the Prospectus, has not received notice from any of its executive officers that such officer does not intend to remain in the employment of the Company.
     (ee) No consent, approval, authorization or order of, or qualification with, any accrediting agency or governmental body or agency, other than those obtained, is required in connection with the offering of the Reserved Shares in any jurisdiction where the Reserved Shares are being offered. The Company has not offered, or caused the Underwriters to offer, any Reserved Shares with the specific intent to unlawfully influence (i) a customer or supplier of the Company or any of its subsidiaries to alter the customer's or supplier's level or type of business with the Company or any of its subsidiaries or (ii) a trade journalist or publication to write or publish favorable information about the Company or its products.
     (ff) The Company has taken all action necessary to declare the Special Distribution as described in the Prospectus and has obtained elections from each of the holders of shares of its Class A Common Stock to convert all of such shares into shares of Common Stock prior to the delivery of the Firm Shares described in Section 4.
           The Representative, on behalf of the several Underwriters, represents and warrants to the Company that the information set forth (a) on the cover page of the Prospectus with respect to price, underwriting discount and terms of the offering and (b) in paragraphs 3, 5, 13 and 14 under "Underwriting" in the Prospectus was furnished to the Company by and on behalf of the Underwriters for use in connection with the preparation of the Registration Statement and is correct and complete in all material respects.
Section
3. Representations and Warranties of the Underwriters.
           On the basis of the representations, warranties and agreements herein contained, but subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Company agrees to sell to the Underwriters named in Schedule A hereto, and the Underwriters agree, severally and not jointly, to purchase the Firm Shares from the Company at the price per share set forth in the Pricing Agreement. The obligation of each Underwriter to the Company shall be to purchase that number of full shares set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter in Schedule A hereto. The initial public offering price and the purchase price shall be set forth in the Pricing Agreement.
Section
4. Purchase, Sale and Delivery of Shares.
          At 9:00 A.M., Chicago Time, on the fourth business day, if permitted under Rule 15c6-1 under the Exchange Act, (or the third business day if required under Rule 15c6-1 under the Exchange Act or unless postponed in accordance with the provisions of Section 12) following the date the Registration Statement becomes effective (or, if the Company has elected to rely upon Rule 430A, the fourth business day, if permitted under Rule 15c6-1 under the Exchange Act, (or the third business day if required under Rule 15c6-1 under the Exchange Act) after execution of the Pricing Agreement), or such other time not later than ten business days after such date as shall be agreed upon by the Representative and the Company, the Company will deliver to you at the offices of counsel for the Underwriters or through the facilities of The Depository Trust Company for the accounts of the several Underwriters, certificates representing the Firm Shares to be sold by it, against payment of the purchase price therefor by delivery of federal or other immediately available funds, by wire transfer or otherwise, to the Company. Such time of delivery and payment is herein referred to as the The certificates for the Firm Shares so to be delivered will be in such denominations and registered in such names as you request by notice to the Company prior to 10:00 A.M., Chicago Time, on the second business day preceding the First Closing Date, and will be made available at the Company's expense for checking and packaging by the Representative at 10:00 A.M., Chicago Time, on the business day preceding the First Closing Date. Payment for the Firm Shares so to be delivered shall be made at the time and in the manner described above at the offices of counsel for the Underwriters.
"First Closing Date."
          In addition, on the basis of the representations, warranties and agreements herein contained, but subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Company hereby grants an option
 
to the several Underwriters to purchase, severally and not jointly, up to an aggregate of 703,125 Option Shares, at the same purchase price per share to be paid for the Firm Shares, for use solely in covering any overallotments made by the Underwriters in the sale and distribution of the Firm Shares. The option granted hereunder may be exercised at any time (but not more than once) within 30 days after the date of the Prospectus first filed by the Company pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the 1933 Act (the "") upon notice by you to the Company setting forth the aggregate number of Option Shares as to which the Underwriters are exercising the option, the names and denominations in which the certificates for such shares are to be registered and the time and place at which such certificates will be delivered. Such time of delivery (which may not be earlier than the First Closing Date), being herein referred to as the shall be determined by you, but if at any time other than the First Closing Date, shall not be earlier than three nor later than 10 full business days after delivery of such notice of exercise. The number of Option Shares to be purchased by each Underwriter shall be determined by multiplying the number of Option Shares to be sold by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of Firm Shares to be purchased by such Underwriter as set forth opposite its name in Schedule A and the denominator of which is the total number of Firm Shares (subject to such adjustments to eliminate any fractional share purchases as you in your absolute discretion may make). Certificates for the Option Shares will be made available at the Company's expense for checking and packaging at 10:00 A.M., Chicago Time, on the first full business day preceding the Second Closing Date. The manner of payment for and delivery of the Option Shares shall be the same as for the Firm Shares as specified in the preceding paragraph.
Rule 424 Prospectus
"Second Closing Date,"
          You have advised the Company that each Underwriter has authorized you to accept delivery of its Shares, to make payment and to receipt therefor. You, individually and not as the Representative of the Underwriters, may make payment for any Shares to be purchased by any Underwriter whose funds shall not have been received by you by the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, for the account of such Underwriter, but any such payment shall not relieve such Underwriter from any obligation hereunder.
           The Company covenants and agrees that:
Section
5. Covenants of the Company.
     (a) The Company will advise you promptly of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or of the institution of any proceedings for that purpose, or of any notification of the suspension of qualification of the Shares for sale in any jurisdiction or the initiation or threatening of any proceedings for that purpose or of any examination pursuant to Section 8(e) of the 1933 Act concerning the Registration Statement and if the Company becomes the subject of a proceeding under Section 8A of the 1933 Act in connection with the offering of the Shares, and will also advise you promptly of any request of the Commission for amendment or supplement of the Registration Statement, of any preliminary prospectus or of the Prospectus, or for additional information.
     (b) The Company will give you notice of its intention to file or prepare any amendment to the Registration Statement (including any post-effective amendment) or any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus (including any revised prospectus which the Company proposes for use by the Underwriters in connection with the offering of the Shares which differs from the prospectus on file at the Commission at the time the Registration Statement became or becomes effective, whether or not such revised prospectus is required to be filed pursuant to Rule 424(b)) and will furnish you with copies of any such amendment or supplement a reasonable amount of time prior to such proposed filing or use, as the case may be, and will not file any such amendment or supplement or use any such prospectus to which you or counsel for the Underwriters shall reasonably object.
 
     (c) If at any time when a prospectus relating to the Shares is required to be delivered under the 1933 Act any event occurs as a result of which the Prospectus, including any amendments or supplements, would include an untrue statement of a material fact, or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, or if it is necessary at any time to amend the Prospectus, including any amendments or supplements thereto and including any revised prospectus which the Company proposes for use by the Underwriters in connection with the offering of the Shares which differs from the prospectus on file with the Commission at the time of effectiveness of the Registration Statement, whether or not such revised prospectus is required to be filed pursuant to Rule 424(b) to comply with the 1933 Act, the Company promptly will advise you thereof and will promptly prepare and file with the Commission an amendment or supplement which will correct such statement or omission or an amendment which will effect such compliance; and, in case any Underwriter is required to deliver a prospectus nine months or more after the effective date of the Registration Statement, the Company upon request, but at the expense of such Underwriter, will prepare promptly such prospectus or prospectuses as may be necessary to permit compliance with the requirements of Section 10(a)(3) of the 1933 Act.
     (d) If at any time following the issuance of an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus there occurred or occurs an event or development as a result of which such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus conflicted or would conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement or included or would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or would omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances prevailing at that subsequent time, not misleading, the Company will promptly notify the Representative and will promptly amend or supplement, at its own expense, such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus to eliminate or correct such conflict, untrue statement or omission.
     (e) Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries will acquire any capital stock of the Company prior to the earlier of the Second Closing Date or termination or expiration of the related option nor will the Company declare or pay any dividend or make any other distribution upon the Common Stock payable to stockholders of record on a date prior to the earlier of the Second Closing Date or termination or expiration of the related option, except in either case as contemplated by the Prospectus.
     (f) Not later than March 16, 2009 the Company will make generally available to its security holders an earnings statement (which need not be audited) covering a period of at least 12 months beginning after the effective date of the Registration Statement, which will satisfy the provisions of the last paragraph of Section 11(a) of the 1933 Act.
     (g) During such period as a prospectus is required by law to be delivered in connection with offers and sales of the Shares by an Underwriter or dealer, upon your request, the Company will furnish to you at its expense, subject to the provisions of subsection (d) hereof, copies of the Registration Statement, the Prospectus, any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus hereinafter defined, each preliminary prospectus and all amendments and supplements to any such documents in each case as soon as available and in such quantities as you may reasonably request, for the purposes contemplated by the 1933 Act.
     (h) The Company will cooperate with the Underwriters in qualifying or registering the Shares for sale under the blue sky laws of such jurisdictions as you designate, and will continue such qualifications in effect so long as reasonably required for the distribution of the Shares. The Company shall not be required to qualify as a foreign corporation or to file a general
 
consent to service of process in any such jurisdiction where it is not currently qualified or where it would be subject to taxation as a foreign corporation.
     (i) Upon the request of the Representative and to the extent not publicly available on the Commission's EDGAR database, during the period of five years hereafter, the Company will furnish you and each of the other Underwriters with a copy (i) as soon as practicable after the filing thereof, of each report filed by the Company with the Commission, any securities exchange or FINRA; (ii) as soon as practicable after the release thereof, of each material press release in respect of the Company that is not disseminated via the Company's website or a national news service; and (iii) as soon as available, of each report of the Company mailed to stockholders.
     (j) The Company will use the proceeds received by it from the sale of the Shares being sold by it in the manner specified in the Prospectus.
     (k) If, at the time of effectiveness of the Registration Statement, any information shall have been omitted therefrom in reliance upon Rule 430A, then promptly following the execution of the Pricing Agreement, the Company will prepare, and file or transmit for filing with the Commission in accordance with such Rule 430A and Rule 424(b), copies of an amended Prospectus, or, if required by such Rule 430A, a post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement (including an amended Prospectus), containing all information so omitted. If required, the Company will prepare and file, or transmit for filing, a Rule 462(b) Registration Statement not later than the date of the execution of the Pricing Agreement. If a Rule 462(b) Registration Statement is filed, the Company shall make payment of, or arrange for payment of, the additional registration fee owing to the Commission required by Rule 111.
     (l) For so long as the Company is subject to the Exchange Act, the Company will comply with all registration, filing and reporting requirements of the Exchange Act and The NASDAQ Global Market; and the Company will comply in all material respects with all applicable provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act.
     (m) For so long as the Company is subject to the Exchange Act, the Company will maintain such controls and other procedures, including without limitation those required by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act and the applicable regulations thereunder, that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Company in the reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the Commission's rules and forms, including without limitation, controls and procedures designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Company in the reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is accumulated and communicated to the Company's management, including its principal executive officer and its principal financial officer, or persons performing similar functions, as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure.
     (n) For so long as the Company is subject to the Exchange Act, the Company will maintain a system of internal accounting controls designed to provide reasonable assurance that: (i) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorizations; (ii) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and to maintain accountability for assets; (iii) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (iv) amounts reflected on the Company's consolidated balance sheet for assets is compared with existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences.
 
     (o) The Company agrees not to, directly or indirectly, (i) offer, sell (including "short" selling), assign, transfer, contract to sell, grant an option to purchase, establish an open "put equivalent position" within the meaning of Rule 16a-1(h) under the Exchange Act, or otherwise dispose of any shares of Common Stock or securities convertible or exchangeable into, or exercisable for, Common Stock; or (ii) enter any swap or other arrangement that transfers all or a portion of the economic consequences associated with the ownership of any Common Stock (except, in each case, Common Stock sold pursuant to this Agreement or issued pursuant to options, warrants or convertible securities currently outstanding and except for options and restricted stock to be granted under existing equity compensation plans) without the prior written consent of the Representative for a period of 180 days (the "") after the date of the Rule 424 Prospectus; , , that if (1) during the last 17 days of the initial Lock-Up Period, the Company releases earnings results or material news or a material event relating to the Company occurs or (2) prior to the expiration of the initial Lock-Up Period, the Company announces that it will release earnings results during the 16-day period beginning on the last day of the initial Lock-Up Period, then in either case the Lock-Up Period will be extended until the expiration of the 18-day period beginning on the date of release of the earnings results or the occurrence of the material news or material event, as applicable, unless the Representative waives, in writing, such extension.
Lock-Up Period
provided
however
     (p) The Company hereby agrees that it will ensure that the Reserved Shares will be restricted as required by FINRA or the NASD Rules from sale, transfer, assignment, pledge or hypothecation for a period of three months following the date of this Agreement. The Underwriters will notify the Company as to which persons will need to be so restricted and the Company's obligations under this Section 5(p) will extend only to such persons. At the request of the Underwriters, the Company will direct the transfer agent to place a stop transfer restriction upon such securities for such period of time. Should the Company release, or seek to release, from such restrictions any of the Reserved Shares, the Company agrees to reimburse the Underwriters for any reasonable expenses (including, without limitation, legal expenses) they incur in connection with such release.
     (q) The Company will file and cause to become effective the Amended and Restated Charter prior to the First Closing Date.
           The Company represents and agrees that, unless it obtains the prior consent of the Representative, and each Underwriter, severally and not jointly, represents and agrees that, unless it obtains the prior consent of the Company and the Representative, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Shares that would constitute an "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433, or that would otherwise constitute a "free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 405, required to be filed with the Commission. Any such free writing prospectus consented to by the Representative or by the Company and the Representative, as the case may be, is hereinafter referred to as a "." The Company represents that it has treated and agrees that it will treat each Permitted Free Writing Prospectus as an "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433, and has complied and will comply with the requirements of Rule 433 applicable to any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, including timely filing with the Commission where required, legending and record-keeping.
Section
6. Covenants of the Company and the Underwriters.
Permitted Free Writing Prospectus
           Whether or not the transactions contemplated hereunder are consummated or this Agreement becomes effective as to all of its provisions or is terminated, the Company agrees to pay (i) all costs, fees and expenses (other than legal fees and disbursements of counsel for the Underwriters and the expenses incurred by the Underwriters) incurred in connection with the performance of the Company's obligations hereunder, including without limiting the
Section
7. Payment of Expenses.
 
generality of the foregoing, all fees and expenses of legal counsel for the Company and of the Company's independent accountants, all costs and expenses incurred in connection with the preparation, printing, filing and distribution (including electronic delivery) of the Registration Statement, each preliminary prospectus, any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus and the Prospectus (including all exhibits and financial statements) and all amendments and supplements provided for herein, this Agreement, the Pricing Agreement and a blue sky memorandum, (ii) all reasonable third-party costs, fees and expenses (including reasonable legal fees and disbursements of outside counsel for the Underwriters) incurred by the Underwriters in connection with qualifying or registering all or any part of the Shares for offer and sale under blue sky laws, including clearance of such offering with FINRA; (iii) all fees and expenses of the Company's transfer agent, printing of the certificates for the Shares and all transfer taxes, if any, with respect to the sale and delivery of the Shares to the several Underwriters; (iv) all reasonable third-party costs, fees and expenses (including reasonable legal fees of outside counsel for the Underwriters) incurred by the Underwriters related to the offering of the Reserved Shares which are designated by the Company for sale to Invitees; and (v) all third-party costs, fees and expenses (including without limitation any damages or other amounts payable in connection with legal or contractual liability) associated with the reforming of any contracts for sale of the Shares made by the Underwriters caused by a breach of the representation contained in the second paragraph of Section 2(b); , , that, except as provided in this Section 7, Section 9, Section 11 and Section 14 hereof, the Underwriters will pay all of their own costs and expenses, including the fees of their counsel (except as set forth above), stock transfer taxes on the resale of any Shares by them and any expenses relating to the publishing of "tombstone" advertisements.
provided
however
           The obligations of the several Underwriters to purchase and pay for the Firm Shares on the First Closing Date and the Option Shares on the Second Closing Date shall be subject to the accuracy of the representations and warranties on the part of the Company herein set forth as of the date hereof and as of the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, to the accuracy of the statements of officers of the Company made pursuant to the provisions hereof, to the performance by the Company of its obligations hereunder, and to the following additional conditions:
Section
8. Conditions of the Obligations of the Underwriters.
     (a) The Registration Statement shall have become effective either prior to the execution of this Agreement or not later than 1:00 P.M., Chicago Time, on the first full business day after the date of this Agreement, or such later time as shall have been consented to by you but in no event later than 1:00 P.M., Chicago Time, on the third full business day following the date hereof; and prior to the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued and no proceedings for that purpose shall have been instituted or shall be pending or, to the knowledge of the Company or you, shall be contemplated by the Commission. If the Company has elected to rely upon Rule 430A, the information concerning the initial public offering price of the Shares and price-related information shall have been transmitted to the Commission for filing pursuant to Rule 424(b) in the manner and within the prescribed time period (without reliance on Rule 424(b)(8)) and the Company will provide evidence satisfactory to the Representative of such timely filing (or a post-effective amendment providing such information shall have been filed and declared effective in accordance with the requirements of Rules 430A and 424(b)). If a Rule 462(b) Registration Statement is required, such Registration Statement shall have been transmitted to the Commission for filing and become effective within the prescribed time period and, prior to the First Closing Date, the Company shall have provided evidence of such filing and effectiveness in accordance with Rule 462(b).
     (b) The Shares shall have been qualified for sale under the blue sky laws of such states as shall have been specified by the Representative.
 
          (c) The legality and sufficiency of the authorization, issuance and sale or transfer and sale of the Shares hereunder, the validity and form of the certificates representing the Shares, the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the Pricing Agreement, and all corporate proceedings and other legal matters incident thereto, and the form of the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package, any Issuer Limited Use Free Writing Prospectus and the Prospectus (except financial statements) shall have been approved by counsel for the Underwriters exercising reasonable judgment.
          (d) You shall not have advised the Company that the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package, any Issuer Limited Use Free Writing Prospectus, when considered together with the Disclosure Package, or the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto, contains an untrue statement of fact, which, in the opinion of counsel for the Underwriters, is material or omits to state a fact which, in the opinion of such counsel, is material and is required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading.
          (e) Subsequent to the execution and delivery of this Agreement, there shall not have occurred any material adverse change, or any development involving a prospective material adverse change, in or affecting particularly the business or properties of the Company or its subsidiaries, taken as a whole, whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business, which, in the judgment of the Representative, makes it impractical or inadvisable to proceed with the public offering of the Shares as contemplated hereby.
          (f) There shall have been furnished to you, as Representative of the Underwriters, on the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, except as otherwise expressly provided below:
          (i) An opinion of Hogan & Hartson L.L.P., counsel for the Company, addressed to the Underwriters and dated the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Underwriters.
          (ii) A letter from Hogan & Hartson L.L.P., counsel for the Company, addressed to the Underwriters and dated the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Underwriters.
          (iii) Such opinion or opinions of Sidley Austin LLP, counsel for the Underwriters, dated the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, with respect to the incorporation of the Company, the validity of the Shares, the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus and other related matters as you may reasonably require, and the Company shall have furnished to such counsel such documents and shall have exhibited to them such papers and records as they reasonably request for the purpose of enabling them to pass upon such matters.
          (iv) A certificate of the chief executive officer and the principal financial officer of the Company, dated the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, to the effect that:
               (1) the representations and warranties of the Company set forth in Section 2 of this Agreement are true and correct as of the date of this Agreement and as of the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be,
 
and the Company has complied with all the agreements and satisfied all the conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied at or prior to such Closing Date;
          (2) the Commission has not issued an order preventing or suspending the use of the Prospectus or any preliminary prospectus filed as a part of the Registration Statement or any amendment thereto; no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued; and to the best knowledge of the respective signers, no proceedings for that purpose have been instituted or are pending or contemplated under the 1933 Act; and
          (3) subsequent to the date of the most recent financial statements included in the Registration Statement and Prospectuses, and except as set forth or contemplated in the Prospectuses, (A) none of the Company and its consolidated subsidiaries has incurred any material liabilities or obligations, direct or contingent, or entered into any material transactions not in the ordinary course of business, and (B) there has not been any change that has had or would reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect upon the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or any material change in their short-term debt or long-term debt.
The delivery of the certificate provided for in this subparagraph shall be and constitute a representation and warranty of the Company as to the facts required in the immediately foregoing clauses (1), (2) and (3) to be set forth in said certificate.
     (v) At the time the Pricing Agreement is executed and also on the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, there shall be delivered to you a letter addressed to you, as Representative of the Underwriters, from McGladrey & Pullen, LLP, an independent registered public accountant firm, the first one to be dated the date of the Pricing Agreement, the second one to be dated the First Closing Date and the third one (in the event of a second closing) to be dated the Second Closing Date, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Underwriters. There shall not have been any change or decrease specified in the letters referred to in this subparagraph which makes it impractical or inadvisable in the judgment of the Representative to proceed with the public offering or purchase of the Shares as contemplated hereby.
     (vi) A certificate of the chief executive officer and the principal financial officer of the Company, dated the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, regarding certain statistical or financial figures included in the Prospectus which you may reasonably request and which have not been otherwise verified by the letters referred to in clause (v) above, such verification to include the provision of documentary evidence supporting any such statistical or financial figure.
     (vii) Such further certificates and documents as you may reasonably request.
          All such opinions, certificates, letters and documents shall be in compliance with the provisions hereof only if they are satisfactory to you and to Sidley Austin LLP, counsel for the Underwriters, which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld. The Company shall furnish you with such manually signed or conformed copies of such opinions, certificates, letters and documents as you request.
 
     If any condition to the Underwriters' obligations hereunder to be satisfied prior to or at the First Closing Date is not so satisfied, this Agreement at your election will terminate upon notification to the Company without liability on the part of any Underwriter or the Company, except for the expenses to be paid or reimbursed by the Company pursuant to Sections 7 and 9 hereof and except to the extent provided in Section 11 hereof.
     If the sale to the Underwriters of the Firm Shares on the First Closing Date is not consummated because any condition of the Underwriters' obligations hereunder is not satisfied or because of any refusal, inability or failure on the part of the Company to perform any agreement herein or to comply with any provision hereof, unless such failure to satisfy such condition or to comply with any provision hereof is due to the default or omission of any Underwriter, the Company agrees to reimburse you and the other Underwriters upon demand for all out-of-pocket expenses (including reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel) that shall have been reasonably incurred by you and them in connection with the proposed purchase and the sale of the Shares. Any such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party except that the provisions of this Section 9, Section 7 and Section 11 shall at all times be effective and shall apply.
Section
9. Reimbursement of Underwriters' Expenses.
     You and the Company will use your and its best efforts to cause the Registration Statement to become effective, if it has not yet become effective, and to prevent the issuance of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement and, if such stop order be issued, to obtain as soon as possible the lifting thereof.
Section
10. Effectiveness of Registration Statement.
     (a) The Company agrees to indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter and each person, if any, who controls any Underwriter within the meaning of the 1933 Act or the Exchange Act against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities, joint or several, to which such Underwriter or such controlling person may become subject under the 1933 Act, the Exchange Act or other federal or state statutory law or regulation, at common law or otherwise (including in settlement of any litigation if such settlement is effected with the written consent of the Company), insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in the Registration Statement, including the information deemed to be part of the Registration Statement at the time of effectiveness pursuant to Rule 430A, any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact, in the case of the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement thereto, required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading and, in the case of any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; and will reimburse each Underwriter and each such controlling person for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such Underwriter or such controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action; provided, however, that the Company will not be liable in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission made in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by or on behalf of any Underwriter through the Representative, specifically for use therein. In addition to its other obligations under this Section 11(a), the Company agrees that, as an interim measure during the pendency of any claim, action, investigation, inquiry or other proceeding arising out of or based upon any statement or omission, or any alleged statement or omission, described in this Section 11(a), it will reimburse the Underwriters on a monthly basis for all reasonable legal and other expenses incurred in connection with investigating or defending any such claim, action, investigation, inquiry or other
Section
11. Indemnification.
 
proceeding, notwithstanding the absence of a judicial determination as to the propriety and enforceability of the Company's obligation to reimburse the Underwriters for such expenses and the possibility that such payments might later be held to have been improper by a court of competent jurisdiction. This indemnity agreement will be in addition to any liability which the Company may otherwise have.
     (b) Each Underwriter will severally indemnify and hold harmless the Company, each of its directors, each of its officers who signed the Registration Statement and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of the 1933 Act or the Exchange Act, against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which the Company, or any such director, officer or controlling person may become subject under the 1933 Act, the Exchange Act or other federal or state statutory law or regulation, at common law or otherwise (including in settlement of any litigation, if such settlement is effected with the written consent of such Underwriter), insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon any untrue or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact , in the case of the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement thereto, required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading and, in the case of any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, in each case to the extent, but only to the extent, that such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission was made in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto in reliance upon and in conformity with Section 3 of this Agreement or any other written information furnished to the Company by such Underwriter through the Representative specifically for use in the preparation thereof; and will reimburse any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by the Company, or any such director, officer or controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action. In addition to their other obligations under this Section 11(b), the Underwriters agree that, as an interim measure during the pendency of any claim, action, investigation, inquiry or other proceeding arising out of or based upon any statement or omission, or any alleged statement or omission, described in this Section 11(b), they will reimburse the Company on a monthly basis for all reasonable legal and other expenses incurred in connection with investigating or defending any such claim, action, investigation, inquiry or other proceeding, notwithstanding the absence of a judicial determination as to the propriety and enforceability of the Underwriters' obligation to reimburse the Company for such expenses and the possibility that such payments might later be held to have been improper by a court of competent jurisdiction. This indemnity agreement will be in addition to any liability which such Underwriter may otherwise have.
     (c) Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under this Section 11 of notice of the commencement of any action, such indemnified party will, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against an indemnifying party under this Section 11, notify the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof; but the omission so to notify the indemnifying party will not relieve it from any liability which it may have to any indemnified party except to the extent that the indemnifying party was prejudiced by such failure to notify. In case any such action is brought against any indemnified party, and it notifies an indemnifying party of the commencement thereof, the indemnifying party will be entitled to participate in, and, to the extent that it may wish, jointly with all other indemnifying parties similarly notified, to assume the defense thereof, with counsel reasonably satisfactory to such indemnified party; provided, however, if the defendants in any such action include both the indemnified party and the indemnifying party and the indemnified party shall have reasonably concluded based on the advice of outside counsel that there may be legal defenses available to it and/or other indemnified parties which are different from or additional to those available to the indemnifying party, or the indemnified and indemnifying parties
 
may have conflicting interests which would make it inappropriate for the same counsel to represent both of them, the indemnified party or parties shall have the right to select separate counsel to assume such legal defense and otherwise to participate in the defense of such action on behalf of such indemnified party or parties. Upon receipt of notice from the indemnifying party to such indemnified party of its election so to assume the defense of such action and approval by the indemnified party of counsel, the indemnifying party will not be liable to such indemnified party under this Section 11 for any legal or other expenses subsequently incurred by such indemnified party in connection with the defense thereof unless (i) the indemnified party shall have employed such counsel in connection with the assumption of legal defense in accordance with the proviso to the next preceding sentence (it being understood, however, that the indemnifying party shall not be liable for the expenses of more than one separate counsel, approved by the Representative in the case of paragraph (a) representing all indemnified parties not having different or additional defenses or potential conflicting interest among themselves who are parties to such action), (ii) the indemnifying party shall not have employed counsel reasonably satisfactory to the indemnified party to represent the indemnified party within a reasonable time after notice of commencement of the action or (iii) the indemnifying party has authorized the employment of counsel for the indemnified party at the expense of the indemnifying party. No indemnifying party shall, without the prior written consent of the indemnified party, effect any settlement of any pending or threatened proceeding in respect of which any indemnified party is or could have been a party and indemnity could have been sought hereunder by such indemnified party, unless such settlement includes an unconditional release of such indemnified party from all liability arising out of such proceeding.
     (d) If the indemnification provided for in this Section 11 is unavailable to an indemnified party under paragraphs (a) or (b) hereof in respect of any losses, claims, damages or liabilities referred to therein, then each applicable indemnifying party, in lieu of indemnifying such indemnified party, shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (i) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company and the Underwriters from the offering of the Shares or (ii) if the allocation provided by clause (i) above is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause (i) above but also the relative fault of the Company and the Underwriters in connection with the statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, claims, damages or liabilities, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The respective relative benefits received by the Company and the Underwriters shall be deemed to be in the same proportion, in the case of the Company, as the total price paid to the Company for the Shares by the Underwriters (net of underwriting discount but before deducting expenses) bears to, and in the case of the Underwriters, as the underwriting discount received by them bears to, the total of such amounts paid to the Company and received by the Underwriters as underwriting discount, in each case as contemplated by the Prospectus. The relative fault of the Company and the Underwriters shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company or by the Underwriters and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission. The amount paid or payable by a party as a result of the losses, claims, damages and liabilities referred to above shall be deemed to include any legal or other fees or expenses reasonably incurred by such party in connection with investigating or defending any action or claim.
     The Company and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this Section 11(d) were determined by pro rata allocation or by any other method of allocation which does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to in the immediately preceding paragraph. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 11(d), no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total price at which the Shares underwritten by it and distributed to the public were offered to the public exceeds the amount of any damages which such Underwriter has otherwise been required to pay by reason of such untrue or alleged
 
untrue statement or omission or alleged omission. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the 1933 Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. The Underwriters' obligations to contribute pursuant to this Section 11(d) are several in proportion to their respective underwriting commitments and not joint.
     (e) In connection with the offer and sale of the Reserved Shares, the Company agrees to indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter and each person, if any, who controls any Underwriter within the meaning of the 1933 Act or the Exchange Act against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities, joint or several, to which such Underwriter or such controlling person may become subject under the 1933 Act, the Exchange Act or other federal or state statutory law or regulation, at common law or otherwise (including in settlement of any litigation if such settlement is effected with the written consent of the Company) (i) arising out of any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in any prospectus wrapper or other material prepared by or with the consent of the Company for distribution to Invitees in connection with the offering of the Reserved Shares or arising out of or based upon any omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; or (ii) arising out of or based upon the failure of any Invitee to pay for and accept delivery of Reserved Shares which have been orally confirmed for purchase by any Invitee by the end of the first business day after the date of this Agreement, other than losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or expenses relating thereto) that are finally judicially determined to have resulted from the bad faith, willful misconduct or gross negligence of any such Underwriter.
     (f) The provisions of this Section 11 shall survive any termination of this Agreement.
     It shall be a condition to the agreement and obligation of the Company to sell and deliver the Shares hereunder, and of each Underwriter to purchase the Shares hereunder, that, except as hereinafter in this paragraph provided, each of the Underwriters shall purchase and pay for all Shares agreed to be purchased by such Underwriter hereunder upon tender to the Representative of all such Shares in accordance with the terms hereof. If any Underwriter or Underwriters default in their obligations to purchase Shares hereunder on the First Closing Date and the aggregate number of Shares which such defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters agreed but failed to purchase does not exceed 10 percent of the total number of Shares which the Underwriters are obligated to purchase on the First Closing Date, the Representative may make arrangements satisfactory to the Company for the purchase of such Shares by other persons, including any of the Underwriters, but if no such arrangements are made by such date the nondefaulting Underwriters shall be obligated severally, in proportion to their respective commitments hereunder, to purchase the Shares which such defaulting Underwriters agreed but failed to purchase on such date. If any Underwriter or Underwriters so default and the aggregate number of Shares with respect to which such default or defaults occur is more than the above percentage and arrangements satisfactory to the Representative and the Company for the purchase of such Shares by other persons are not made within 36 hours after such default, this Agreement will terminate without liability on the part of any nondefaulting Underwriter or the Company, except for the expenses to be paid by the Company pursuant to Section 7 hereof and except to the extent provided in Section 11 hereof.
Section 12. Default of Underwriters.
     In the event that Shares to which a default relates are to be purchased by the nondefaulting Underwriters or by another party or parties, the Representative or the Company shall have the right to postpone the First Closing Date for not more than seven business days in order that the necessary changes in the Registration Statement, Prospectus and any other documents, as well as any other arrangements, may be effected. As used in this Agreement, the term "Underwriter" includes any
 
person substituted for an Underwriter under this Section. Nothing herein will relieve a defaulting Underwriter from liability for its default.
          This Agreement shall become effective immediately as to Sections 7, 9, 11 and 14 and as to all other provisions at 10:00 A.M., Chicago Time, on the day following the date upon which the Pricing Agreement is executed and delivered, unless such a day is a Saturday, Sunday or holiday (and in that event this Agreement shall become effective at such hour on the business day next succeeding such Saturday, Sunday or holiday); but this Agreement shall nevertheless become effective at such earlier time after the Pricing Agreement is executed and delivered as you may determine on and by notice to the Company or by release of any Shares for sale to the public. For the purposes of this Section, the Shares shall be deemed to have been so released upon the release for publication of any newspaper advertisement relating to the Shares or upon the release by you of written communications (i) advising Underwriters that the Shares are released for public offering, or (ii) offering the Shares for sale to securities dealers, whichever may occur first.
Section
13. Effective Date.
           Without limiting the right to terminate this Agreement pursuant to any other provision hereof:
Section
14. Termination.
     (a) This Agreement may be terminated by the Company by notice to you or by you by notice to the Company at any time prior to the time this Agreement shall become effective as to all its provisions, and any such termination shall be without liability on the part of the Company to any Underwriter (except for the expenses to be paid or reimbursed pursuant to Section 7 hereof and except to the extent provided in Section 11 hereof) or of any Underwriter to the Company.
     (b) This Agreement may also be terminated by you prior to the First Closing Date, and the option referred to in Section 4, if exercised, may be cancelled at any time prior to the Second Closing Date, if (i) trading in securities on the New York Stock Exchange or The Nasdaq Stock Market shall have been suspended or minimum prices shall have been established on such exchange or market, or (ii) a banking moratorium shall have been declared by Illinois, New York, or United States authorities, or (iii) there shall have been any material adverse change in financial markets or any material adverse change in political, economic or financial conditions which, in the opinion of the Representative, either renders it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the offering and sale of the Shares on the terms set forth in the Prospectus or materially and adversely affects the market for the Shares, or (iv) there shall have been an outbreak of major armed hostilities between the United States and any foreign power or terrorist organization which in the opinion of the Representative makes it impractical or inadvisable to offer or sell the Shares. Any termination pursuant to this paragraph (b) shall be without liability on the part of any Underwriter to the Company or on the part of the Company to any Underwriter (except for expenses to be paid or reimbursed pursuant to Section 7 hereof and except to the extent provided in Section 11 hereof).
           The respective indemnities, agreements, representations, warranties and other statements of the Company, of its officers and of the several Underwriters set forth in or made pursuant to this Agreement will remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation made by or on behalf of any Underwriter or the Company or any of its or their partners, principals, members, officers or directors or any controlling person, and will survive delivery of and payment for the Shares sold hereunder.
Section
15. Representations and Indemnities to Survive Delivery.
           All communications hereunder will be in writing and, if sent to the Underwriters will be mailed, delivered or telegraphed and confirmed to you c/o William Blair &
Section
16. Notices.
 
Company, L.L.C., 222 West Adams Street, Chicago, Illinois 60606, with a copy to Robert L. Verigan, c/o Sidley Austin LLP, One South Dearborn Street, Chicago, Illinois 60603; if sent to the Company will be mailed, delivered or telegraphed and confirmed to the Company at its corporate headquarters with a copy to Michael J. Silver, c/o Hogan & Hartson L.L.P., 111 South Calvert Street, Suite 1600, Baltimore, MD 21202.
     . The Company acknowledges and agrees that (a) the purchase and sale of the Shares pursuant to this Agreement, including the determination of the initial public offering price of the Shares and any related discounts and commissions, is an arm's-length commercial transaction between the Company, on the one hand, and the several Underwriters, on the other hand, (b) in connection with the offering of the Shares contemplated by this Agreement and the process leading to such transaction each Underwriter is and has been acting solely as a principal and is not the agent or fiduciary of the Company or its stockholders, creditors, employees or any other party, (c) no Underwriter has assumed or will assume an advisory or fiduciary responsibility in favor of the Company with respect to the offering of the Shares contemplated by this Agreement or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether such Underwriter has advised or is currently advising the Company on other matters) and no Underwriter has any obligation to the Company with respect to the offering of the Shares contemplated by this Agreement except the obligations expressly set forth in this Agreement, (d) the Underwriters and their respective affiliates may be engaged in a broad range of transactions that involve interests that differ from those of the Company and (e) the Underwriters have not provided any legal, accounting, regulatory or tax advice with respect to the offering of the Shares contemplated by this Agreement and the Company has consulted its own legal, accounting, regulatory and tax advisors to the extent it deemed appropriate.
Section
17. No Advisory or Fiduciary Relationship
     This Agreement and the Pricing Agreement will inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective successors, personal representatives and assigns, and to the benefit of the officers and directors and controlling persons referred to in Section 11, and no other person will have any right or obligation hereunder. The term "successors" shall not include any purchaser of the Shares as such from any of the Underwriters merely by reason of such purchase.
Section
18. Successors.
     You will act as Representative for the several Underwriters in connection with this financing, and any action under or in respect of this Agreement taken by you will be binding upon all the Underwriters.
Section
19. Representation of Underwriters.
     If any section, paragraph or provision of this Agreement is for any reason determined to be invalid or unenforceable, such determination shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other section, paragraph or provision hereof.
Section
20. Partial Unenforceability.
     This Agreement and the Pricing Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Illinois.
Section
21. Applicable Law.
 
     If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, kindly sign and return to us the enclosed duplicates hereof, whereupon it will become a binding agreement among the Company and the several Underwriters including you, all in accordance with its terms.
 
The foregoing Agreement is hereby confirmed and accepted as of the date first above written.
William Blair & Company, L.L.C.
Acting as Representative of the several Underwriters named in Schedule A.
By: William Blair & Company, L.L.C.
By:                Principal
/s/ Brandon Lower        
                    
 
 
 
Exhibit A
November 8, 2007
      As Representative of the Several       Underwriters c/o William Blair & Company, L.L.C. 222 West Adams Street Chicago, Illinois 60606
William Blair & Company, L.L.C.
Ladies and Gentlemen:
          Reference is made to the Underwriting Agreement dated November 8, 2007 (the ) relating to the sale by the Company and the purchase by the several Underwriters for whom William Blair & Company, L.L.C. is acting as representative (the ), of the above Shares. All terms herein shall have the definitions contained in the Underwriting Agreement except as otherwise defined herein.
"Underwriting Agreement"
"Representative"
          Pursuant to Section 4 of the Underwriting Agreement, the Company agrees with the Representative as follows:
          1. The initial public offering price per share for the Shares shall be $20.00.
          2. The purchase price per share for the Shares to be paid by the several Underwriters shall be $18.60, being an amount equal to the initial public offering price set forth above less $1.40 per share.
 
 
          If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, kindly sign and return to us the enclosed duplicates hereof, whereupon it will become a binding agreement among the Company and the several Underwriters, including you, all in accordance with its terms.
The foregoing Agreement is hereby confirmed and accepted as of the date first above written.
William Blair & Company, L.L.C.
Acting as Representative of the several Underwriters named in Schedule A to the Underwriting Agreement.
By: William Blair & Company, L.L.C.
By:                 Principal
/s/ Brandon Lower
                    
                    
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20071116140541.txt.gz
TIME:20071116140541
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
ection 2  Financial Information
S
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
 
On November 16, 2007, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2007.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call for 3:00 p.m. EST on November 16, 2007 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 

American Public Education, Inc.
Harry T. Wilkins, CPA
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
304.724.3722
Christopher L. Symanoskie
Director, Investor Relations
703.334.3880
 American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System, which operates through American Military University and American Public University  announced strong financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2007.
CHARLES TOWN, WV (November 16, 2007)
Third Quarter Highlights:
 
Wallace E. Boston, Jr., chief executive officer of American Public Education, Inc. stated, "Our third quarter results are a positive reflection of our academic quality, our focus on student outcomes, and our 2006 attainment of regional accreditation and participation in federal student aid." 
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the third quarter 2007 increased 73% to $17.6 million, compared to total revenues of $10.2 million in the third quarter 2006.  Income from continuing operations before interest income and income tax in the third quarter 2007 increased 137% to $3.6 million, compared to $1.5 million in the same period of 2006.  Stock based compensation expense reduced each periods operating income by $136,000 and $47,000, respectively. Net income for the third quarter 2007 increased 163% to $2.2 million or $0.18 per diluted share, which includes $113,000 or less than $0.01 per diluted share in after-tax stock-based compensation expense.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2007, total revenues were $47.9 million, an increase of 76% compared to total revenues of $27.1 million in the same period of 2006.  Income from continuing operations before interest income and income tax for the nine months ended September 30, 2007 increased 185% to $9.6 million, compared to $3.4 million in the same period of 2006.  Stock based compensation expense reduced each periods operating income by $754,000 and $239,000, respectively. Net income for the nine months ended September 30, 2007 increased 226% to $5.8 million or $0.46 per diluted share, which includes $606,000 or $0.05 per diluted share in after-tax stock-based compensation expense.
Total cash and cash equivalents at September 30, 2007 were $20.3 million with no long-term debt.  Cash from operations for the nine months was $14.5 million, compared to $5.9 million in the same period of 2006. Capital expenditures were $3.7 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2007, which compares to $3.8 million in capital expenditures in the same period of 2006. Depreciation and amortization was $2.0 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2007 and $1.2 million for the same period of 2006.
ended September 30, 2007
The Company completed its initial public offering of 5,390,625 shares of its common stock at $20.00 per share, before underwriting discounts and commissions.  The offering closed on November 14, 2007 and included the exercise in full by the underwriters of an option to purchase additional shares at the initial public offering price to cover over-allotments.  On November 8, 2007, the Company declared a special distribution of $7.63 per share, or $93,750,000 in the aggregate, to be paid to the shareholders of record immediately prior to the offering, payable upon the closing of the offering with offering proceeds.
Net Course Registrations and Student Enrollment:
For the three months ended September 30,
 
Note:  Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty.  Total student enrollment is the number of students who have completed at least one course in the last 12 months or are currently in the start of the second week of class for the most current semester.
Fourth Quarter 2007 Outlook:
 
The following statements are based on current expectations.  These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys third quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast at 3:00 p.m. eastern time today.  This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.
AmericanPublicEducation
.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call.  The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
About American Public Education, Inc.
 
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, comprises two universities  (AMU) and (APU). Nationally and regionally accredited, APUS serves over 25,000 part-time students who live and work in all 50 states and more than 130 countries; and offers 57 degree programs and 48 certificate programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
Forward Looking Statements
 
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect" "intend", "may", "should" "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements under the heading Fourth Quarter 2007 Outlook" above and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Prospectus that forms a part of the Registration Statement on Form S-1 (SEC File No. 333-145185) filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on November 9, 2007, for the Company's initial public offering. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
 
 
 
 
 

 
1 American Public Education Third Quarter 2007 Earnings Conference Call November 16, 2007
 
2 Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect" "intend", "may", "should" "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on the slide Fourth Quarter 2007 Outlook" and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Prospectus that forms a part of the Registration Statement on Form S-1 (SEC File No. 333-145185) filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on November 9, 2007, for the Company's initial public offering. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future. Safe Harbor Statement
 
3 PRIOR EXPERIENCE CFO, COO, or CEO, of: Meridian HealthCare   Manor HealthCare   NeighborCare Pharmacies   Sun Healthcare Group   Wallace E. Boston, Jr. President and Chief Executive Officer Member, Board of Trustees Member, Board of Directors Joined as Chief Financial Officer in 2002 to implement financial, operational and critical IT systems. Promoted to President and CEO in 2004. Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer PRIOR EXPERIENCE  Former CFO of Strayer Education, Inc.  Founding Partner of Wilkins, Little & Matthews, LLP  Director of Wooden & Benson  Senior Consultant with Deloitte Touche  Board Member of Concorde Career Colleges, Inc. Joined as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer in 2007, after serving on the Board of Trustees and Board of Directors for three years. Todays Speakers
 
4   Strong Growth in Registrations(1)   Total Student Enrollment(2) Increases to 26,900, an increase of 74%   Accreditation Progress - Secured approval for Education and Technology programs from NCA and DETC 2006 2007 % Change Net Course Registrations from New Students 4,160 6,660 60% Total Net Course Registrations 14,790 25,290 71% Three Months Ended September 30, Third Quarter 2007 Highlights 2006 2007 % Change Net Course Registrations from New Students 9,570 17,990 88% Total Net Course Registrations 37,750 67,010 78% Nine Months Ended September 30, (1) Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty. (2) Total student enrollment is the number of students who have completed at least one course in the last 12 months or are currently in the start of the second week of class for the most current semester.
 
5   Six New Articulation Agreements, Including:   Community College of The Air Force (UA-ABC Program)   Florida Community College at Jacksonville   Company Continues to Deepen Military Market Relationships   Signed agreements for a permanent presence on three additional military bases.   Lieutenant General Julius Becton, Jr. Joins Board of Trustees   Company Completes Initial Public Offering Other Recent Developments
 
6 Strong 3Q2007 Financial Results ($ in thousands, except per share data) 137% $3,578 $1,508 Income from Continuing Operations Before Interest Income and Income Tax 157% $0.18 $0.07 Diluted EPS 163% $2,222 $845 Net Income 73% $17,612 $10,118 Revenues 71% 25,290 14,791 Total Net Course Registrations % Growth 2007 2006 Three Months Ended Sept 30,
 
7 Strong Balance Sheet with No Debt ($ in millions) $39.2 $28.8 Total Liabilities and Equity 6.4 7.3 Other Current Assets 24.2 16.8 Total Stockholders Equity 15.0 11.9 Liabilities $39.2 $28.8 Total Assets 12.5 9.8 Non-Current Assets $20.3 $11.7 Cash and Cash Equivalents As of Sept 30 2007 As of Dec 31 2006
 
8 $47.9 $40.0 $27.1 $28.2 $10.7 $17.8 $23.1 $0.0 $10.0 $20.0 $30.0 $40.0 $50.0 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 YTD 9/06 YTD 9/07 76% Growth Revenues CAGR 39% ($ in millions) Outstanding Track Record of Growth
 
9 Fourth Quarter 2007 Net Course Registrations from New Students 6,800+, an increase of 41%+ Total Net Course Registrations 27,000+, an increase of 58%+ Total Revenue $19.0 to $20.5 million Adjusted Income from Continuing Operations Before Interest Income and Income Tax (1) $3.4 to $4.2 million Adjusted Net Income (1) $2.3 to $2.7 million (1) These adjusted presentations are non-GAAP forecasts and exclude stock based compensation expense from the comparable GAAP measure due to limitations in the ability to forecast this expense. Fourth Quarter 2007 Outlook The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.   Full-Year 2007 net income is expected to be between $8.6 and $9.0 million, excluding stock based compensation expense.   The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding in the fourth quarter 2007 will be impacted by the initial public offering that closed on November 14, 2007.
 
10 OUTLOOK STATEMENTS: Quarterly Annual Net Course Registrations from New Students (Range) X X Total Net Course Registrations (Range) X X Total Revenue ($ Range) X X Income from Continuing Operations Before Interest Income and Income Tax ($ Range) X X Net Income ($ Range) X X Depreciation and Amortization ($ Range) X CAPEX ($ Range) X DISCLOSED METRICS: Quarterly Annual Net Course Registrations from New Students X Total Net Course Registrations X Total Student Enrollment X Graduation Totals X Students by School, Degree Level, Civilian/Military (% of Total) X Applications by Source (Referrals, Internet, Print etc) (% of Total) X Revenue by Financing Source (Title IV, TA and Other) (% of Total) X APEI Outlook/Metrics
 
11   Strong top-line growth with good visibility   Tuition is paid in advance; attractive working capital dynamics   High referral rates drive low student acquisition costs   Limited brick and mortar costs   Variable cost adjunct faculty model   Technology platform drives potential for scalability and long-term margin expansion Investment Highlights
 
12 Proprietary - Not for duplication


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20080125082802.txt.gz
TIME:20080125082802
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
January 25, 2008
(Date of earliest event reported)
American Public Education, Inc.
(Exact Name of Registrant as Specified in its Charter)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On January 25, 2008, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release announcing an updated outlook for the quarter ended December 31, 2007 based on preliminary actual results. The Company expects to announce definitive fourth quarter earnings information on March 11, 2008. In addition, the Company introduced its first quarter 2008 outlook.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Updates Fourth Quarter 2007 Outlook; Company Introduces First Quarter 2008 Outlook
CHARLES TOWN, W.Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ:APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System, which operates through American Military University and American Public University  announces an updated outlook for the Fourth Quarter 2007 based on preliminary actual results. The Company expects to announce definitive fourth quarter earnings information on March 11, 2008. In addition, the Company introduces its First Quarter 2008 Outlook.
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
Fourth Quarter 2007 Outlook Update:
The Company anticipates that it will report net course registrations from new students of approximately 6,800 and total net course registrations of approximately 27,800 in the fourth quarter 2007; resulting in anticipated net course registrations from new students of approximately 16,000 and total net course registrations of approximately 94,500 for the year ended December 31, 2007.
For the fourth quarter 2007, the Company expects to report total revenue between $20.8 million and $21.1 million; resulting in expected total revenue for the year ended December 31, 2007 between $68.7 million and $69.0 million.
The Company expects to report net income, including stock-based compensation expense, of between $2.7 million and $3.0 million in the fourth quarter 2007. The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding in the fourth quarter is expected to have been approximately 15.9 million, resulting in fully diluted earnings per share between $0.17 and $0.19. The Company expects to report net income between $8.5 and $8.8 million for the year ended December 31, 2007. The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding for the year ended December 31, 2007 is expected to have been approximately 13.6 million.
First Quarter 2008 Outlook:
The Company anticipates net course registrations from new students of 7,800 or more and total net course registrations of 31,500 or more in the first quarter 2008.
For the first quarter 2008, the Company expects total revenue to be between $21.5 and $22.1 million.
The Company estimates that net income, including stock-based compensation expense, will be between $2.1 million and $2.6 million in the first quarter 2008. The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding in the first quarter is expected to be between 18.7 and 19.0 million.
American Public Education plans to introduce its Full Year 2008 Outlook and additional details regarding its First Quarter 2008 Outlook in its upcoming fourth quarter 2007 earnings announcement currently scheduled for release March 11, 2008.
About American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, comprises two universities  (AMU) and (APU). Regionally and nationally accredited, APUS serves more than 30,000 students who live and work in all 50 states and more than 130 countries; and offers 57 degree programs and 48 certificate programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect" "intend", "may", "should" "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements under the headings Fourth Quarter 2007 Outlook Update and First Quarter 2008 Outlook above and statements regarding expectations of meeting or exceeding previously provided Fourth Quarter 2007 outlook. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Prospectus that forms a part of the Registration Statement on Form S-1 (SEC File No. 333-145185) filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on November 9, 2007, for the Company's initial public offering. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304-724-3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Director, Investor Relations 703-334-3880
American Public Education, Inc.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20080311160157.txt.gz
TIME:20080311160157
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
March 11, 2008
(Date of earliest event reported)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On March 11, 2008, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2007. A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference. American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 5:00 p.m. EST on March 11, 2008 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
2
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
3
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports Fourth Quarter and Year End 2007 Results
Net Course Registrations Increase 63% in Fourth Quarter 2007
CHARLES TOWN, W.Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ:APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System, which operates through American Military University and American Public University  announced strong financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2007.
Recent Highlights:
American Public Education reports net course registrations of approximately 27,830 in the fourth quarter 2007, a year-over-year increase of 63%.
Net course registrations from new students in the fourth quarter 2007 increased to approximately 6,890, an increase of 42% over the same period of 2006.
As of December 31, 2007, a total of approximately 30,130 students were enrolled in American Public University System.
Fourth quarter 2007 revenues increased 65% to $21.2 million, compared to $12.9 million in the fourth quarter 2006.
Income from continuing operations before interest income and income taxes increased to $5.1 million in the fourth quarter of 2007, compared to a loss of $413,000 in the same period 2006. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each periods operating income by $279,000 and $45,000, respectively.
Net income for the fourth quarter 2007 increased to $3.0 million or $0.19 per diluted share, which includes $229,000 or $0.01 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax.
American Public University System received provisional acceptance into the Navy College Program Distance Learning Partnership (NCPDLP).
The West Virginia Board of Education (WVBE) approved American Public University Systems new Master of Education (M.Ed.) in Administration & Supervision. This approval will allow graduates to be licensed principals and administrators in West Virginia and streamlines the process to be a licensed principal nationwide due to West Virginias reciprocity with nearly all other U.S. States.
American Public University System expanded its relationship with Ucompass.com, the universitys e-learning provider. The new agreement includes a perpetual license of Educator software and long-term support services in addition to increased collaboration on the development of next generation e-learning technologies.
TM
Wallace E. Boston, Jr., Chief Executive Officer of American Public Education, Inc. stated, "Our focus on academic quality and expanding access to affordable higher education led to a year of great achievement with record student enrollment, strong financial performance and a successful initial public offering. This focus on affordability is especially relevant in todays current economic and lending environment. Our tuition is set at levels that can be fully financed through traditional federal student loans.
Recent developments, such as our provisional acceptance into the Navy College Program Distance Learning Partnership and the launch of several new degree programs, illustrate our commitment to serving the needs of our students. These exciting events, combined with the execution of our growth strategy and focus on our social mission, position us for continued success in 2008, added Mr. Boston.
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the fourth quarter 2007 increased 65% to $21.2 million, compared to total revenues of $12.9 million in the fourth quarter 2006. Income from continuing operations before interest income and income tax in the fourth quarter 2007 increased to $5.1 million, compared to a loss of $413,000 in the same period of 2006. Fourth quarter 2006 operating income was reduced by a $3.1 million write-off of software development costs. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each periods operating income by $279,000 in 2007 and $45,000 in 2006. Net income for the fourth quarter 2007 increased to $3.0 million or $0.19 per diluted share, which includes $229,000 or $0.01 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $20,000 or less than $0.01 per diluted share for the fourth quarter 2006, including $41,000 or less than $0.01 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax.
For the twelve months ended December 31, 2007, total revenues were $69.1 million, an increase of 73% compared to total revenues of $40.0 million in the same period of 2006. Income from continuing operations before interest income and income tax for the twelve months ended December 31, 2007 increased to $14.7 million, compared to $2.9 million in the same period of 2006. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each periods operating income by $1.0 million and $284,000, respectively. Net income for the twelve months ended December 31, 2007 increased to $8.8 million or $0.64 per diluted share, which includes $835,000 or $0.06 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $1.8 million or $0.15 per diluted share for the full year 2006, including $227,000 or $0.02 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax.
Total cash and cash equivalents at December 31, 2007 were $27.0 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the twelve months ended December 31, 2007 was $17.5 million, compared to $8.9 million in the same period of 2006. Capital expenditures were $6.8 million for the twelve months ended December 31, 2007, which compares to $4.5 million in capital expenditures in the same period of 2006. Depreciation and amortization was $2.8 million for the twelve months ended December 31, 2007 and $2.0 million for the same period of 2006.
The Company completed a secondary offering of 3,744,500 shares of its common stock at $35.50 per share, before underwriting discounts and commissions, in February 2008. A 30-day option was exercised by the underwriters to sell up to an additional 500,175 shares at the public offering price to cover over-allotments. The secondary offering closed on February 19, 2008 and the exercise of the over-allotment option closed on February 28, 2008. The Company sold a total of 25,000 shares in the offering and the balance was sold by existing stockholders.
Note: Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty. Total student enrollment is the number of students who have completed at least one course in the last 12 months or are currently in the start of the second week of class for the most current semester.
Full Year 2008 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
The Company anticipates net course registrations from new students of approximately 33,500 and total net course registrations of 137,000 or more in the twelve month period ending December 31, 2008.
The Company expects full year 2008 revenue to be between $100 and $103 million.
Income from continuing operations before interest income and income taxes is expected to be between $19.1 million and $20.1 million in the full year 2008, including stock-based compensation expense of between $1.5 million and $1.7 million.
The Company estimates that full year 2008 net income, including stock-based compensation expense, will be between $11.9 million and $12.5 million or between $0.63 and $0.66 per diluted share. The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding is expected to be approximately 19.0 million in the twelve month period ending December 31, 2008.
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys fourth quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast at 5:00 p.m. Eastern time today. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, www.AmericanPublicEducation.com.
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
About American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ:APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, comprises two universities  (AMU) and (APU). Regionally and nationally accredited, APUS serves more than 30,000 part-time students who live and work in all 50 states and more than 130 countries; and offers 57 degree programs and 48 certificate programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect" "intend", "may", "should" "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements under the heading Full-Year 2008 Outlook" above and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Prospectus dated February 13, 2008 as filed with the SEC for the Company's follow-on public offering. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304-724-3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Director, Investor Relations 703-334-3880
American Public Education, Inc.

Exhibit 99.2
Proprietary - Not for duplication apei AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION, INC. Fourth Quarter 2007 Earnings Conference Call March 11, 2008
Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect" "intend", "may", "should" "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on the slide "Fourth Quarter 2007 Outlook" and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Prospectus dated February 13, 2007 as filed with the SEC for the Company's follow-on public offering. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future. 2 Safe Harbor Statement
2006 2007 % Change Net Course Registrations from New Students 4,840 6,890 42% Net Course Registrations 17,070 27,830 63% Three Months Ended December 31, Growth in Registrations(1) 2006 2007 % Change Net Course Registrations from New Students 14,410 24,700 71% Net Course Registrations 54,830 94,850 73% Graduations 1,100 1,580 44% Twelve Months Ended December 31, (1) Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty. 3
Received provisional acceptance into the Navy College Program Distance Learning Partnership (NCPDLP) - Broadens access to Navy market - Provides visibility on Navy education websites The West Virginia Board of Education (WVBE) approved the new Master of Education (M.Ed.) in Administration and Supervision - Reciprocity with nearly all other U.S. States - Effectively simplifies and streamlines the process to be a licensed principal Expanded relationship with Ucompass.com - Includes perpetual license and long-term support for EducatorTM software - Collaboration on next generation e-learning technologies - Provides affordable access to e-learning platform and expanded services Completed Secondary Offering Recent Developments 4
2007 Student Composition Students by School: Students by Degree Level: Students by Status: Graduate 26% Undergraduate 74% Military 67% Civilian 18% Military Affiliated 15% Public Safety, National and Homeland Security 53% Arts &Science 21% Business Mgmt 19% Professional Studies 7%
2007 Marketing and Funding Sources Applications by Marketing Source: Revenue by Funding Source: Cash & Other Sources 22% TA/VA 66% Referrals 54% Internet 33% Print 7% Other 6% Private Loans 1% Title IV 11% 6
Title IV Loan Limits vs. APUS Tuition: APUS Tuition Below Title IV Maximum Loan Limits Sources: U.S. Department of Education, Financial Aid Resource Publication, 2007-2008. Title IV Limit: Represents the maximum annual Title IV loan limit for independent undergraduate student. APUS Tuition: Assumes full-time undergraduate course load of 30 credit hours per year. $12,000 $10,000 $8,000 $6,000 $4,000 $2,000 $0 First Year Second Year Third and beyond (each year) Title IV Limit APUS Tuition $7,500 $7,500 $7,500 $7,500 $8,500 $10,500 7
4Q2007 Financial Results ($ in thousands, except per share data and registrations) $(413) $5,126 >100% Income (loss) from Continuing Operations Before Interest Income and Income Tax Diluted EPS $0.00 $0.19 >100% Net Income $20 $2,958 >100% Revenues $12,896 $21,221 65% Net Course Registrations 17,070 27,830 63% 2006(1)(2) 2007(2) % Growth Three Months Ended Dec 31, (1) Includes a $3.1 million write-off of software development costs in 2006. (2) Includes stock-based compensation expense of $45,000 in 2006 and $279,000 in 2007. 8
Track Record of Growth $0 $10 $20 $30 $40 $50 $60 $70 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 Revenues CAGR 45% ($ in millions) 9$10.7 $17.8 $23.1 9 $40.0 $69.1 9 $40.0 $69.1 $28.2
Operating Income Growth $14.7 $6.1(1) $1.8 $3.6 $2.2 $0 $3 $5 $8 $10 $13 $15 2003 2004 2005 2006(1) 2007 ($ in millions) (1) Excludes a $3.1 million write-off of software development costs. (1) (1) CAGR 69% 10 Income from continuing operations before interest income and income tax
EBITDA from continuing operations* Growth in EBITDA ($ in millions) (1) Excludes a $3.1 million write-off of software development costs. (1) (1) CAGR 70% EBITDA is a non-GAAP financial measure. Investors are encouraged to review the reconciliation of the non-GAAP pro forma financial measures to their most directly comparable GAAP financial measure. See "Regulation G" reconciliation at the end of this presentation. $17.5 $8.0 $2.1 $4.3 $3.5 $0 $5 $10 $15 $20 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 11
1 Full Year 2008 %Growth Net Course Registrations from New Students 33,500+ 36%+ Net Course Registrations 137,000+ 44%+ Total Revenue $100 to $103 million 45%-49% Income from Continuing Operations Before Interest Income and Income Tax (1) $19.1 to $20.1 million 30%-37% Net Income $11.9 to $12.5 million 35%-42% EPS  Diluted $0.63 to $0.66 Depreciation and Amortization Expense $4.1 to $4.3 million 46%-53% Capital Expenditures $6.8 to $7.2 million 0%-5% (1) Includes stock-based compensation expense of between $1.5 million and $1.7 million. Full Year 2008 Outlook The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
Enhanced opportunities with the Navy New IT and Education degrees recently launched New degrees in development No expected impact from the "lending crisis" Affordability continues to provide advantages Closing Remarks  APEI Positioned for Strong Growth in 2008
Regulation G  Reconciliation of GAAP to Proforma ($ in millions) 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 Income (loss) from continuing operations before Interest income and income taxes $1.9 $3.6 $2.2 $2.9 $14.7 Adjustments: Add: Depreciation and amortization $0.2 $0.7 $1.3 $2.0 $2.8 Add: Write-off of software development project - - - $3.1 - EBITDA from continuing operations $2.1 $4.3 $3.5 $8.0 $17.5 These pro forma financial measures are not prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). Non-GAAP pro forma financial measures should not be considered as a substitute for, or superior to, measures of financial performance prepared in accordance with GAAP. The Companys management refers to these non-GAAP pro forma financial measures in making operational decisions because they provide meaningful supplemental information regarding the Companys operational performance and facilitate managements internal comparisons to the Companys historical operating results. In addition, the Company has historically reported financial measures to investors and believes that the inclusion of comparative numbers provides consistency in its financial reporting. 14
Proprietary - Not for duplication www.AmericanPublicEducation.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20080312120759.txt.gz
TIME:20080312120759
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
March 12, 2008
(Date of earliest event reported)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On March 12, 2008, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2007. The press release corrected and replaced a press release issued on March 11, 2008, for purposes of revising a line item in the accompanying Consolidated Statements of Income table to read "Loss from discontinued operations, net of income tax benefit" instead of "Loss from discontinued operations, net of income tax benefit of $336 and $314 in 2006 and 2007, respectively." A copy of American Public Educations press release dated March 12, 2008, is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
2
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
3
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
CORRECTING and REPLACING
American Public Education Reports Fourth Quarter and Year End 2007 Results
Net Course Registrations Increase 63% in Fourth Quarter 2007
CHARLES TOWN, W.Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--InConsolidated Statements of Income tables of release dated March 11, 2008, should read: Loss from discontinued operations, net of income tax benefit (sted Loss from discontinued operations, net of income tax benefit of $336 and $314 in 2006 and 2007, respectively).
The correctedrelease reads:
AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION REPORTS FOURTH QUARTER AND YEAR END 2007 RESULTS
Net Course Registrations Increase 63% in Fourth Quarter 2007
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ:APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System, which operates through American Military University and American Public University  announced strong financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2007.
Recent Highlights:
American Public Education reports net course registrations of approximately 27,830 in the fourth quarter 2007, a year-over-year increase of 63%.
Net course registrations from new students in the fourth quarter 2007 increased to approximately 6,890, an increase of 42% over the same period of 2006.
As of December 31, 2007, a total of approximately 30,130 students were enrolled in American Public University System.
Fourth quarter 2007 revenues increased 65% to $21.2 million, compared to $12.9 million in the fourth quarter 2006.
Income from continuing operations before interest income and income taxes increased to $5.1 million in the fourth quarter of 2007, compared to a loss of $413,000 in the same period 2006. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each periods operating income by $279,000 and $45,000, respectively.
Net income for the fourth quarter 2007 increased to $3.0 million or $0.19 per diluted share, which includes $229,000 or $0.01 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax.
American Public University System received provisional acceptance into the Navy College Program Distance Learning Partnership (NCPDLP).
The West Virginia Board of Education (WVBE) approved American Public University Systems new Master of Education (M.Ed.) in Administration & Supervision. This approval will allow graduates to be licensed principals and administrators in West Virginia and streamlines the process to be a licensed principal nationwide due to West Virginias reciprocity with nearly all other U.S. States.
American Public University System expanded its relationship with Ucompass.com, the universitys e-learning provider. The new agreement includes a perpetual license of Educator software and long-term support services in addition to increased collaboration on the development of next generation e-learning technologies.
TM
Wallace E. Boston, Jr., Chief Executive Officer of American Public Education, Inc. stated, "Our focus on academic quality and expanding access to affordable higher education led to a year of great achievement with record student enrollment, strong financial performance and a successful initial public offering. This focus on affordability is especially relevant in todays current economic and lending environment. Our tuition is set at levels that can be fully financed through traditional federal student loans.
Recent developments, such as our provisional acceptance into the Navy College Program Distance Learning Partnership and the launch of several new degree programs, illustrate our commitment to serving the needs of our students. These exciting events, combined with the execution of our growth strategy and focus on our social mission, position us for continued success in 2008, added Mr. Boston.
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the fourth quarter 2007 increased 65% to $21.2 million, compared to total revenues of $12.9 million in the fourth quarter 2006. Income from continuing operations before interest income and income tax in the fourth quarter 2007 increased to $5.1 million, compared to a loss of $413,000 in the same period of 2006. Fourth quarter 2006 operating income was reduced by a $3.1 million write-off of software development costs. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each periods operating income by $279,000 in 2007 and $45,000 in 2006. Net income for the fourth quarter 2007 increased to $3.0 million or $0.19 per diluted share, which includes $229,000 or $0.01 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $20,000 or less than $0.01 per diluted share for the fourth quarter 2006, including $41,000 or less than $0.01 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax.
For the twelve months ended December 31, 2007, total revenues were $69.1 million, an increase of 73% compared to total revenues of $40.0 million in the same period of 2006. Income from continuing operations before interest income and income tax for the twelve months ended December 31, 2007 increased to $14.7 million, compared to $2.9 million in the same period of 2006. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each periods operating income by $1.0 million and $284,000, respectively. Net income for the twelve months ended December 31, 2007 increased to $8.8 million or $0.64 per diluted share, which includes $835,000 or $0.06 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $1.8 million or $0.15 per diluted share for the full year 2006, including $227,000 or $0.02 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax.
Total cash and cash equivalents at December 31, 2007 were $27.0 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the twelve months ended December 31, 2007 was $17.5 million, compared to $8.9 million in the same period of 2006. Capital expenditures were $6.8 million for the twelve months ended December 31, 2007, which compares to $4.5 million in capital expenditures in the same period of 2006. Depreciation and amortization was $2.8 million for the twelve months ended December 31, 2007 and $2.0 million for the same period of 2006.
The Company completed a secondary offering of 3,744,500 shares of its common stock at $35.50 per share, before underwriting discounts and commissions, in February 2008. A 30-day option was exercised by the underwriters to sell up to an additional 500,175 shares at the public offering price to cover over-allotments. The secondary offering closed on February 19, 2008 and the exercise of the over-allotment option closed on February 28, 2008. The Company sold a total of 25,000 shares in the offering and the balance was sold by existing stockholders.
Note: Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty. Total student enrollment is the number of students who have completed at least one course in the last 12 months or are currently in the start of the second week of class for the most current semester.
Full Year 2008 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
The Company anticipates net course registrations from new students of approximately 33,500 and total net course registrations of 137,000 or more in the twelve month period ending December 31, 2008.
The Company expects full year 2008 revenue to be between $100 and $103 million.
Income from continuing operations before interest income and income taxes is expected to be between $19.1 million and $20.1 million in the full year 2008, including stock-based compensation expense of between $1.5 million and $1.7 million.
The Company estimates that full year 2008 net income, including stock-based compensation expense, will be between $11.9 million and $12.5 million or between $0.63 and $0.66 per diluted share. The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding is expected to be approximately 19.0 million in the twelve month period ending December 31, 2008.
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys fourth quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast at 5:00 p.m. Eastern time today. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, www.AmericanPublicEducation.com.
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
About American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ:APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, comprises two universities  (AMU) and (APU). Regionally and nationally accredited, APUS serves more than 30,000 part-time students who live and work in all 50 states and more than 130 countries; and offers 57 degree programs and 48 certificate programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect" "intend", "may", "should" "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements under the heading Full-Year 2008 Outlook" above and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Prospectus dated February 13, 2008 as filed with the SEC for the Company's follow-on public offering. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304-724-3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Director, Investor Relations 703-334-3880
American Public Education, Inc.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20080502073527.txt.gz
TIME:20080502073527
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
May 2, 2008
(Date of earliest event reported)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On May 2, 2008, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2008. A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference. American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 8:30 a.m. EDT on May 2, 2008 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)       Exhibits
            99.1       American Public Education, Inc. press release dated May 2, 2008, reporting financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2008.
            99.2       American Public Education, Inc. slides for May 2, 2008 conference call and webcast for financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2008.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports First Quarter 2008 Results
Revenues Increase 65% in First Quarter 2008 Compared to the Prior Year Period
CHARLES TOWN, W.Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ:APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System, which operates through American Military University and American Public University  announced strong financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2008.
Recent Highlights:
American Public Education reported first quarter 2008 revenues increased 65% to $23.2 million, compared to $14.1 million in the first quarter of 2007.
The Company announced net course registrations of approximately 33,100 in the first quarter of 2008, a year-over-year increase of 59%.
Net course registrations from new students in the first quarter of 2008 increased to approximately 7,500, an increase of 34% over the same period of 2007.
As of March 31, 2008, a total of approximately 33,000 students were enrolled in American Public University System.
The Company reported net course registrations from students using federal financial aid under Title IV programs increased 166% to approximately 4,000 in the first quarter of 2008, compared to the same period of 2007. Approximately, 12% of net course registrations were from Title IV students in the first quarter of 2008.
Income from continuing operations before interest income and income tax in the first quarter of 2008 increased to $5.5 million, compared to $2.7 million in the same period of 2007. Operating margin in the first quarter of 2008 increased to 23.5%, compared to 19.1% in the first quarter of 2007.
Net income for the first quarter of 2008 increased to $3.4 million or $0.18 per diluted share, compared to $1.5 million or $0.13 per diluted share in the same period of 2007. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the first quarter of 2008 and 2007 were approximately 18.8 million and 11.9 million, respectively.
American Public Education increased its full year 2008 earnings outlook to between $0.67 and $0.72 per diluted share.
American Military University (AMU) announced the signing of a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) with the U.S. Navy as the final step to full acceptance into the Navy College Program Distance Learning Partnership (NCPDLP). The agreement allows AMU to join a select number of schools offering degree programs in support of the Servicemembers Opportunity Colleges (SOC) Degree Network System for the Marine Corps (SOCMAR), the Coast Guard (SOCCOAST) and the Navy (SOCNAV).
Wallace E. Boston, Jr., Chief Executive Officer of American Public Education, Inc. stated, Our first quarter performance gives us the confidence to increase our 2008 earnings per share outlook and illustrates our ability to generate strong growth. Our quality, unique degrees and affordability are attractive to students who view higher education as the best means to career advancement and job security.
Our continued strong performance is further bolstered by our high referral rates, improved student retention, and by the fact that we are seeing an increasing percentage of returning disenrolled students  students who re-register for class after leaving school for 12 months or more, added Mr. Boston.
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the first quarter of 2008 increased 65% to $23.2 million, compared to total revenues of $14.1 million in the first quarter of 2007. Income from continuing operations before interest income and income tax in the first quarter of 2008 increased to $5.5 million, compared to $2.7 million in the same period of 2007. Operating margin in the first quarter of 2008 increased to 23.5%, compared to 19.1% in the first quarter of 2007. Stock-based compensation expense reduced operating income by $377,000 in the first quarter of 2008 and $502,000 in the first quarter of 2007.
Net income for the first quarter of 2008 increased to $3.4 million or $0.18 per diluted share, which includes $249,000 or $0.01 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $1.5 million or $0.13 per diluted share for the first quarter of 2007, including $367,000 or $0.03 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the first quarter of 2008 and 2007 were approximately 18.8 million and 11.9 million, respectively.
Total cash and cash equivalents at March 31, 2008 were $31.8 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the three months ended March 31, 2008 was $7.0 million, compared to $4.5 million in the same period of 2007. Capital expenditures were $2.2 million for the three months ended March 31, 2008, which compares to $0.8 million in capital expenditures in the same period of 2007. Depreciation and amortization was $0.9 million for the three months ended March 31, 2008 and $0.6 million for the same period of 2007.
Note: Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty. Total student enrollment is the number of students who have completed at least one course in the last 12 months or are in the start of the second week of class for the most current semester.
Second Quarter 2008 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
The Company expects net course registrations from new students of approximately 7,600 and net course registrations of approximately 32,000 in the quarter ending June 30, 2008.
The Companys second quarter 2008 revenue is expected to be between $23.8 million and $24.5 million.
The Company estimates that second quarter 2008 net income, including stock-based compensation expense, will be between $2.6 million and $2.9 million or between $0.14 and $0.15 per diluted share. The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding is expected to be between 18.8 and 18.9 million shares in the three month period ending June 30, 2008.
Full Year 2008 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
The Company anticipates net course registrations from new students of approximately 33,500 and total net course registrations of 139,000 or more in the twelve month period ending December 31, 2008.
The Company expects full year 2008 revenues to be between $102 million and $104 million.
The Company estimates that full year 2008 net income, including stock-based compensation expense, will be between $12.8 million and $13.6 million or between $0.67 and $0.72 per diluted share. The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding is expected to be between 18.9 and 19.1 million shares in the twelve month period ending December 31, 2008.
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys first quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast at 8:30 a.m. Eastern time today. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
About American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ:APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, comprises two universities  (AMU) and (APU). Regionally and nationally accredited, APUS serves more than 33,000 part-time students who live and work in all 50 states and more than 130 countries; and offers 57 degree programs and 48 certificate programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements under the heading Full Year 2008 Outlook" and Second Quarter 2008 Outlook above and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304-724-3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Director, Investor Relations 703-334-3880
American Public Education, Inc.

Exhibit 99.2
1 Proprietary - Not for duplication First Quarter 2008 Earnings Conference Call May 2, 2008
2 Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect, "intend", "may", "should, "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on the slides Second Quarter 2008 Outlook and Increased Full Year 2008 Outlook and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future. Safe Harbor Statement
3 Company reported first quarter 2008 earnings of $0.18 per diluted share Operating margins increased to 23.5% in first quarter of 2008, compared to 19.1% in first quarter of 2007 Full Year 2008 Earnings Outlook increased AMU signed Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) with the U.S. Navy finalizing acceptance into the Navy College Program Distance Learning Partnership (NCPDLP) Recent Highlights
4 1Q2008 Financial Results ($ in thousands, except per share data and registrations) Includes pretax stock-based compensation expense of $377,000 in 2008 and $502,000 in 2007. Includes after-tax stock-based compensation expense  of $249,000 or $0.01 per diluted share in 2008 and $375,000 or $0.03 per diluted share in 2007.
5 1Q2008 Operating Margin Improvement
6 2nd Quarter 2008 % Growth Net Course Registrations approx. 32,000 53% Net Course Registrations from New Students approx. 7,600 38% Total Revenue $23.8 to $24.5 million 46%-50% Net Income (1) $2.6 to $2.9 million 30%-45% EPS  Diluted (1) $0.14 to $0.15 (1) Includes stock-based compensation expense. Second Quarter 2008 Outlook The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
7 Prior FY 2008 Updated FY 2008 Net Course Registrations 137,000+ 139,000+ Net Course Registrations from New Students 33,500+ 33,500+ Total Revenue $100 to $103 million $102 to $104 million Net Income (1) $11.9 to $12.5 million $12.8 to $13.6 million EPS  Diluted (1) $0.63 to $0.66 $0.67 to $0.72 Depreciation and Amortization Expense $4.1 to $4.3 million $4.1 to $4.3 million Capital Expenditures $6.8 to $7.2 million $7.0 to $7.4 million (1) Includes stock-based compensation expense of between $1.5 million and $1.7 million. Increased Full Year 2008 Outlook The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
8 Closing Remarks Positioned for Strong Growth in 2008 and Beyond Expanding in civilian markets Title IV registrations increased 166% to 4,000 in 1Q2008, compared to 1Q2007 Continued success in military market AMU signed Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) with Navy AMU signed MOU with Marine Corps Chemical Biological Incident Response Force New programs and market segments Master Degrees in Education Associate Degrees PhD Programs
9 Proprietary - Not for duplication www.AmericanPublicEducation.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20080617171046.txt.gz
TIME:20080617171046
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Date of report
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
(Date of earliest event reported)  
June 17, 2008
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 7  Regulation FD
Item 7.01     Regulation FD Disclosure.
American Public Education, Inc. is making the presentation attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated herein by reference at the William Blair 28 Annual Growth Stock Conference on June 17, 2008.
th
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
2
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
William Blair 28th Annual Growth Stock Conference June 17, 2008 AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION, INC.
Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect, "intend", "may", "should, "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on the slides Second Quarter 2008 Outlook and Increased Full Year 2008 Outlook and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.   2  Safe Harbor Statement
High Demand for Online Education in Large Military Market  2.1 million active duty and reserve members 300,000 new service members enter each year VA and DoD expenditures for postsecondary education exceed $3.5 billion* Possible increase in VA education benefit Frequent moves and deployments (including overseas) Military may require educational achievement for promotion Need for affordability Historic issues with transferring credits Post-military career preparation  * In year 2006 3
4 Significant Opportunities in Civilian Markets  Education (1) 3.5 MM  Military 2.1 MM   Fire and Emergency 1.3 MM (3)  Law Enforcement    0.75 MM (2)  (1)  Source: U.S. Department of Education, National Center for Education Statistics, Digest of Education Statistics 2006 (2)  Source: U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics (3)  Source: U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics and the National Fire Protection Association  Over 7.6 million professionals in target markets
5 Academic Programs Directly Related to  Career Needs Convenient 100% online Monthly starts Asynchronous classes Self-service student support Credit for in-service classes  Affordable No out of pocket costs for undergraduates Comparable to in-state tuition Well Positioned to Address Market Needs
6 Our Tuition is Affordable Undergraduate Degree Cost Public Universities $10,000 $20,000 $30,000 $40,000 $50,000 $60,000 $70,000 AMU/APU UMUC Phoenix Strayer Tuition Books Fees (2) (1) Reflects Active Duty Military tuition. Non-resident and other program tuition is higher.. (2) Excludes military scholarship supplements that cover certain tuition costs of military students. Source: Digest of Education Statistics 2005-06, GAO reports, and Company estimates based on customer service quotes. (1) Graduate Degree Cost All Universities $0 $5,000 $10,000 $15,000 $20,000 $25,000 $30,000 $35,000 $40,000 AMU/APU UMUC Strayer Phoenix Tuition Books Fees 1 2
7 APUS Tuition Below Title IV Maximum Loan Limits Sources: U.S. Department of Education, Financial Aid Resource Publication, 2007-2008. $9,500 $10,500 $12,500 $7,500 $7,500 $7,500 $0 $2,000 $4,000 $6,000 $8,000 $10,000 $12,000 $14,000 First Year Second Year Third and beyond (each year) Title IV Limit APUS Tuition Title IV Limit: Represents the maximum annual Title IV loan limit for independent undergraduate student. APUS Tuition: Assumes full-time undergraduate course load of 30 credit hours per year. Title IV Loan Limits vs. APUS Tuition
8 Affordability Creates Low Reliance on Private Loans  FY 2007 Revenue by Funding Source:  Cash &     Other Sources 22%  TA    66%  Private Loans 1%  Title IV 11%
9 APUS at a Glance   Students by Degree Level:  Students by Status:  Masters   26% Bachelors 61% Military 67%  Civilian 18%  Military Affiliated 15%  Associates 13%
10 A Leader in Learning Outcomes Assessment    Comprehensive outcomes assessment process Alumni survey Student testimonials Graduation rates Retention rates Employer survey Transparency of learning outcomes Member of Transparency by Design initiative Membership in the HLC Assessment Academy and the National Survey on Student Engagement (NSSE) Integrated philosophy, approach and results published via website Continual improvement PAD assists with metrics and reporting Intense faculty development programs Investment in instructional design Incentive compensation tied to improvement in outcomes End of program student survey Comprehensive exams Major field tests Student work samples, papers, discussion groups, and projects
11 2008 MAPP Scores (Outcomes Assessment), Seniors  Source: 2008 ETS Reports, Institution Reports and Company Estimates  APUS    Unidentified For-Profit   All Institutions    110  112  114  116  118  120  122  Critical Thinking  Reading  Writing  Mathematics  Humanities  Social Sciences  Natural Sciences  APUS Seniors Test Above National Average
12 12 CUSTOMER SATISFACTION:  More than 95% of students would recommend AMU or APU to a friend or colleague. 95%+ of alumni indicated their AMU or APU degree met or exceeded their expectations. ONLINE EXPERIENCE:  90%+ indicated that interactions between the instructor and the students were positive.  90%+ indicated that their professors promoted a high level of student interaction.  85%+ indicated that they received valuable feedback from professors.  EMPLOYEE VALUE:   95%+ (of alumni employers) would hire another graduate from APUS. January  May 2008 Surveys.  High Referral Rates Driven by Strong Customer Satisfaction
13 Experienced Leadership  PRIOR EXPERIENCE  TITLE  NAME Wallace E. Boston President, CEO and Director President & COO, NeighborCare Pharmacies CFO, Sun Healthcare Group Harry T. Wilkins EVP, CFO CFO & COO, Strayer Education Dr. Frank McCluskey EVP, Provost Director and Dean of Online Learning, Mercy College Peter W. Gibbons SVP, CAO VP Human Resources, Sitel Corporation Officer, United States Army (25 years) Carol S. Gilbert SVP, Marketing Brand VP, Marriott International Mark L. Leuba SVP, CIO VP for Corporate Applications, Random House, Inc
14 Strong top-line growth with good visibility Tuition is paid in advance; attractive working capital dynamics High referral rates drive low student acquisition costs Limited brick and mortar costs Variable cost faculty model Technology platform drives scalability and long-term margin expansion Compelling Financial Attributes
15 0.0 20.0 40.0 60.0 80.0 100.0 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 Q1 2007 Q1 2008 (1) Net course registrations represent the total number of course registrations for students that have attended a portion of a course. 59% Growth CAGR 38% (in thousands) Strong Track Record for Increasing Registrations 19.0 25.6 32.6 54.8 94.8 37.5 33.1 20.9
16 $23.2 $14.1 $40.0 $69.1 $28.2 $10.7 $17.8 $23.1 $0 $10 $20 $30 $40 $50 $60 $70 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 1Q2007 1Q2008 CAGR 45% Continued Strong Revenue Growth 65 % Growth ($ in millions) Revenues
17 Operating Income Growth $0 $3 $5 $8 $10 $13 $15 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 1Q2007 1Q2008 (1) As adjusted to exclude a $3.1 million write-off of capitalized software development costs in 2006. See Reconciliation to GAAP Results at the end of this presentation CAGR 69% 103% Growth ($ in millions) Income from continuing operations before interest income and income tax $1.9 $3.6 $2.2 $6.0 $14.7 $2.7 $5.5
18 1Q2008 Operating Margin Improvement Revenues 100.0 % 100.0 % Costs and expenses: Instructional costs and services 42.6 43.3 Selling and promotional 9.3 10.2 General and administrative 20.7 23.0 Depreciation and amortization 3.9 4.4 Total costs and expenses 76.5 80.9 Income from operations before interest income and income taxes 23.5 19.1 Interest income, net 1.0 1.0 Income from operations before income taxes 24.5 20.1 Income tax expense 9.8 9.2 Net Income 14.7 % 10.9 % Three Months Ended March 31 2008 2007
19 2nd Quarter 2008 %Growth   Net Course Registrations   approx. 32,000    53% Net Course Registrations from New Students approx. 7,600 38% Total Revenue $23.8 to $24.5 million 47%-51%  Net Income (1) $2.6 to $2.9 million  30%-45% EPS  Diluted (1) $0.14 to $0.15 (1) Includes stock-based compensation expense.  Second Quarter 2008 Outlook The following statements are based on current expectations.  These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
20 Prior FY 2008 Updated FY 2008    Net Course Registrations 137,000+ 139,000+ Net Course Registrations from New Students 33,500+ 33,500+ Total Revenue   $100 to $103 million $102 to $104 million Net Income (1) $11.9 to $12.5 million $12.8 to $13.6 million EPS  Diluted (1) $0.63 to $0.66 $0.67 to $0.72 Depreciation and Amortization Expense $4.1 to $4.3 million $4.1 to $4.3 million Capital Expenditures $6.8 to $7.2 million $7.0 to $7.4 million (1) Includes stock-based compensation expense of between $1.5 million and $1.7 million. Increased Full Year 2008 Outlook The following statements are based on current expectations.  These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
21 Enhanced opportunities with the Navy New programs and market segments Master Degrees in Education Associates Degrees New degrees in development Affordability, unique programs and quality provide advantages APEI Positioned for Strong Growth in 2008
William Blair 28th Annual Growth Stock Conference June 17, 2008 AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION, INC.
23 Reconciliation to GAAP Results ($ in millions) 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 Income (loss) from continuing operations before interest income and income taxes $1.9 $3.6 $2.2 $2.9 $14.7 Adjustments: Add: Write-off of software development project - - - $3.1 - Income from continuing operations before interest income and income tax (2006 as adjusted) $1.9 $3.6 $2.2 $6.0 $14.7 The 2006 $6.0 million is an adjusted number that is not prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). Non-GAAP financial measures should not be considered as a substitute for, or superior to, measures of financial performance prepared in accordance with GAAP. The Companys management refers to this non-GAAP financial measure in making operational decisions because it provides meaningful supplemental information regarding the Companys operational performance and facilitates managements internal comparisons to the Companys historical operating results.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20080812160136.txt.gz
TIME:20080812160136
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
August 12, 2008
(Date of earliest event reported) 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02  Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On August 12, 2008, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2008.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 5:00 p.m. EDT on August 12, 2008 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
2
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
3
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports Second Quarter 2008 Results
Net Course Registrations from New Students Increase 60% in Second Quarter 2008 Compared to the Prior Year Period
CHARLES TOWN, W. Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System, which operates through American Military University and American Public University  announced financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2008.
Recent Highlights:
The Company announced net course registrations of approximately 33,300 in the second quarter of 2008, a year-over-year increase of 59%.
Net course registrations from new students in the second quarter of 2008 increased to approximately 8,800, an increase of 60% over the same period of 2007.
As of June 30, 2008, a total of approximately 35,900 students were enrolled in American Public University System.
American Public Education reported second quarter 2008 revenues increased 55% to $25.0 million, compared to $16.2 million in the second quarter of 2007.
Income from operations before interest income and income tax expense in the second quarter of 2008 increased to $5.8 million, compared to $3.3 million in the same period of 2007.
Net income for the second quarter of 2008 increased 93% to $3.9 million or $0.21 per diluted share, compared to $2.0 million or $0.17 per diluted share in the same period of 2007. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the second quarter of 2008 and 2007 were approximately 18.8 million and 12.1 million, respectively.
American Public Education introduces third quarter 2008 earnings outlook of between $0.17 and $0.18 per diluted share.
The Company also increased its full year 2008 earnings outlook to between $0.76 and $0.80 per diluted share.
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the second quarter of 2008 increased 55% to $25.0 million, compared to total revenues of $16.2 million in the second quarter of 2007. Income from operations before interest income and income tax expense in the second quarter of 2008 increased to $5.8 million, compared to $3.3 million in the same period of 2007. Operating margin in the second quarter of 2008 increased to 23.0%, compared to 20.4% in the second quarter of 2007. Stock-based compensation expense reduced operating income by $469,000 and $116,000 in the second quarter of 2008 and 2007, respectively.
Net income for the second quarter of 2008 increased to $3.9 million or $0.21 per diluted share, which includes $307,000 or $0.02 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $2.0 million or $0.17 per diluted share for the second quarter of 2007, including $126,000 or $0.01 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the second quarter of 2008 and 2007 were approximately 18.8 million and 12.1 million, respectively.
For the six months ended June 30, 2008 total revenues were $48.2 million, an increase of 59% compared to total revenues of $30.3 million in the same period of 2007. Income from operations before interest income and income tax for the six months ended June 30, 2008 increased to $11.2 million, compared to $6.0 million in the same period of 2007. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each periods operating income by $846,000 and $618,000, respectively. Net income for the six months ended June 30, 2008 increased 105% to $7.3 million or $0.39 per diluted share, which includes $556,000 or $0.03 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $3.6 million or $0.30 per diluted share in the same period of 2007, including $493,000 or $0.04 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax.
Total cash and cash equivalents at June 30, 2008 were $34.9 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the six months ended June 30, 2008 was $12.0 million, compared to $9.9 million in the same period of 2007. Capital expenditures were $4.6 million for the six months ended June 30, 2008, which compares to $1.8 million in capital expenditures in the same period of 2007. Depreciation and amortization was $1.9 million for the six months ended June 30, 2008 and $1.3 million for the same period of 2007.
Note: Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty. Total student enrollment is the number of students who have completed at least one course in the last 12 months or are in the start of the second week of class for the most current semester.
Third Quarter 2008 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
The Company expects net course registrations from new students of approximately 9,100 and net course registrations of approximately 36,250 in the quarter ending September 30, 2008.
The Companys third quarter 2008 revenue is expected to be between $25.5 million and $26.2 million.
The Company estimates that third quarter 2008 net income, including stock-based compensation expense, will be between $3.1 million and $3.4 million or between $0.17 and $0.18 per diluted share. The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding is expected to be between 18.9 and 19.0 million shares in the three month period ending September 30, 2008.
Full Year 2008 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
The Company anticipates net course registrations from new students of approximately 34,500 and total net course registrations of 141,000 or more in the twelve month period ending December 31, 2008.
The Company expects full year 2008 revenues to be between $103.0 million and $105.5 million.
The Company estimates that full year 2008 net income, including stock-based compensation expense, will be approximately $14.5 million to $15.1 million or between $0.76 and $0.80 per diluted share. The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding is expected to be between 18.9 and 19.1 million shares in the twelve month period ending December 31, 2008.
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys second quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast at 5:00 p.m. Eastern time today. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
About American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, comprises two universities  (AMU) and (APU). Regionally and nationally accredited, APUS serves more than 35,000 part-time students who live and work in all 50 states and more than 100 countries; and offers 73 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements under the heading Full Year 2008 Outlook" and Third Quarter 2008 Outlook above and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: Harry T. Wilkins, CPA, 304-724-3722 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer or Christopher L. Symanoskie, 703-334-3880 Director, Investor Relations
American Public Education, Inc.

Slide: 1 Proprietary - Not for duplication Second Quarter 2008 Earnings Conference Call August 12, 2008  
Slide: 2   Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect, "intend", "may", "should, "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on the slides Third Quarter 2008 Outlook and Increased Full Year 2008 Outlook and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future. 2  Safe Harbor Statement  
 
Slide: 3 Company reported second quarter 2008 earnings of $0.21 per diluted share Operating margins increased to 23.0% in second quarter of 2008, compared to 20.4% in second quarter of 2007 Full Year 2008 Earnings Outlook increased; Third Quarter 2008 Earnings Outlook introduced  Broadening relationship with the US Navy as a member of Navy College Program Distance Learning Partnership (NCPDLP) Regular visitation schedule at Navy installations Participation in 12 Navy Education Fairs https://www.navycollege.navy.mil/storefront.cfm Recent increase in G.I. Bill benefits a positive Recent Highlights 
Slide: 4 2Q2008 Financial Results  ($ in thousands, except per share data and registrations)  Includes pretax stock-based compensation expense of $469,000 in 2008 and $116,000 in 2007. Includes after-tax stock-based compensation expense of $307,000 or $0.02 per diluted share in 2008 and $126,000 or $0.01 per diluted share in 2007.  
Slide: 5   2Q2008 Operating Margin Improvement
Slide: 6   2Q2008 Tax Rate Lower Than Expected  Second 2008 quarter tax rate: 34% Less than expected due to higher revenues from lower tax rate jurisdictions   Expected full year 2008 tax rate of 41%
Slide: 7 3rd Quarter 2008 %Growth Net Course Registrations approx. 36,250 43% Net Course Registrations from New Students approx. 9,100 37% Total Revenue $25.5 to $26.2 million   45%-49%    Net Income (1) $3.1 to $3.4 million  40%-53% EPS  Diluted (1) $0.17 to $0.18 (1) Includes stock-based compensation expense of approximately $179,000 net of tax, compared to $112,000 in the same period of 2007.  Third Quarter 2008 Outlook  The following statements are based on current expectations.  These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
Slide: 8 Prior FY 2008 Updated FY 2008    Net Course Registrations 139,000+ 141,000+ Net Course Registrations from New Students 33,500+ 34,500+ Total Revenue $102 to $104 million $103.0 to $105.5 million Net Income (1) $12.8 to $13.6 million $14.5 to $14.7 million EPS  Diluted (1) $0.67 to $0.72 $0.76 to $0.80 Depreciation and Amortization Expense $4.1 to $4.3 million $4.1 to $4.3 million Capital Expenditures $7.0 to $7.4 million $7.4 to $7.9 million (1) Includes stock-based compensation expense of between $1.1 million and $1.3 million, net of tax.  Increased Full Year 2008 Outlook  The following statements are based on current expectations.  These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
Slide: 9 Closing Remarks  Positioned for Strong Growth in 2008 and Beyond Expanding in civilian markets  Continued success in military market New programs and market segments
Slide: 10   Proprietary - Not for duplication  www.AmericanPublicEducation.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20081112160258.txt.gz
TIME:20081112160258
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
November 12, 2008
(Date of earliest event reported) 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On November 12, 2008, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2008.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 5:00 p.m. EST on November 12, 2008 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports Third Quarter 2008 Results
Net Course Registrations from New Students Increase 55% in Third Quarter 2008 Compared to the Prior Year Period
CHARLES TOWN, W.Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--November 12, 2008--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ:APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System, which operates through American Military University and American Public University  announced financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2008.
Recent Highlights:
Net course registrations from new students in the third quarter of 2008 increased to approximately 10,400, an increase of 55% over the same period of 2007.
The Company announced net course registrations of approximately 38,900 in the third quarter of 2008, a year-over-year increase of 54%.
As of September 30, 2008, a total of approximately 41,100 students were enrolled in American Public University System.
American Public Education reported third quarter 2008 revenues increased 56% to $27.4 million, compared to $17.6 million in the third quarter of 2007.
Income from operations before interest income and income tax expense in the third quarter of 2008 increased to $6.2 million, compared to $3.6 million in the same period of 2007, an increase of approximately 73%.
Net income for the third quarter of 2008 increased approximately 72% to $3.8 million or $0.20 per diluted share, compared to $2.2 million or $0.18 per diluted share in the same period of 2007. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the third quarter of 2008 and 2007 were approximately 18.9 million and 12.6 million, respectively.
American Public Education introduces fourth quarter 2008 earnings estimate of between $0.22 and $0.23 per diluted share.
The Company increased its full year 2008 earnings estimate to between $0.81 and $0.82 per diluted share.
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the third quarter of 2008 increased 56% to $27.4 million, compared to total revenues of $17.6 million in the third quarter of 2007. Income from operations before interest income and income tax expense in the third quarter of 2008 increased to $6.2 million, compared to $3.6 million in the same period of 2007. Operating margin in the third quarter of 2008 increased to 22.6%, compared to 20.3% in the third quarter of 2007. Stock-based compensation expense reduced operating income by $396,000 and $136,000 in the third quarter of 2008 and 2007, respectively. Additionally, selling and promotional expense was approximately 13% of revenue in the third quarter of 2008.
Net income for the third quarter of 2008 increased approximately 72% to $3.8 million or $0.20 per diluted share, which includes $261,000 or $0.01 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $2.2 million or $0.18 per diluted share for the third quarter of 2007, including $113,000 or $0.01 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the third quarter of 2008 and 2007 were approximately 18.9 million and 12.6 million, respectively.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2008 total revenues were $75.6 million, an increase of 58% compared to total revenues of $47.9 million in the same period of 2007. Income from operations before interest income and income tax for the nine months ended September 30, 2008 increased to $17.4 million, compared to $9.6 million in the same period of 2007. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each periods operating income by $1.2 million and $754,000, respectively.
Net income for the nine months ended September 30, 2008 increased approximately 92% to $11.1 million or $0.59 per diluted share, which includes $817,000 or $0.04 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $5.8 million or $0.46 per diluted share in the same period of 2007, including $606,000 or $0.05 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the nine months ended September 30, 2008 and 2007 were approximately 18.8 million and 12.5 million, respectively.
Total cash and cash equivalents at September 30, 2008 were $41.4 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the nine months ended September 30, 2008 was $19.8 million, compared to $14.5 million in the same period of 2007. Capital expenditures were $6.9 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2008, which compares to $3.7 million in capital expenditures in the same period of 2007. Depreciation and amortization was $3.0 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2008 and $2.0 million for the same period of 2007.
Note: Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty. Total student enrollment is the number of students who have completed at least one course in the last 12 months or are in the start of the second week of class for the most current semester.
Fourth Quarter 2008 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
The Company expects net course registrations from new students of between 9,500 and 9,800 and net course registrations of between 40,400 and 40,900 in the quarter ending December 31, 2008.
The Companys fourth quarter 2008 revenue is expected to be between $29.5 million and $30.9 million.
The Company estimates that fourth quarter 2008 net income, including stock-based compensation expense, will be between $4.0 million and $4.3 million or between $0.22 and $0.23 per diluted share. Additionally, selling and promotional expense is expected to be approximately 14% of revenue in the fourth quarter of 2008.
The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding is expected to be approximately 19.0 million shares in the three month period ending December 31, 2008.
Full Year 2008 Outlook
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
The Company anticipates net course registrations from new students of approximately 36,300 or more and total net course registrations of 145,700 or more in the twelve month period ending December 31, 2008.
The Company expects full year 2008 revenues to be between $105.2 million and $106.6 million.
The Company estimates that full year 2008 net income, including stock-based compensation expense, will be approximately $15.2 million to $15.4 million or between $0.81 and $0.82 per diluted share. The estimated net income represents a 73% increase or more over the reported net income of $8.8 million in the year ended December 31, 2007.
The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding is expected to be approximately 18.8 million shares in the twelve month period ending December 31, 2008.
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys third quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast at 5:00 p.m. Eastern time today. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
About American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ:APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, comprises two universities  (AMU) and (APU). As a regionally accredited institution of higher learning, APUS serves more than 41,000 part-time students who live and work in all 50 states and more than 100 countries; and offers 73 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements under the heading Full Year 2008 Outlook" and Fourth Quarter 2008 Outlook above and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304-724-3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Director, Investor Relations 703-334-3880
American Public Education, Inc.

Exhibit 99.2
Online Higher Education Built To Succeed Third Quarter 2008 Earnings Conference Call  November 12, 2008
Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect, "intend", "may", "should, "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on the slides Fourth Quarter 2008 Outlook and Full Year 2008 Outlook and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2007 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future. 2 Safe Harbor Statement
Wally Boston President and Chief Executive Officer  Third Quarter 2008 Highlights
Net Course Registrations and Student Enrollment: For the three months ended September 30, 2007 2008 % Change Net Course Registrations from New Students 6,700 10,400 55%  Net Course Registrations 25,300 38,900 54% As of September 30, 2007 2008 % Change  Total Student Enrollment 26,900 41,100 53% Third Quarter 2008 Results: Total revenue increased 56% year-over-year to $27.4 million Operating margins increased to 22.6% Net income increased approximately 72% to $3.8 million ($0.20 per diluted share) Fourth quarter 2008 outlook introduced Full year 2008 earnings outlook increased Robust Growth in Challenging Times
Product characteristics: Affordable and flexible High quality program offerings in wide variety of fields For Those Who Serve - military and select civilian markets Operating efficiencies: Relationship marketing expertise - low student acquisition cost & high referral rates PAD System - drives efficient business processes and cost savings General and administrative expenses Financial position: Strong tuition funding sources, especially TA/VA Bad debt less than 1% of revenue No debt and $41.4 million of cash and cash equivalents Our Unique Value Proposition Offers Sustainable Advantages
Harry Wilkins EVP and Chief Financial Officer Financial Overview
Strong 3Q2008 Financial Results ($ in thousands, except per share data and registrations) Includes pretax stock-based compensation expense of $396,000 in 2008 and $136,000 in 2007. Includes after-tax stock-based compensation expense of $261,000 or $0.01 per diluted share in 2008 and $113,000 or $0.01 per diluted share in 2007. Three Months Ended Sep 30, 2007 2008 Net Course Registrations 25,300 38,900 54% Net Course Registrations from New Students 6,700 10,400 55% Revenues $17,612 $27,404 56% Income from Operations before Interest Income and Income Tax(1) $3,578 $6,203 73% Net Income(2) $2,222 $3,816 72% Diluted EPS(2) $0.18 $0.20 Weighted Average Shares - Diluted 12,641 18,851
Continued Operating Margin Expansion. Three Months Nine Months Ended September 30,  Ended September 30,  2008 2007 2008 2007 Revenues 100.0 % 100.0 % 100.0 % 100.0 % Costs and expenses: Instructional costs and services 39.8 43.8 41.4 43.2 Selling and promotional 13.1 11.0 11.1 10.1 General and administrative 20.4 21.0 20.4 22.5 Depreciation and amortization 4.1 3.9 4.0 4.2 Total costs and expenses 77.4 79.7 76.9 80.0 Income from operations before interest income and income taxes 22.6 20.3 23.1 20.0 Interest income, net 0.7 1.5 0.7 1.2 Income from operations before income taxes 23.3 21.8 23.8 21.2 Income tax expense 9.4 9.2 9.1 9.1 Net Income 13.9 % 12.6 % 14.7 % 12.1 %
4th Quarter 2008 %Growth Net Course Registrations 40,400 to 40,900 45%-47% Net Course Registrations from New Students 9,500 to 9,800   38%-42% Total Revenue $29.5 to $30.9 million 39%-46%   Net Income (1) $4.0 to $4.3 million  37%-45% EPS  Diluted (1) $0.22 to $0.23  Additionally, selling and promotional expense is expected to be approximately 14% of revenue in the fourth quarter of 2008.  (1) Includes stock-based compensation expense of approximately $265,000 net of tax. Fourth Quarter 2008 Outlook The following statements are based on current expectations.  These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. Updated FY 2008 %Growth Net Course Registrations 145,700+  54%  Net Course Registrations from New Students 36,300+ 47% Total Revenue $105.2 to $106.6 million 52% to 54% Net Income (1) $15.2 to $15.4 million 73% to 76% EPS  Diluted (1) $0.81 to $0.82 Depreciation and Amortization Expense $4.1 to $4.3 million Capital Expenditures $7.9 to $8.9 million  (1) Includes stock-based compensation expense of approximately $1.1 million, net of tax.
Increased Full Year 2008 Outlook  The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. Updated FY 2008 %Growth Net Course Registrations 145,700 +54% Net Course Registrations from New Students 36,300+ 47% Total Revenue $105.2 to $106.6 million 52% to 54% Net Income (1) $15.2 to $15.4 million 73% to 76% EPS  Diluted (1) $0.81 to $0.82 Depreciation and Amortization Expense $4.1 to $4.3 million Capital Expenditures $7.9 to $8.9 million  (1) Includes stock-based compensation expense of approximately $1.1 million, net of tax.
Well Positioned for Expansion in 2008, 2009 and Beyond  Further expansion in civilian markets  - Progress in existing verticals  police, fire, logistics, security etc.  - Recently launched masters degree programs in education Continued success in military market - Navy College Program Distance Learning Partnership  - New GI Bill (Summer 2009) Launch new programs and market segments - Example: PhD Programs - New underserved segments
Third Quarter 2008 EarningsConference Call Q&A Session


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20081212162729.txt.gz
TIME:20081212162729
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 1  Registrant's Business and Operations
On December 9, 2008, American Public Education, Inc. (the "Company") entered into an Underwriting Agreement (the "Underwriting Agreement") relating to the public offering of the Company's common stock, par value $0.01 per share ("Common Stock"), pursuant to the Company's Registration Statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-155300), including a related prospectus dated December 2, 2008, as supplemented by a prospectus supplement dated December 9, 2008, which was filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b)(5) under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended. The shares of Common Stock being sold in the offering consist of 15,000 shares being sold by the Company and 4,212,952 shares being sold by funds affiliated with ABS Capital Partners (collectively, the "Selling Stockholders"). The price per share of Common Stock to be paid to the Company and the Selling Stockholders, as applicable, is $35.71875, which represents the offering price to the public of $37.50 per share less the Underwriters' discount. Pursuant to the terms of the Underwriting Agreement and upon the satisfaction of customary closing conditions, the Underwriters delivered the shares on December 12, 2008. The shares being sold by the Selling Stockholders include 421,295 shares pursuant to the full exercise by the several underwriters named in the Underwriting Agreement (the "Underwriters") of an option to purchase additional shares of Common Stock on the same terms and conditions described above to cover overallotments.
A copy of the Underwriting Agreement, entered into by and among the Company, the Selling Stockholders and William Blair & Company, L.L.C., as representative of the Underwriters, is attached as Exhibit 1.1 to this Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference. The Underwriting Agreement includes certain customary representations, warranties and covenants by the Company, and it provides that the Company will indemnify the Underwriters against certain liabilities, including liabilities under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or contribute to payments the Underwriters may be required to make because of any of those liabilities.
SECTION 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 1.1
EXECUTION COPY
December 9, 2008
William Blair & Company, L.L.C.
  As Representative of the Several   Underwriters Named in Schedule A
c/o William Blair & Company, L.L.C. 222 West Adams Street Chicago, Illinois 60606
Ladies and Gentlemen:
           American Public Education, Inc. (the ), a Delaware corporation, has an authorized capital stock consisting of 10,000,000 shares, $0.01 par value, of Preferred Stock, of which no shares will be outstanding as of the First Closing Date hereinafter defined, and 100,000,000 shares, $0.01 par value, of Common Stock (), of which 17,940,439 shares were outstanding as of September 30, 2008, and no other shares of Common Stock will have been issued as of the First Closing Date hereinafter defined, except for shares of Common Stock issued upon the exercise of stock options outstanding as of September 30, 2008, 1,218 shares of Common Stock issued pursuant to the Company's director compensation policies or shares of Common Stock issued pursuant to this Agreement. The Company proposes to issue and sell 15,000 shares of its authorized but unissued Common Stock, and certain stockholders of the Company (as named in Schedule B, the "") propose to sell in the aggregate 3,791,657 shares of the Company's issued and outstanding Common Stock to the several underwriters named in Schedule A as it may be amended by the Pricing Agreement hereinafter defined (), who are acting severally and not jointly. Collectively, such total of 3,806,657 shares of Common Stock proposed to be sold by the Company and the Selling Stockholders is hereinafter referred to as the "." In addition, the Selling Stockholders propose to grant to the Underwriters options to purchase up to an aggregate of 421,295 additional shares of Common Stock () as provided in Section 5 hereof. The Firm Shares and, to the extent such options are exercised, the Option Shares, are hereinafter collectively referred to as the
Section 1.
Introductory.
"Company"
"Common Stock"
Selling Stockholders
"Underwriters"
Firm Shares
"Option Shares"
"Shares."
          You have advised the Company and the Selling Stockholders that the Underwriters propose to make a public offering of their respective portions of the Shares as soon as you deem advisable after the registration statement hereinafter referred to becomes effective, if it has not yet become effective, and the Pricing Agreement hereinafter defined has been executed and delivered.
          Prior to the purchase and public offering of the Shares by the several Underwriters, the Company, the Selling Stockholders and the Representative, acting on behalf of the several Underwriters, shall enter into an agreement substantially in the form of Exhibit A hereto (the ). The Pricing Agreement may take the form of an exchange of any standard form of written telecommunication among the Company, the Selling Stockholders and the Representative and shall
"Pricing Agreement"
 
 
specify such applicable information as is indicated in Exhibit A hereto. The offering of the Shares will be governed by this Agreement, as supplemented by the Pricing Agreement. From and after the date of the execution and delivery of the Pricing Agreement, this Agreement shall be deemed to incorporate the Pricing Agreement.
          The Company and the Selling Stockholders hereby confirm their agreement with the Underwriters as follows:
           The Company represents and warrants to the several Underwriters that:
Section
2. Representations and Warranties of the Company.
     (a) A registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-155300), a related base prospectus (the "") and a preliminary prospectus supplement to the Base Prospectus (any such preliminary prospectus supplement, together with the Base Prospectus, a "") with respect to the Shares have been prepared and filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission () by the Company in conformity with the requirements of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (collectively, the unless otherwise indicated all references herein to specific rules are rules promulgated under the 1933 Act); and the Company has so prepared and has filed such amendments thereto, if any, and such amended preliminary prospectuses as may have been required to the date hereof and will file such additional amendments thereto and such amended prospectuses as may hereafter be required. The Company will prepare and file a prospectus pursuant to Rule 424(b) that discloses the information previously omitted from the preliminary prospectus in reliance upon Rule 430B. To the extent that the Representative requests, there have been or will promptly be delivered to you one signed copy of such registration statement and amendments, one copy of each exhibit filed therewith, and conformed copies of such registration statement and amendments (but without exhibits) and of the related Base Prospectus and preliminary prospectus or prospectuses, and final forms of prospectus for each of the Underwriters.
Base Prospectus
preliminary prospectus
"Commission"
"1933 Act;"
     Such registration statement (as amended, if applicable) at the time it becomes effective and the prospectus constituting a part thereof (including, in each case, the information, if any, deemed to be part thereof pursuant to Rule 430B or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (collectively, the ")), as from time to time amended or supplemented, are hereinafter referred to as the and the respectively, except that if any revised prospectus shall be provided to the Underwriters by the Company for use in connection with the offering of the Shares which differs from the Prospectus on file at the Commission at the time the Registration Statement became or becomes effective (whether or not such revised prospectus is required to be filed by the Company pursuant to Rule 424(b)), the term "Prospectus" shall refer to such revised prospectus from and after the time it was provided to the Underwriters for such use. Any registration statement (including any amendment or supplement thereto or information which is deemed part thereof) filed by the Company under Rule 462(b) () shall be deemed to be part of the "Registration Statement" as defined herein, and any prospectus (including any amendment or supplement thereto or information which is deemed part thereof) included in such registration statement shall be deemed to be part of the "Prospectus" as defined herein, as appropriate. Any reference herein to the Registration Statement, the Base Prospectus, a preliminary prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the Securities Act. Any document filed by the Company under the Exchange Act prior to the date hereof or during the offering period, when such document was or is filed with the
"Exchange Act
"Registration Statement"
"Prospectus,"
"Rule 
462(b)
Registration Statement"
 
Commission, conformed or will conform in all material respects to the requirements of the Exchange Act, and none of such documents contained or will contain, as of the date such document was or is filed with the Commission, any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or will omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading.
     (b) The Commission has not issued any order preventing or suspending the use of any preliminary prospectus, and each preliminary prospectus has conformed in all material respects with the requirements of the 1933 Act and, as of its date, has not included any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances in which they were made, not misleading; and when the Registration Statement became or becomes effective, and at all times subsequent thereto, up to the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date hereinafter defined, as the case may be, the Registration Statement, including the information deemed to be part of the Registration Statement at the time specified in Rule 430B, if applicable, and the Prospectus and any amendments or supplements thereto, in all material respects conformed or will in all material respects conform to the requirements of the 1933 Act, and neither the Registration Statement nor the Prospectus, nor any amendment or supplement thereto, included or will include any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or will omit to state a material fact, in the case of the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement thereto, required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading and, in the case of the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
     As of the Applicable Time hereinafter defined, neither (x) the Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectus(es) hereinafter defined issued at or prior to the Applicable Time, the Statutory Prospectus hereinafter defined as of the Applicable Time and the information in Schedule A to the Pricing Agreement, all being considered together (collectively, the "") nor (y) any individual Issuer Limited Use Free Writing Prospectus hereinafter defined issued at or prior to the Applicable Time, when considered together with the Disclosure Package, included any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein not misleading.
Disclosure Package
     As used in this Section 2(b) and elsewhere in this Agreement:
     "" means 3:30 P.M., Chicago Time, on December 9, 2008 or such other time as agreed by the Company, the Selling Stockholders and the Representative.
Applicable Time
     "" means any "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433, relating to the Shares that (i) is required to be filed with the Commission by the Company, (ii) is a "road show for an offering that is a written communication" within the meaning of Rule 433(d)(8)(i) or (iii) is exempt from filing pursuant to Rule 433(d)(5)(i) because it contains a description of the Shares or of the offering thereof that does not reflect the final terms, in each case in the form filed or required to be filed with the Commission or, if not required to be filed, in the form required to be retained in the Company's records pursuant to Rule 433(g).
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus
     "" means any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus specified in Schedule B hereto.
Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectus
 
     "" means any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus that is not an Issuer General Use Free Writing Prospectus.
Issuer Limited Use Free Writing Prospectus
     "" as of any time means the Base Prospectus, as supplemented by the preliminary prospectus supplement, relating to the Shares that is included in the Registration Statement immediately prior to that time.
Statutory Prospectus
     Each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, as of its issue date and at all subsequent times through the completion of the public offer and sale of the Shares or until any earlier date that the Company notified or notifies the Representative as described in Section 6(d), did not, does not and will not include any information that conflicted, conflicts or will conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus, and any preliminary or other prospectus deemed to be a part thereof that has not been superseded or modified.
     Notwithstanding the foregoing, the representations and warranties of the Company set forth in this Section 2(b) shall not apply to information contained in or omitted from any preliminary prospectus, the Registration Statement, the Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by or on behalf of any Underwriter through the Representative specifically for use in the preparation thereof.
     At the earliest time after the filing of the Registration Statement relating to the Shares that the Company or another offering participant made a bona fide offer (within the meaning of Rule 164(h)(2)) of the Securities Act and at the date of this Agreement, the Company was not and is not an "ineligible issuer" as defined in Rule 405.
     (c) The Company and its subsidiaries have been duly incorporated and are validly existing as corporations in good standing under the laws of their respective places of incorporation, with corporate power and authority to own their properties and conduct their business as described in the Prospectus; the Company and each of its subsidiaries are duly qualified to do business as foreign corporations under the corporation law of, and are in good standing as such in, each jurisdiction in which they own or lease substantial properties, have an office, or in which substantial business is conducted and such qualification is required except in any such case where the failure to so qualify or be in good standing would not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect upon the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole; and no proceeding of which the Company has knowledge has been instituted in any such jurisdiction, revoking, limiting or curtailing, or seeking to revoke, limit or curtail, such power and authority or qualification. The State of West Virginia and the Commonwealth of Virginia are the only jurisdictions in which the Company or any of its subsidiaries maintains an office or leases property.
     (d) Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Company owns directly or indirectly 100 percent of the issued and outstanding capital stock of each of its subsidiaries, free and clear of any claims, liens, encumbrances or security interests and all of such capital stock has been duly authorized and validly issued and is fully paid and nonassessable.
     (e) The issued and outstanding shares of capital stock of the Company as set forth in the Prospectus, including the outstanding Shares to be sold by the Selling Stockholders, have been duly authorized and validly issued, are fully paid and nonassessable, and conform to the description thereof contained in the Prospectus.
 
     (f) The Shares to be sold by the Company have been duly authorized and when issued, delivered and paid for pursuant to this Agreement, will be validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable, and will conform to the description thereof contained in the Prospectus.
     (g) The making and performance by the Company of this Agreement and the Pricing Agreement have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action and will not (i) violate the Company's charter or bylaws, (ii) result, except as would not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole, in a breach or violation of any of the terms and provisions of, or constitute a default or change of control under (A) any agreement, franchise, license, indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument to which the Company or any subsidiary is a party or by which the Company, any subsidiary or the property of any of them may be bound or affected, or (B) any statute, rule, regulation or order applicable to the Company or any of its subsidiaries of any court, regulatory body, accrediting agency, administrative agency or other governmental body having jurisdiction over the Company or any subsidiary or any of their respective properties, including, without limitation, the Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (the ""), or any order of any court, regulatory body, accrediting agency, administrative agency or other governmental body entered in any proceeding to which the Company or any subsidiary was or is now a party or by which it is bound. No consent, approval, authorization or other order of any court, regulatory body, accrediting agency, administrative agency or other governmental body is required for the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the Pricing Agreement or the consummation of the transactions contemplated herein or therein, except for compliance with the 1933 Act and blue sky laws applicable to the public offering of the Shares by the several Underwriters and clearance of such offering with the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority (""). This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by the Company.
HEA
FINRA
     (h) The accountants who have expressed their opinions with respect to certain of the financial statements and schedules included in the Registration Statement are an independent registered public accounting firm as required by the 1933 Act and the Exchange Act, and such accountants are not in violation of the auditor independence requirements of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (the ).
"Sarbanes-Oxley Act"
     (i) The consolidated financial statements of the Company included in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus present fairly in all material respects the consolidated financial position of the Company as of the respective dates of such financial statements, and the consolidated statements of operations and cash flows of the Company for the respective periods covered thereby, all in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied throughout the periods involved, except as disclosed therein.
     The financial information set forth in the Prospectus under "Summary Consolidated Financial and Operating Data" presents fairly in all material respects on the basis stated in the Prospectus, the information set forth therein.
     All disclosures contained in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus regarding "non-GAAP financial measures" (as such term is defined by the Commission's rules and regulations) comply with Regulation G of the Exchange Act and Item 10 of Regulation S-K under the 1933 Act, to the extent applicable.
     (j) Neither the Company nor any subsidiary is in violation of its charter or in default under any consent decree, or in default with respect to any material provision of any lease, loan
 
agreement, franchise, license, permit or other contract obligation to which it is a party; and, to the Company's knowledge, there does not exist any state of facts which constitutes an event of default as defined in such documents or which, with notice or lapse of time or both, would constitute such an event of default, in each case, except for defaults that neither singly nor in the aggregate are material to the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole.
     (k) There are no material legal, governmental or accrediting agency proceedings pending, or to the Company's knowledge, threatened to which the Company or any subsidiary is or may be a party or of which material property owned or leased by the Company or any subsidiary is or may be the subject, or related to environmental or discrimination matters that are not disclosed in the Prospectus, or that question the validity of this Agreement or the Pricing Agreement or any action taken or to be taken pursuant hereto or thereto.
     (l) There are no holders of securities of the Company having rights to registration thereof or preemptive rights to purchase Common Stock except as disclosed in the Prospectus. Except for the Selling Stockholders, all holders of registration rights have waived such rights with respect to the offering being made by the Prospectus.
     (m) The Company and each of its subsidiaries have good and marketable title to all the properties and assets reflected as owned in the financial statements hereinabove described (or elsewhere in the Prospectus), except to the extent that such properties and assets were disposed of in the ordinary course of business after the date of such financial statements, subject to no lien, mortgage, pledge, charge or encumbrance of any kind except those, if any, reflected in such financial statements (or elsewhere in the Prospectus) or that are not material to the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole. The Company and each of its subsidiaries hold their respective leased properties that are material to the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole under valid and binding leases.
     (n) The Company has not taken and will not take, directly or indirectly, any action designed to or which has constituted or which might reasonably be expected to cause or result, under the Exchange Act or otherwise, in stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company to facilitate the sale or resale of the Shares.
     (o) Subsequent to the respective dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus, and except as contemplated by the Prospectus, the Company and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole, have not incurred any material liabilities or obligations, direct or contingent, or entered into any material transactions not in the ordinary course of business and there has not been any material adverse change in their condition (financial or otherwise) or results of operations nor any material change in their capital stock, short-term debt or long-term debt.
     (p) There is no material document of a character required to be described in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package or the Prospectus or to be filed as an exhibit to the Registration Statement which is not described or filed as required.
     (q) Except as disclosed in the Prospectus, the Company together with its subsidiaries owns and possesses all right, title and interest in and to, or has duly licensed from third parties, all patents, patent rights, trade secrets, inventions, know-how, trademarks, trade names, copyrights, service marks and other proprietary rights () material to the business of the Company and each of its subsidiaries taken as a whole. Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has received any notice of infringement, misappropriation or conflict from any third
"Trade Rights"
 
party as to such material Trade Rights which has not been resolved or disposed of and neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has infringed, misappropriated or otherwise conflicted with material Trade Rights of any third parties, which infringement, misappropriation or conflict would reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect upon the condition (financial or otherwise) or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole.
     (r) The conduct of the business of the Company and each of its subsidiaries is in compliance in all respects with applicable federal, state, local and foreign laws and regulations and with applicable accrediting agency rules, except where the failure to be in compliance would not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect upon the condition (financial or otherwise) or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole.
     (s) The Company and its subsidiaries possess certificates, authorizations, accreditations or permits issued by appropriate governmental agencies or bodies or accrediting agencies necessary to conduct the business now operated by them (except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the Company and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole), including, without limitation, all authorizations required to participate in federal financial aid programs under Title IV of the HEA, and have not received any notice of proceedings relating to the revocation or modification of any such certificate, authorization, accreditation or permit that, if determined adversely to the Company or its subsidiaries, would, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect on the Company and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
     (t) All offers and sales of the Company's capital stock prior to the date hereof were either (i) made pursuant to a registration statement filed by the Company with the Commission under the 1933 Act or (ii) at all relevant times exempt from the registration requirements of the 1933 Act and, in each case, all such offers and sales during the twelve months prior to the date hereof were duly registered with or the subject of an available exemption from the registration requirements of the applicable state and local securities or blue sky laws.
     (u) The Company has filed all necessary federal, state and local income and franchise tax returns that were required to be filed prior to the date hereof, after taking into account all applicable extensions obtained, except where the failure to file would not reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect upon the condition (financial or otherwise) or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole, and has paid all taxes shown as due thereon, and there is no tax deficiency that has been, or to the knowledge of the Company might be, asserted against the Company or any of its properties or assets that would reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect upon the condition (financial or otherwise) or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole.
     (v) A registration statement pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Exchange Act to register the Common Stock thereunder has been declared effective by the Commission pursuant to the Exchange Act, and the Common Stock is duly registered thereunder. The Shares are listed on The NASDAQ Global Market.
     (w) The Company has established and maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rules 13a-15 and 15d-15 under the Exchange Act) and such controls and procedures are effective in ensuring that material information relating to the Company, including its subsidiaries, is made known to the principal executive officer and the principal financial officer. The Company has utilized such controls and procedures to the extent applicable in
 
preparing and evaluating the disclosures relating to the Company included in the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus.
     (x) The Company maintains a system of internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurance that: (i) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorizations; (ii) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and to maintain accountability for assets; (iii) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (iv) amounts reflected on the Company's consolidated balance sheet for assets are compared with existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences.
     (y) The Company is not, and does not intend to conduct its business in a manner in which it would become, an "investment company" as defined in Section 3(a) of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended ().
"Investment Company Act"
     (z) No transaction has occurred between or among the Company and any of its officers or directors, stockholders or any affiliate or affiliates of any such officer or director or stockholder that is required to be described in and is not described in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus.
     (aa) The Company's board of directors has validly appointed an audit committee whose composition satisfies the requirements of Rule 4350(d)(2) of the Rules of NASD (the ), and the board of directors or the audit committee has adopted a charter that satisfies the requirements of Rule 4350(d)(1) of the NASD Rules.
"NASD Rules"
     (bb) The Company and its subsidiaries are insured by insurers of recognized financial responsibility against such losses and risks and in such amounts as are customary in the businesses in which they are engaged or propose to engage after giving effect to the transactions described in the Prospectus. To the knowledge of the Company, all policies of insurance and fidelity or surety bonds insuring the Company, its subsidiaries and their respective businesses, assets, employees, officers and directors are in full force and effect; and the Company and its subsidiaries are in compliance with the terms of such policies and instruments in all material respects.
     (cc) The Company is in compliance in all material respects with all applicable provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act and all rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, and is actively taking steps to ensure that it will be in compliance in all material respects with other provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act that will become applicable to the Company.
     (dd) None of the Company and its subsidiaries is involved in any labor dispute nor, to the knowledge of the Company, is any such dispute threatened. The Company is not aware of any threatened or pending litigation between the Company and any of its executive officers and, except as disclosed in the Prospectus, has not received notice from any of its executive officers that such officer does not intend to remain in the employment of the Company.
          
.
Section 3
Representations, Warranties and Covenants of the Selling Stockholders.
     (a) Each of the Selling Stockholders, severally and not jointly, represents and warrants to, and agrees with, the Company and the Underwriters that:
 
     (i) Such Selling Stockholder (1) has valid and marketable title to the Shares proposed to be sold by such Selling Stockholder hereunder, (2) on the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date hereinafter defined, as the case may be, will have good and valid title to the Shares proposed to be sold by such Selling Stockholder hereunder on such date and (3) has full right, power and authority to enter into this Agreement and the Pricing Agreement and to sell, assign, transfer and deliver such Shares hereunder, free and clear of all voting trust arrangements, liens, encumbrances, equities, claims and community property rights; and upon delivery of and payment for such Shares hereunder, the Underwriters will acquire valid marketable title thereto, free and clear of all voting trust arrangements, liens, encumbrances, equities, claims and community property rights.
     (ii) Such Selling Stockholder has not taken and will not take, directly or indirectly, any action designed to or which might be reasonably expected to cause or result, under the Exchange Act or otherwise, in stabilization or manipulation of the price of any security of the Company to facilitate the sale or resale of the Shares.
     (iii) To the extent that any statements or omissions made in a preliminary prospectus are made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information relating to such Selling Stockholder furnished to the Company by such Selling Stockholder expressly for use therein, each preliminary prospectus, as of its date, has not included any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; and, to the extent that any statements or omissions made in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto are made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information relating to such Selling Stockholder furnished to the Company by such Selling Stockholder expressly for use therein, neither the Registration Statement nor the Prospectus, nor any amendment or supplement thereto, as it relates to such Selling Stockholder included or will include any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or will omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading. The parties hereto agree that the information relating to such Selling Stockholder set forth under the caption "Selling Stockholders" and the footnotes thereunder (excluding any percentages set forth therein) is the only information made in reliance upon and in conformity with written information relating to such Selling Stockholder furnished to the Company by such Selling Stockholder expressly for use in any preliminary prospectus, the Registration Statement and Prospectus and any amendment or supplement thereto.
     In order to document the Underwriters' compliance with the reporting and withholding provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, with respect to the transactions herein contemplated, each of the Selling Stockholders agrees to deliver to you prior to or on the First Closing Date, as hereinafter defined, a properly completed and executed United States Treasury Department Form W-8 or W-9 (or other applicable form of statement specified by Treasury Department regulations in lieu thereof).
           The Representative, on behalf of the several Underwriters, represents and warrants to the Company and the Selling Stockholders that the information set forth (a) on the cover page of the Prospectus with respect to price, underwriting discount and terms of the offering and (b) in paragraphs 3, 10, 11 and 12 under "Underwriting" in the Prospectus was furnished to the Company by and on behalf of the Underwriters for use in connection with the preparation of the Registration Statement and is correct and complete in all material respects.
Section
4. Representations and Warranties of the Underwriters.
 
           On the basis of the representations, warranties and agreements herein contained, but subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Company and each of the Selling Stockholders, severally and not jointly, agrees to sell to the Underwriters named in Schedule A hereto, and the Underwriters agree, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company and the Selling Stockholders, respectively, 15,000 Firm Shares in the case of the Company and the number of Firm Shares set forth opposite the name of each Selling Stockholder in Schedule B hereto in the case of the Selling Stockholders at the price per share set forth in the Pricing Agreement. The obligation of each Underwriter to the Company shall be to purchase from the Company that number of Firm Shares which (as nearly as practicable, as determined by you) bears to 15,000, the same proportion as the number of Firm Shares set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter in Schedule A hereto bears to the total number of Firm Shares to be purchased by all Underwriters under this Agreement. The obligation of each Underwriter to each of the Selling Stockholders shall be to purchase from such Selling Stockholder that number of full shares which (as nearly as practicable, as determined by you) bears to the number of Firm Shares set forth opposite the name of such Selling Stockholder in Schedule B hereto, the same proportion as the number of Firm Shares set forth opposite the name of such Underwriter in Schedule A hereto bears to the total number of Firm Shares to be purchased by all Underwriters under this Agreement. The public offering price and the purchase price shall be set forth in the Pricing Agreement.
Section
5. Purchase, Sale and Delivery of Shares.
          At 9:00 A.M., Chicago Time, on the fourth business day, if permitted under Rule 15c6-1 under the Exchange Act, (or the third business day if required under Rule 15c6-1 under the Exchange Act or unless postponed in accordance with the provisions of Section 12) following the date the Registration Statement becomes effective (or, if the Company has elected to rely upon Rule 430B, the fourth business day, if permitted under Rule 15c6-1 under the Exchange Act, (or the third business day if required under Rule 15c6-1 under the Exchange Act) after execution of the Pricing Agreement), or such other time not later than ten business days after such date as shall be agreed upon by the Representative and the Company, the Company and the Selling Stockholders will deliver to you at the offices of counsel for the Underwriters or through the facilities of The Depository Trust Company for the accounts of the several Underwriters, the Firm Shares to be sold by them, against payment of the purchase price therefor by delivery of federal or other immediately available funds, by wire transfer or otherwise, to the Company and the Selling Stockholders. Such time of delivery and payment is herein referred to as the The Firm Shares to be so delivered will be registered in such names as you request by notice to the Company and the Selling Stockholders prior to 10:00 A.M., Chicago Time, on the second business day preceding the First Closing Date. Payment for the Firm Shares so to be delivered shall be made at the time and in the manner described above at the offices of counsel for the Underwriters.
"First Closing Date."
          In addition, on the basis of the representations, warranties and agreements herein contained, but subject to the terms and conditions herein set forth, the Selling Stockholders designated on Exhibit B hereby grant, severally and not jointly, options to the several Underwriters to purchase, severally and not jointly, up to an aggregate of 421,295 Option Shares, at the same purchase price per share to be paid for the Firm Shares, for use solely in covering any overallotments made by the Underwriters in the sale and distribution of the Firm Shares. The options granted hereunder may be exercised at any time (but not more than once) within 30 days after the date of the Prospectus first filed by the Company pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the 1933 Act (the "") upon notice by you to the Company and the Selling Stockholders setting forth the aggregate number of Option Shares as to which the Underwriters are exercising the option, the names and denominations in which such shares are to be registered and the time and place at which such shares will be delivered. Such time of delivery (which may not be earlier than the First Closing Date), being herein
Rule 424 Prospectus
 
referred to as the shall be determined by you, but if at any time other than the First Closing Date, shall not be earlier than three nor later than 10 full business days after delivery of such notice of exercise. If all of the Option Shares are purchased, the number of Option Shares to be purchased from each Selling Stockholder is set forth in Schedule B hereto. If less than all of the Option Shares are purchased, the number of Option Shares to be purchased from each of the Selling Stockholders shall be reduced from such maximum number on a pro rata basis (as nearly as practicable, as determined by you). The number of Option Shares to be purchased by each Underwriter shall be determined by multiplying the number of Option Shares to be sold by the Selling Stockholders by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of Firm Shares to be purchased by such Underwriter as set forth opposite its name in Schedule A and the denominator of which is the total number of Firm Shares (subject to such adjustments to eliminate any fractional share purchases as you in your absolute discretion may make). The manner of payment for and delivery of the Option Shares shall be the same as for the Firm Shares as specified in the preceding paragraph.
"Second Closing Date,"
          You have advised the Company and the Selling Stockholders that each Underwriter has authorized you to accept delivery of its Shares, to make payment and to acknowledge receipt therefor. You, individually and not as the Representative of the Underwriters, may make payment for any Shares to be purchased by any Underwriter whose funds shall not have been received by you by the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, for the account of such Underwriter, but any such payment shall not relieve such Underwriter from any obligation hereunder.
           The Company, and in the case of Section 6(h), each of the Selling Stockholders, covenants and agrees that:
Section
6. Covenants of the Company.
     (a) The Company will advise you and each of the Selling Stockholders promptly of the issuance by the Commission of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or of the institution of any proceedings for that purpose, or of any notification of the suspension of qualification of the Shares for sale in any jurisdiction or the initiation or threatening of any proceedings for that purpose or of any examination pursuant to Section 8(e) of the 1933 Act concerning the Registration Statement and if the Company becomes the subject of a proceeding under Section 8A of the 1933 Act in connection with the offering of the Shares, and will also advise you and each of the Selling Stockholders promptly of any request of the Commission for amendment or supplement of the Registration Statement, of any preliminary prospectus or of the Prospectus, or for additional information.
     (b) The Company will give you and each of the Selling Stockholders notice of its intention to file or prepare any amendment to the Registration Statement (including any post-effective amendment) or any Rule 462(b) Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus (including any revised prospectus which the Company proposes for use by the Underwriters in connection with the offering of the Shares which differs from the prospectus on file at the Commission at the time the Registration Statement became or becomes effective, whether or not such revised prospectus is required to be filed pursuant to Rule 424(b)) and will furnish you and each of the Selling Stockholders with copies of any such amendment or supplement a reasonable amount of time prior to such proposed filing or use, as the case may be, and will not file any such amendment or supplement or use any such prospectus to which you or counsel for the Underwriters shall reasonably object.
     (c) If at any time when a prospectus relating to the Shares is required to be delivered under the 1933 Act any event occurs as a result of which the Prospectus, including any
 
amendments or supplements, would include an untrue statement of a material fact, or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, or if it is necessary at any time to amend the Prospectus, including any amendments or supplements thereto and including any revised prospectus which the Company proposes for use by the Underwriters in connection with the offering of the Shares which differs from the prospectus on file with the Commission at the time of effectiveness of the Registration Statement, whether or not such revised prospectus is required to be filed pursuant to Rule 424(b) to comply with the 1933 Act, the Company promptly will advise you thereof and will promptly prepare and file with the Commission an amendment or supplement which will correct such statement or omission or an amendment which will effect such compliance; and, in case any Underwriter is required to deliver a prospectus nine months or more after the effective date of the Registration Statement, the Company upon request, but at the expense of such Underwriter, will prepare promptly such prospectus or prospectuses as may be necessary to permit compliance with the requirements of Section 10(a)(3) of the 1933 Act.
     (d) If at any time following the issuance of an Issuer Free Writing Prospectus there occurred or occurs an event or development as a result of which such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus conflicted or would conflict with the information contained in the Registration Statement or included or would include an untrue statement of a material fact or omitted or would omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances prevailing at that subsequent time, not misleading, the Company will promptly notify the Representative and will promptly amend or supplement, at its own expense, such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus to eliminate or correct such conflict, untrue statement or omission.
     (e) Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries will acquire any capital stock of the Company prior to the earlier of the Second Closing Date or termination or expiration of the related options nor will the Company declare or pay any dividend or make any other distribution upon the Common Stock payable to stockholders of record on a date prior to the earlier of the Second Closing Date or termination or expiration of the related option, except in either case as contemplated by the Prospectus.
     (f) As soon as practicable, but not later than March 16, 2010 the Company will make generally available to its security holders an earnings statement (which need not be audited) covering a period of at least 12 months beginning after the effective date of the Registration Statement, which will satisfy the provisions of the last paragraph of Section 11(a) of the 1933 Act.
     (g) During such period as a prospectus is required by law to be delivered in connection with offers and sales of the Shares by an Underwriter or dealer, upon your request, the Company will furnish to you at its expense, subject to the provisions of subsection (d) hereof, copies of the Registration Statement, the Prospectus, any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus hereinafter defined, each preliminary prospectus and all amendments and supplements to any such documents in each case as soon as available and in such quantities as you may reasonably request, for the purposes contemplated by the 1933 Act.
     (h) The Company and the Selling Stockholders will cooperate with the Underwriters in qualifying or registering the Shares for sale under the blue sky laws of such jurisdictions as you designate, and will continue such qualifications in effect so long as reasonably required for the distribution of the Shares. The Company shall not be required to qualify as a foreign corporation or to file a general consent to service of process in any such jurisdiction where it is not currently qualified or where it would be subject to taxation as a foreign corporation.
 
     (i) Upon the request of the Representative and to the extent not publicly available on the Commission's EDGAR database, during the period of five years hereafter, the Company will furnish you and each of the other Underwriters with a copy (i) as soon as practicable after the filing thereof, of each report filed by the Company with the Commission, any securities exchange or FINRA; (ii) as soon as practicable after the release thereof, of each material press release in respect of the Company that is not disseminated via the Company's website or a national news service; and (iii) as soon as available, of each report of the Company mailed to stockholders.
     (j) The Company will use the proceeds received by it from the sale of the Shares being sold by it in the manner specified in the Prospectus.
     (k) If, at the time of effectiveness of the Registration Statement, any information shall have been omitted therefrom in reliance upon Rule 430B, then promptly following the execution of the Pricing Agreement, the Company will prepare, and file or transmit for filing with the Commission in accordance with such Rule 430B and Rule 424(b), copies of an amended Prospectus, or, if required by such Rule 430B, a post-effective amendment to the Registration Statement (including an amended Prospectus), containing all information so omitted. If required, the Company will prepare and file, or transmit for filing, a Rule 462(b) Registration Statement not later than the date of the execution of the Pricing Agreement. If a Rule 462(b) Registration Statement is filed, the Company shall make payment of, or arrange for payment of, the additional registration fee owing to the Commission required by Rule 111.
     (l) For so long as the Company is subject to the Exchange Act, the Company will comply with all registration, filing and reporting requirements of the Exchange Act and The NASDAQ Global Market; and the Company will comply in all material respects with all applicable provisions of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act.
     (m) For so long as the Company is subject to the Exchange Act, the Company will maintain such controls and other procedures, including without limitation those required by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act and the applicable regulations thereunder, that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Company in the reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the Commission's rules and forms, including without limitation, controls and procedures designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Company in the reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is accumulated and communicated to the Company's management, including its principal executive officer and its principal financial officer, or persons performing similar functions, as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure.
     (n) For so long as the Company is subject to the Exchange Act, the Company will maintain a system of internal accounting controls designed to provide reasonable assurance that: (i) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorizations; (ii) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and to maintain accountability for assets; (iii) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (iv) amounts reflected on the Company's consolidated balance sheet for assets is compared with existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences.
     (o) The Company agrees not to, directly or indirectly, (i) offer, sell (including "short" selling), assign, transfer, contract to sell, grant an option to purchase, establish an open
 
"put equivalent position" within the meaning of Rule 16a-1(h) under the Exchange Act, or otherwise dispose of any shares of Common Stock or securities convertible or exchangeable into, or exercisable for, Common Stock; or (ii) enter any swap or other arrangement that transfers all or a portion of the economic consequences associated with the ownership of any Common Stock (except, in each case, Common Stock sold pursuant to this Agreement or issued (A) pursuant to the Company's existing stock incentive plan, (B) pursuant to the Company's existing employee stock purchase plan, (C) upon conversion of currently outstanding convertible securities or (D) in connection with mergers, acquisitions or similar transactions so long as such issuances under this clause (D) are conditioned upon the execution by the recipients of an agreement with the Representative providing for transfer restrictions substantially similar to those contained in this paragraph (o)) without the prior written consent of the Representative for a period of 90 days (the "") after the date of the Rule 424 Prospectus; provided, however, that, for so long as NASD Rule 2711 or any similar or successor rule is in effect, if (1) during the last 17 days of the initial Lock-Up Period, the Company releases earnings results or material news or a material event relating to the Company occurs or (2) prior to the expiration of the initial Lock-Up Period, the Company announces that it will release earnings results during the 16-day period beginning on the last day of the initial Lock-Up Period, then in either case the Lock-Up Period will be extended until the expiration of the 18-day period beginning on the date of release of the earnings results or the occurrence of the material news or material event, as applicable, unless the Representative waives, in writing, such extension.
Lock-Up Period
           The Company represents and agrees that, unless it obtains the prior consent of the Representative, and each Underwriter, severally and not jointly, represents and agrees that, unless it obtains the prior consent of the Company and the Representative, it has not made and will not make any offer relating to the Shares that would constitute an "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433, or that would otherwise constitute a "free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 405, required to be filed with the Commission. Any such free writing prospectus consented to by the Representative or by the Company and the Representative, as the case may be, is hereinafter referred to as a "." The Company represents that it has treated and agrees that it will treat each Permitted Free Writing Prospectus as an "issuer free writing prospectus," as defined in Rule 433, and has complied and will comply with the requirements of Rule 433 applicable to any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, including timely filing with the Commission where required, legending and record-keeping.
Section
7. Covenants of the Company and the Underwriters.
Permitted Free Writing Prospectus
           Whether or not the transactions contemplated hereunder are consummated or this Agreement becomes effective as to all of its provisions or is terminated, the Company agrees to pay (i) all costs, fees and expenses (other than legal fees and disbursements of counsel for the Underwriters and the expenses incurred by the Underwriters) incurred in connection with the performance of the obligations of the Company and the Selling Stockholders hereunder, including without limiting the generality of the foregoing, all fees and expenses of legal counsel for the Company and the Selling Stockholders and of the Company's independent accountants, all costs and expenses incurred in connection with the preparation, printing, filing and distribution (including electronic delivery) of the Registration Statement, each preliminary prospectus, any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus and the Prospectus (including all exhibits and financial statements) and all amendments and supplements provided for herein, this Agreement, the Pricing Agreement and a blue sky memorandum, (ii) all reasonable third-party costs, fees and expenses (including reasonable legal fees and disbursements of outside counsel for the Underwriters) incurred by the Underwriters in connection with qualifying or registering all or any part of the Shares for offer and sale under blue sky laws, including clearance of such offering with FINRA; (iii) all fees and expenses of the Company's transfer agent, printing of the certificates for the Shares and all transfer taxes, if any, with respect to the sale and delivery of the Shares to the several Underwriters; and (iv) all third-party costs, fees and expenses (including
Section
8. Payment of Expenses.
 
without limitation any damages or other amounts payable in connection with legal or contractual liability) associated with the reforming of any contracts for sale of the Shares made by the Underwriters caused by a breach of the representation contained in the second paragraph of Section 2(b); , , that, except as provided in this Section 8, Section 10, Section 12 and Section 15 hereof, the Underwriters will pay all of their own costs and expenses, including the fees of their counsel (except as set forth above), stock transfer taxes on the resale of any Shares by them and any expenses relating to the publishing of "tombstone" advertisements.
provided
however
           The obligations of the several Underwriters to purchase and pay for the Firm Shares on the First Closing Date and the Option Shares on the Second Closing Date shall be subject to the accuracy of the representations and warranties on the part of the Company and each of the Selling Stockholders herein set forth as of the date hereof and as of the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, to the accuracy of the statements of officers of the Company made pursuant to the provisions hereof, to the performance by the Company and each of the Selling Stockholders of their respective obligations hereunder, and to the following additional conditions:
Section
9. Conditions of the Obligations of the Underwriters.
     (a) The Registration Statement shall have become effective either prior to the execution of this Agreement or not later than 1:00 P.M., Chicago Time, on the first full business day after the date of this Agreement, or such later time as shall have been consented to by you but in no event later than 1:00 P.M., Chicago Time, on the third full business day following the date hereof; and prior to the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall have been issued and no proceedings for that purpose shall have been instituted or shall be pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, the Selling Stockholders or you, shall be contemplated by the Commission. If the Company has elected to rely upon Rule 430B, the information concerning the public offering price of the Shares and price-related information, and such other information omitted from the Base Prospectus in reliance on Rule 430B, shall have been transmitted to the Commission for filing pursuant to Rule 424(b) in the manner and within the prescribed time period (without reliance on Rule 424(b)(8)) and the Company will provide evidence satisfactory to the Representative of such timely filing (or a post-effective amendment providing such information shall have been filed and declared effective in accordance with the requirements of Rules 430B and 424(b)). If a Rule 462(b) Registration Statement is required, such Registration Statement shall have been transmitted to the Commission for filing and become effective within the prescribed time period and, prior to the First Closing Date, the Company shall have provided evidence of such filing and effectiveness in accordance with Rule 462(b).
     (b) The Shares shall have been qualified for sale under the blue sky laws of such states as shall have been specified by the Representative.
     (c) The legality and sufficiency of the authorization, issuance and sale or transfer and sale of the Shares hereunder, the validity and form of the Shares, the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the Pricing Agreement, and all corporate proceedings and other legal matters incident thereto, and the form of the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package, any Issuer Limited Use Free Writing Prospectus and the Prospectus (except financial statements) shall have been approved by counsel for the Underwriters exercising reasonable judgment.
     (d) You shall not have advised the Company that the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package, any Issuer Limited Use Free Writing Prospectus, when considered together with the Disclosure Package, or the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto, contains
 
an untrue statement of fact, which, in the opinion of counsel for the Underwriters, is material or omits to state a fact which, in the opinion of such counsel, is material and is required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading.
     (e) Subsequent to the execution and delivery of this Agreement, there shall not have occurred any material adverse change, or any development involving a prospective material adverse change, in or affecting particularly the business or properties of the Company or its subsidiaries, taken as a whole, whether or not arising in the ordinary course of business, which, in the judgment of the Representative, makes it impractical or inadvisable to proceed with the public offering of the Shares as contemplated hereby.
     (f) There shall have been furnished to you, as Representative of the Underwriters, on the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, except as otherwise expressly provided below:
     (i) An opinion of Hogan & Hartson L.L.P., counsel for the Company, addressed to the Underwriters and dated the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Underwriters.
     (ii) A letter from Hogan & Hartson L.L.P., counsel for the Company, addressed to the Underwriters and dated the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Underwriters.
     (iii) Opinions of counsel for each of the Selling Stockholders, in each case addressed to the Underwriters and dated the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Underwriters.
     (iv) Such opinion or opinions of Sidley Austin LLP, counsel for the Underwriters, dated the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, with respect to the existence of the Company, the validity of the Shares, the Registration Statement, the Disclosure Package and the Prospectus and other related matters as you may reasonably require, and the Company shall have furnished to such counsel such documents and shall have exhibited to them such papers and records as they reasonably request for the purpose of enabling them to pass upon such matters.
     (v) A certificate of the chief executive officer and the principal financial officer of the Company, dated the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, to the effect that:
     (1) the representations and warranties of the Company set forth in Section 2 of this Agreement are true and correct as of the date of this Agreement and as of the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, and the Company has complied with all the agreements and satisfied all the conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied at or prior to such Closing Date;
     (2) the Commission has not issued an order preventing or suspending the use of the Prospectus or any preliminary prospectus filed as a part
 
of the Registration Statement or any amendment thereto; no stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued; and to the best knowledge of the respective signers, no proceedings for that purpose have been instituted or are pending or contemplated under the 1933 Act; and
     (3) subsequent to the date of the most recent financial statements included in the Registration Statement and Prospectuses, and except as set forth or contemplated in the Prospectuses, (A) none of the Company and its consolidated subsidiaries has incurred any material liabilities or obligations, direct or contingent, or entered into any material transactions not in the ordinary course of business, and (B) there has not been any change that has had or would reasonably be expected to have a material adverse effect upon the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or any material change in their short-term debt or long-term debt.
The delivery of the certificate provided for in this subparagraph shall be and constitute a representation and warranty of the Company as to the facts required in the immediately foregoing clauses (1), (2) and (3) to be set forth in said certificate.
     (vi) A certificate of each of the Selling Stockholders dated the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, to the effect that the representations and warranties of such Selling Stockholder set forth in Section 3 are true and correct as of such date and such Selling Stockholder has complied with all the agreements and satisfied all the conditions on the part of such Selling Stockholder to be performed or satisfied at or prior to such date.
     (vii) At the time the Pricing Agreement is executed and also on the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, there shall be delivered to you a letter addressed to you, as Representative of the Underwriters, from McGladrey & Pullen, LLP, an independent registered public accountant firm, the first one to be dated the date of the Pricing Agreement, the second one to be dated the First Closing Date and the third one (in the event of a second closing) to be dated the Second Closing Date, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Underwriters. There shall not have been any change or decrease specified in the letters referred to in this subparagraph which makes it impractical or inadvisable in the judgment of the Representative to proceed with the public offering or purchase of the Shares as contemplated hereby.
     (viii) A certificate of the chief executive officer and the principal financial officer of the Company, dated the First Closing Date or the Second Closing Date, as the case may be, regarding certain statistical or financial figures included in the Prospectus which you may reasonably request and which have not been otherwise verified by the letters referred to in clause (vii) above, such verification to include the provision of documentary evidence supporting any such statistical or financial figure.
     (ix) Such further certificates and documents as you may reasonably request.
          All such opinions, certificates, letters and documents shall be in compliance with the provisions hereof only if they are satisfactory to you and to Sidley Austin LLP, counsel for the Underwriters, which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld. The Company shall furnish you with such manually signed or conformed copies of such opinions, certificates, letters and documents as you request.
 
          If any condition to the Underwriters' obligations hereunder to be satisfied prior to or at the First Closing Date is not so satisfied, this Agreement at your election will terminate upon notification to the Company and the Selling Stockholders without liability on the part of any Underwriter or the Company or the Selling Stockholders, except for the expenses to be paid or reimbursed by the Company pursuant to Sections 8 and 10 hereof and except to the extent provided in Section 12 hereof.
           If the sale to the Underwriters of the Firm Shares on the First Closing Date is not consummated because any condition of the Underwriters' obligations hereunder is not satisfied or because of any refusal, inability or failure on the part of the Company or any of the Selling Stockholders to perform any agreement herein or to comply with any provision hereof, unless such failure to satisfy such condition or to comply with any provision hereof is due to the default or omission of any Underwriter, the Company agrees to reimburse you and the other Underwriters upon demand for all out-of-pocket expenses (including reasonable fees and disbursements of counsel) that shall have been reasonably incurred by you and them in connection with the proposed purchase and the sale of the Shares. Any such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party except that the provisions of this Section 10, Section 8 and Section 12 shall at all times be effective and shall apply.
Section
10. Reimbursement of Underwriters' Expenses.
           You and the Company will use your and its best efforts to cause the Registration Statement to become effective, if it has not yet become effective, and to prevent the issuance of any stop order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement and, if such stop order be issued, to obtain as soon as possible the lifting thereof.
Section
11. Effectiveness of Registration Statement.
           (a) The Company agrees to indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter and each person, if any, who controls any Underwriter within the meaning of the 1933 Act or the Exchange Act against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities, joint or several, to which such Underwriter or such controlling person may become subject under the 1933 Act, the Exchange Act or other federal or state statutory law or regulation, at common law or otherwise (including in settlement of any litigation if such settlement is effected with the written consent of the Company), insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in the Registration Statement, including the information deemed to be part of the Registration Statement at the time specified in Rule 430B, any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact, in the case of the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement thereto, required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading and, in the case of any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; and will reimburse each Underwriter and each such controlling person for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such Underwriter or such controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action; provided, however, that the Company will not be liable in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission made in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by or on behalf of any Underwriter through the Representative, specifically for use therein. In addition to its other obligations under this Section 12(a), the Company agrees that, as an interim measure during the pendency of any claim, action, investigation, inquiry or other proceeding arising out of or based upon any statement or omission, or any alleged statement or omission, described in this Section 12(a), it will reimburse the Underwriters on a monthly basis for all reasonable legal and other expenses incurred in
Section
12. Indemnification.
 
connection with investigating or defending any such claim, action, investigation, inquiry or other proceeding, notwithstanding the absence of a judicial determination as to the propriety and enforceability of the Company's obligation to reimburse the Underwriters for such expenses and the possibility that such payments might later be held to have been improper by a court of competent jurisdiction. This indemnity agreement will be in addition to any liability which the Company may otherwise have.
          (b) Each of the Selling Stockholders agrees severally and not jointly in proportion to the number of Shares to be sold by such Selling Stockholder hereunder to indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter and each person, if any, who controls any Underwriter within the meaning of the 1933 Act or the Exchange Act against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities, joint or several, to which such Underwriter or such controlling person may become subject under the 1933 Act, the Exchange Act or other federal or state statutory law or regulation, at common law or otherwise (including in settlement of any litigation if such settlement is effected with the written consent of such Selling Stockholder), insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in the Registration Statement, including the information deemed to be part of the Registration Statement at the time specified in Rule 430B, any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact about the Selling Stockholder required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein about the Selling Stockholder not misleading; and will reimburse each Underwriter and each such controlling person for any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by such Underwriter or such controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action; provided, however, that the obligations under this Section 12(b) shall only apply to untrue statements or omissions, or alleged untrue statements or omissions, made in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto in reliance upon and in conformity with written information relating to such Selling Stockholder furnished to the Company by such Selling Stockholder expressly for use therein (and the parties hereto agree that the only information included in the foregoing documents in reliance upon and in conformity with written information relating to such Selling Stockholder furnished to the Company by such Selling Stockholder expressly for use therein is the information relating to such Selling Stockholder set forth under the caption "Beneficial Ownership of Common Stock and Selling Stockholders" and the footnotes thereunder (excluding any percentages set forth therein); provided, further, that such Selling Stockholder will not be liable in any such case to the extent that any such loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon an untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission made in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Prospectus or any amendment or supplement thereto in reliance upon and in conformity with written information furnished to the Company by or on behalf of any Underwriter through the Representative, specifically for use therein. In addition to its other obligations under this Section 12(b), each of the Selling Stockholders agrees that, as an interim measure during the pendency of any claim, action, investigation, inquiry or other proceeding arising out of or based upon any statement or omission, or any alleged statement or omission, described in this Section 12(b), it will reimburse the Underwriters on a monthly basis for all reasonable legal and other expenses incurred in connection with investigating or defending any such claim, action, investigation, inquiry or other proceeding, notwithstanding the absence of a judicial determination as to the propriety and enforceability of such Selling Stockholder's obligation to reimburse the Underwriters for such expenses and the possibility that such payments might later be held to have been improper by a court of competent jurisdiction. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 12(b), in no event shall the liability of a Selling Stockholder exceed the net proceeds actually received by such Selling Stockholder from the sale of Shares in the Offering. This indemnity agreement will be in addition to any liability which such Selling Stockholder may otherwise have.
 
          (c) Each Underwriter will severally indemnify and hold harmless the Company, each of its directors, each of its officers who signed the Registration Statement, the Selling Stockholders and each person, if any, who controls the Company within the meaning of the 1933 Act or the Exchange Act, against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities to which the Company, or any such director, officer, Selling Stockholder or controlling person may become subject under the 1933 Act, the Exchange Act or other federal or state statutory law or regulation, at common law or otherwise (including in settlement of any litigation, if such settlement is effected with the written consent of such Underwriter), insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (or actions in respect thereof) arise out of or are based upon any untrue or alleged untrue statement of any material fact contained in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, or arise out of or are based upon the omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact , in the case of the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement thereto, required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading and, in the case of any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto, necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, in each case to the extent, but only to the extent, that such untrue statement or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission was made in the Registration Statement, any preliminary prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, the Prospectus, or any amendment or supplement thereto in reliance upon and in conformity with Section 4 of this Agreement or any other written information furnished to the Company by such Underwriter through the Representative specifically for use in the preparation thereof; and will reimburse any legal or other expenses reasonably incurred by the Company, or any such director, officer, Selling Stockholder or controlling person in connection with investigating or defending any such loss, claim, damage, liability or action. In addition to their other obligations under this Section 12(c), the Underwriters agree that, as an interim measure during the pendency of any claim, action, investigation, inquiry or other proceeding arising out of or based upon any statement or omission, or any alleged statement or omission, described in this Section 12(c), they will reimburse the Company and the Selling Stockholders on a monthly basis for all reasonable legal and other expenses incurred in connection with investigating or defending any such claim, action, investigation, inquiry or other proceeding, notwithstanding the absence of a judicial determination as to the propriety and enforceability of the Underwriters' obligation to reimburse the Company and the Selling Stockholders for such expenses and the possibility that such payments might later be held to have been improper by a court of competent jurisdiction. This indemnity agreement will be in addition to any liability which such Underwriter may otherwise have.
          (d) Promptly after receipt by an indemnified party under this Section 12 of notice of the commencement of any action, such indemnified party will, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against an indemnifying party under this Section 12, notify the indemnifying party of the commencement thereof; but the omission so to notify the indemnifying party will not relieve it from any liability which it may have to any indemnified party except to the extent that the indemnifying party was prejudiced by such failure to notify. In case any such action is brought against any indemnified party, and it notifies an indemnifying party of the commencement thereof, the indemnifying party will be entitled to participate in, and, to the extent that it may wish, jointly with all other indemnifying parties similarly notified, to assume the defense thereof, with counsel reasonably satisfactory to such indemnified party; provided, however, if the defendants in any such action include both the indemnified party and the indemnifying party and the indemnified party shall have reasonably concluded based on the advice of outside counsel that there may be legal defenses available to it and/or other indemnified parties which are different from or additional to those available to the indemnifying party, or the indemnified and indemnifying parties may have conflicting interests which would make it inappropriate for the same counsel to represent both of them, the indemnified party or parties shall have the right to select separate counsel to assume such legal defense and otherwise to participate in the defense of such action on behalf of such indemnified party or parties. Upon receipt of notice from the indemnifying party to such indemnified party of its
 
election so to assume the defense of such action and approval by the indemnified party of counsel, the indemnifying party will not be liable to such indemnified party under this Section 12 for any legal or other expenses subsequently incurred by such indemnified party in connection with the defense thereof unless (i) the indemnified party shall have employed such counsel in connection with the assumption of legal defense in accordance with the proviso to the next preceding sentence (it being understood, however, that the indemnifying party shall not be liable for the expenses of more than one separate counsel, approved by the Representative in the case of paragraph (a) representing all indemnified parties not having different or additional defenses or potential conflicting interest among themselves who are parties to such action), (ii) the indemnifying party shall not have employed counsel reasonably satisfactory to the indemnified party to represent the indemnified party within a reasonable time after notice of commencement of the action or (iii) the indemnifying party has authorized the employment of counsel for the indemnified party at the expense of the indemnifying party. No indemnifying party shall, without the prior written consent of the indemnified party, effect any settlement of any pending or threatened proceeding in respect of which any indemnified party is or could have been a party and indemnity could have been sought hereunder by such indemnified party, unless such settlement includes an unconditional release of such indemnified party from all liability arising out of such proceeding.
          (e) If the indemnification provided for in this Section 12 is unavailable to an indemnified party under paragraphs (a), (b) or (c) hereof in respect of any losses, claims, damages or liabilities referred to therein, then each applicable indemnifying party, in lieu of indemnifying such indemnified party, shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such indemnified party as a result of such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (i) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company, the Selling Stockholders and the Underwriters from the offering of the Shares or (ii) if the allocation provided by clause (i) above is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause (i) above but also the relative fault of the Company, the Selling Stockholders and the Underwriters in connection with the statements or omissions which resulted in such losses, claims, damages or liabilities, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The respective relative benefits received by the Company, the Selling Stockholders and the Underwriters shall be deemed to be in the same proportion, in the case of the Company and the Selling Stockholders, as the total price paid to the Company and the Selling Stockholders for the Shares by the Underwriters (net of underwriting discount but before deducting expenses) bears to, and in the case of the Underwriters, as the underwriting discount received by them bears to, the total of such amounts paid to the Company and the Selling Stockholders and received by the Underwriters as underwriting discount, in each case as contemplated by the Prospectus. The relative fault of the Company, the Selling Stockholders and the Underwriters shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company, the Selling Stockholders or the Underwriters and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission. The amount paid or payable by a party as a result of the losses, claims, damages and liabilities referred to above shall be deemed to include any legal or other fees or expenses reasonably incurred by such party in connection with investigating or defending any action or claim.
          The Company, each of the Selling Stockholders and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this Section 12(e) were determined by pro rata allocation or by any other method of allocation which does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to in the immediately preceding paragraph. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 12(e), no Underwriter shall be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total price at which the Shares underwritten by it and distributed to the public were offered to the public exceeds the amount of any damages which such Underwriter has otherwise been required to pay by reason of such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission. No person
 
guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the 1933 Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. The Underwriters' obligations to contribute pursuant to this Section 12(e) are several in proportion to their respective underwriting commitments and not joint.
          (f) The provisions of this Section 12 shall survive any termination of this Agreement.
          It shall be a condition to the agreement and obligation of the Company and each of the Selling Stockholders to sell and deliver the Shares hereunder, and of each Underwriter to purchase the Shares hereunder, that, except as hereinafter in this paragraph provided, each of the Underwriters shall purchase and pay for all Shares agreed to be purchased by such Underwriter hereunder upon tender to the Representative of all such Shares in accordance with the terms hereof. If any Underwriter or Underwriters default in their obligations to purchase Shares hereunder on the First Closing Date and the aggregate number of Shares which such defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters agreed but failed to purchase does not exceed 10 percent of the total number of Shares which the Underwriters are obligated to purchase on the First Closing Date, the Representative may make arrangements satisfactory to the Company and the Selling Stockholders for the purchase of such Shares by other persons, including any of the Underwriters, but if no such arrangements are made by such date the nondefaulting Underwriters shall be obligated severally, in proportion to their respective commitments hereunder, to purchase the Shares which such defaulting Underwriters agreed but failed to purchase on such date. If any Underwriter or Underwriters so default and the aggregate number of Shares with respect to which such default or defaults occur is more than the above percentage and arrangements satisfactory to the Representative, the Company and the Selling Stockholders for the purchase of such Shares by other persons are not made within 36 hours after such default, this Agreement will terminate without liability on the part of any nondefaulting Underwriter or the Company or the Selling Stockholders, except for the expenses to be paid by the Company pursuant to Section 8 hereof and except to the extent provided in Section 12 hereof.
Section 13. Default of Underwriters.
          In the event that Shares to which a default relates are to be purchased by the nondefaulting Underwriters or by another party or parties, the Representative or the Company shall have the right to postpone the First Closing Date for not more than seven business days in order that the necessary changes in the Registration Statement, Prospectus and any other documents, as well as any other arrangements, may be effected. As used in this Agreement, the term "Underwriter" includes any person substituted for an Underwriter under this Section 13. Nothing herein will relieve a defaulting Underwriter from liability for its default.
           This Agreement shall become effective immediately as to Sections 8, 10, 12 and 15 and as to all other provisions at 10:00 A.M., Chicago Time, on the day following the date upon which the Pricing Agreement is executed and delivered, unless such a day is a Saturday, Sunday or holiday (and in that event this Agreement shall become effective at such hour on the business day next succeeding such Saturday, Sunday or holiday); but this Agreement shall nevertheless become effective at such earlier time after the Pricing Agreement is executed and delivered as you may determine on and by notice to the Company or by release of any Shares for sale to the public. For the purposes of this Section 14, the Shares shall be deemed to have been so released upon the release for publication of any newspaper advertisement relating to the Shares or upon the release by you of written communications (i) advising Underwriters that the Shares are released for public offering, or (ii) offering the Shares for sale to securities dealers, whichever may occur first.
Section
14. Effective Date.
           Without limiting the right to terminate this Agreement pursuant to any other provision hereof:
Section
15. Termination.
 
     (a) This Agreement may be terminated by the Company by notice to you and the Selling Stockholders or by you by notice to the Company and the Selling Stockholders at any time prior to the time this Agreement shall become effective as to all its provisions, and any such termination shall be without liability on the part of the Company or the Selling Stockholders to any Underwriter (except for the expenses to be paid or reimbursed pursuant to Section 8 hereof and except to the extent provided in Section 12 hereof) or of any Underwriter to the Company or the Selling Stockholders.
     (b) This Agreement may also be terminated by you prior to the First Closing Date, and the options referred to in Section 5, if exercised, may be cancelled at any time prior to the Second Closing Date, if (i) trading in securities on the New York Stock Exchange or The Nasdaq Stock Market shall have been suspended or minimum prices shall have been established on such exchange or market, or (ii) a banking moratorium shall have been declared by Illinois, New York, or United States authorities, or (iii) there shall have been any material adverse change in financial markets or any material adverse change in political, economic or financial conditions which, in the opinion of the Representative, either renders it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the offering and sale of the Shares on the terms set forth in the Prospectus or materially and adversely affects the market for the Shares, or (iv) there shall have been an outbreak of major armed hostilities between the United States and any foreign power or terrorist organization which in the opinion of the Representative makes it impractical or inadvisable to offer or sell the Shares. Any termination pursuant to this paragraph (b) shall be without liability on the part of any Underwriter to the Company or the Selling Stockholders or on the part of the Company or the Selling Stockholders to any Underwriter (except for expenses to be paid or reimbursed pursuant to Section 8 hereof and except to the extent provided in Section 12 hereof).
           The respective indemnities, agreements, representations, warranties and other statements of the Company, of its officers, of the Selling Stockholders and of the several Underwriters set forth in or made pursuant to this Agreement will remain in full force and effect, regardless of any investigation made by or on behalf of any Underwriter, Selling Stockholder or the Company or any of its or their partners, principals, members, officers or directors or any controlling person, and will survive delivery of and payment for the Shares sold hereunder.
Section
16. Representations and Indemnities to Survive Delivery.
           All communications hereunder will be in writing and, if sent to the Underwriters will be mailed, delivered or telegraphed and confirmed to you c/o William Blair & Company, L.L.C., 222 West Adams Street, Chicago, Illinois 60606, with a copy to Robert L. Verigan, c/o Sidley Austin LLP, One South Dearborn Street, Chicago, Illinois 60603; if sent to the Company will be mailed, delivered or telegraphed and confirmed to the Company at its corporate headquarters with a copy to Michael J. Silver, c/o Hogan & Hartson L.L.P., 111 South Calvert Street, Suite 1600, Baltimore, MD 21202; if sent to one of the Selling Stockholders, will be mailed, delivered or telegraphed and confirmed to such Selling Stockholders at such address as they have previously furnished to the Company and the Representative.
Section
17. Notices.
           . The Company and each of the Selling Stockholders acknowledges and agrees that (a) the purchase and sale of the Shares pursuant to this Agreement, including the determination of the public offering price of the Shares and any related discounts and commissions, is an arm's-length commercial transaction between the Company and the Selling Stockholders, on the one hand, and the several Underwriters, on the other hand, (b) in connection with the offering of the Shares contemplated by this Agreement and the process leading to such transaction each Underwriter is and has been acting solely as a principal and is not the agent or fiduciary of the Company, the Selling Stockholders, or its or their stockholders, creditors, employees or any other
Section
18. No Advisory or Fiduciary Relationship
 
party, (c) no Underwriter has assumed or will assume an advisory or fiduciary responsibility in favor of the Company or the Selling Stockholders with respect to the offering of the Shares contemplated by this Agreement or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether such Underwriter has advised or is currently advising the Company on other matters) and no Underwriter has any obligation to the Company or the Selling Stockholders with respect to the offering of the Shares contemplated by this Agreement except the obligations expressly set forth in this Agreement, (d) the Underwriters and their respective affiliates may be engaged in a broad range of transactions that involve interests that differ from those of the Company and the Selling Stockholders and (e) the Underwriters have not provided any legal, accounting, regulatory or tax advice with respect to the offering of the Shares contemplated by this Agreement and the Company and the Selling Stockholders have consulted its and their own legal, accounting, regulatory and tax advisors to the extent it and they deemed appropriate.
           This Agreement and the Pricing Agreement will inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective successors, personal representatives and assigns, and to the benefit of the officers and directors and controlling persons referred to in Section 12, and no other person will have any right or obligation hereunder. The term "successors" shall not include any purchaser of the Shares as such from any of the Underwriters merely by reason of such purchase.
Section
19. Successors.
           You will act as Representative for the several Underwriters in connection with this financing, and any action under or in respect of this Agreement taken by you will be binding upon all the Underwriters.
Section
20. Representation of Underwriters.
           If any section, paragraph or provision of this Agreement is for any reason determined to be invalid or unenforceable, such determination shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other section, paragraph or provision hereof.
Section
21. Partial Unenforceability.
           This Agreement and the Pricing Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Illinois.
Section
22. Applicable Law.
 
     If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, kindly sign and return to us the enclosed duplicates hereof, whereupon it will become a binding agreement among the Company, the Selling Stockholders and the several Underwriters including you, all in accordance with its terms.
 
The foregoing Agreement is hereby confirmed and accepted as of the date first above written.
William Blair & Company, L.L.C.
Acting as Representative of the several Underwriters named in Schedule A.
 
 
 
 
Exhibit A
, 2008
                    
William Blair & Company, L.L.C.
  As Representative of the Several   Underwriters
c/o William Blair & Company, L.L.C. 222 West Adams Street Chicago, Illinois 60606
Ladies and Gentlemen:
          Reference is made to the Underwriting Agreement dated December 9, 2008 (the ) relating to the sale by the Selling Stockholders, and the purchase by the several Underwriters for whom William Blair & Company, L.L.C. is acting as representative (the ), of the above Shares. All terms herein shall have the definitions contained in the Underwriting Agreement except as otherwise defined herein.
"Underwriting Agreement"
"Representative"
          Pursuant to Section 5 of the Underwriting Agreement, the Company and each of the Selling Stockholders agrees with the Representative as follows:
          1. The public offering price per share for the Shares shall be $.
                    
          2. The purchase price per share for the Shares to be paid by the several Underwriters shall be $, being an amount equal to the public offering price set forth above less $ per share.
                    
                    
 
 
          If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding of our agreement, kindly sign and return to us the enclosed duplicates hereof, whereupon it will become a binding agreement among the Company, the Selling Stockholders and the several Underwriters, including you, all in accordance with its terms.
 
The foregoing Agreement is hereby confirmed and accepted as of the date first above written.
William Blair & Company, L.L.C.
Acting as Representative of the several Underwriters named in Schedule A to the Underwriting Agreement.
By:
William Blair & Company, L.L.C.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20090129160541.txt.gz
TIME:20090129160541
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
January 23, 2009
(Date of earliest event reported) 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item 5.02     Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On January 23, 2009, the Board of Directors of American Public Education, Inc. increased the size of the Board from seven to eight members and appointed Timothy Landon to serve as a director of the Company until the 2009 annual meeting of stockholders and until his successor is duly elected and qualified.
Consistent with the Companys compensation policy for non-employee directors, Mr. Landon will be compensated under the terms of the Companys compensation policy for non-employee directors as in effect from time to time, which currently provides for an annual retainer of $32,250. The annual retainer is payable in quarterly installments, and Mr. Landon will have the alternative to elect to receive his annual retainer in common stock having the same value as the portion of the annual retainer to be paid. Non-employee directors also receive an annual grant to each director of restricted stock having a value of $36,750 on the date of delivery.
In connection with Mr. Landons appointment to the Board, he and the Company are entering into the Companys standard form of indemnification agreement for executive officers and directors, the form of which was previously filed as Exhibit 10.3 to the Companys registration statement on Form S-1 (File No. 333-145185).
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
2

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Announces Addition to its Board of Directors
CHARLES TOWN, W.Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--January 29, 2009--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System, which operates through American Military University and American Public University  today announced the election of Timothy J. Landon to its Board of Directors.
Mr. Landon retired from the Tribune Company in February 2008, after having served in a variety of positions within the Tribune organization, including most recently as President of Tribune Interactive, Inc. from March 2004 until February 2008, where he was responsible for overall interactive and classified advertising strategy, technology and operations for the Tribune Company, including the companys print and online classified businesses and the interactive operations of more than 50 news and information websites.
We are pleased that Tim Landon has accepted a position on American Public Educations Board. He brings with him a wealth of experience and expertise, particularly in interactive media, which will make him a great asset to the Board, said Phillip A. Clough, APEIs Chairman.
About American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, comprises two universities  (AMU) and (APU). Regionally and nationally accredited, APUS serves more than 41,000 part-time students who live and work in all 50 states and more than 100 countries; and offers 73 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
CONTACT: Chris Symanoskie Director, Investor Relations 703-334-3880
American Public Education, Inc.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20090310162536.txt.gz
TIME:20090310162536
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
March 10, 2009
(Date of earliest event reported) 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
On March 10, 2009, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2008.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 5:00 p.m. EST on March 10, 2009 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports Fourth Quarter and Year End 2008 Results
Revenues Increase 49% in Fourth Quarter 2008 Compared to the Prior Year Period
CHARLES TOWN, W.V.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--March 10, 2009--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System, which operates through American Military University and American Public University  announced strong financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2008.
Recent Highlights:
The Company announced net course registrations of approximately 41,850 in the fourth quarter of 2008, a year-over-year increase of 50%.
Net course registrations from new students in the fourth quarter of 2008 increased to approximately 9,950, an increase of 44% over the same period of 2007.
As of December 31, 2008, a total of approximately 45,200 students were enrolled in American Public University System.
American Public Education reported fourth quarter 2008 revenues increased 49% to $31.5 million, compared to $21.2 million in the fourth quarter of 2007.
Income from operations before interest income and income tax in the fourth quarter of 2008 increased to $8.3 million, compared to $5.1 million in the same period of 2007. Operating margin in the fourth quarter of 2008 increased to 26.3%, compared to 24.2% in the fourth quarter of 2007.
Net income for the fourth quarter of 2008 increased to $5.0 million or $0.27 per diluted share, compared to $3.0 million or $0.19 per diluted share in the same period of 2007. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the fourth quarter of 2008 and 2007 were approximately 18.9 million and 15.9 million, respectively.
Wallace E. Boston, Jr., Chief Executive Officer of American Public Education, Inc., stated, We are pleased with our continued strong financial results, especially in light of todays global financial challenges. Much of our success can be attributed to our providing affordable, high-quality degree programs to the military and public service communities.
Moreover, the high value of our degree programs, together with our open access and convenient semester starts, make the goal of becoming a college graduate more attainable for a broader population of students interested in everything from business, to information technology, to liberal arts. As a result, we are very excited about our prospects for continued growth in enrollments and quality programs offered. We believe we have the right business model, the right education model and the right strategy to meet the personal and professional needs of our students, and to achieve our stated long-term growth goals.
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the fourth quarter of 2008 increased 49% to $31.5 million, compared to total revenues of $21.2 million in the fourth quarter of 2007. Income from operations before interest income and income tax in the fourth quarter of 2008 increased to $8.3 million, compared to $5.1 million in the same period of 2007. Operating margin in the fourth quarter of 2008 increased to 26.3%, compared to 24.2% in the fourth quarter of 2007. Stock-based compensation expense reduced operating income by $432,000 in the fourth quarter of 2008 and $279,000 in the fourth quarter of 2007.
Net income for the fourth quarter of 2008 increased to $5.0 million or $0.27 per diluted share, which includes $282,000 or $0.01 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $3.0 million or $0.19 per diluted share for the fourth quarter of 2007, including $229,000 or $0.01 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the fourth quarter of 2008 and 2007 were approximately 18.9 million and 15.9 million, respectively.
For the twelve months ended December 31, 2008, total revenues were $107.1 million, an increase of 55% compared to total revenues of $69.1 million in the same period of 2007. Income from operations before interest income and income tax for the twelve months ended December 31, 2008 increased to $25.7 million, compared to $14.7 million in the same period of 2007. Operating margin increased to 24.0% in the year 2008, compared to 21.3% in the same period of 2007. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each period's operating income by $1.7 million and $1.0, respectively.
Net income for the twelve months ended December 31, 2008 increased to $16.2 million or $0.86 per diluted share, which includes $1.1 million or $0.06 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $8.8 million or $0.64 per diluted share for the full year 2007, including $835,000 or $0.06 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the twelve months ended December 31, 2008 and 2007 were approximately 18.8 million and 13.6 million, respectively.
Total cash and cash equivalents at December 31, 2008 were $47.7 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the twelve months ended December 31, 2008 was $29.8 million, compared to $17.5 million in the same period of 2007. Capital expenditures were $10.0 million for the twelve months ended December 31, 2008, which compares to $6.8 million in capital expenditures in the same period of 2007. Depreciation and amortization was $4.2 million for the twelve months ended December 31, 2008 and $2.8 million for the same period of 2007.
Note: Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty. Total student enrollment is the number of students who have completed at least one course in the last 12 months or are in the start of the second week of class for the most current semester.
First Quarter 2009 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
The Company expects net course registrations from new students of approximately 10,500 and net course registrations of approximately 46,300 in the quarter ending March 31, 2009.
The Companys first quarter 2009 revenue is expected to be between $31.8 million and $32.5 million.
The Company estimates that first quarter 2009 net income, including stock-based compensation expense, will be between $4.6 million and $4.8 million or between $0.24 and $0.26 per diluted share. The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding is expected to be approximately 19.0 million shares in the three month period ending March 31, 2009.
Full Year 2009 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
The Company anticipates net course registrations from new students of 50,700 or more and total net course registrations of 202,500 or more in the twelve month period ending December 31, 2009.
The Company expects full year 2009 revenues to be between $146 million and $150 million.
The Company estimates that full year 2009 net income, including stock-based compensation expense, will be between $22.2 million and $22.8 million or between $1.16 and $1.20 per diluted share. The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding is expected to be between 19.0 and 19.2 million shares in the twelve month period ending December 31, 2009.
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys fourth quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast at 5:00 p.m. Eastern time today. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
About American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, comprises two universities  (AMU) and (APU). Regionally and nationally accredited, APUS serves more than 45,200 part-time students who live and work in all 50 states and more than 100 countries; and offers 74 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements under the heading Full Year 2009 Outlook" and First Quarter 2009 Outlook above and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304.724.3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Director, Investor Relations 703.334.3880
American Public Education, Inc.

Exhibit 99.2
1 Online Higher Education Built To Succeed March 10, 2009 Fourth Quarter 2008 Conference Call
2 Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect, "intend", "may", "should, "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on the slides First Quarter 2009 Outlook and Full Year 2009 Outlook and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future. Safe Harbor Statement Built To Succeed
3 A Strong Year for American Public University System Strong Growth in Niche Civilian Markets APUS received approval to be a Liberal Arts Degree Granting Institution by HLC Specialty accreditation: School of Business became candidate for accreditation by ACBSP Emergency & Disaster Management program received specialty accreditation from FoHE Child & Family Development program received specialty accreditation from NCFR Expanded Military Market Dominance   Navy College Program Distance Learning Partnership (NCPDLP) AMU makes Top 20 List of Military-Friendly Universities Military Programs VP elected Council of Colleges and Military Educators President New Programs and Specializations Launched Education Degrees, Concentrations and Certifications Associates Degrees B.S. Criminal Justice in Forensics
4 Net Course Registrations, Graduation and Enrollment Body: For the three months ended December 31, 2007 2008 % Change  Net Course Registrations from New Students 6,890 9,950 44%  Net Course Registrations 27, 830 41,850 50%  For the twelve months ended December 31,  2007 2008 % Change  Net Course Registrations from New Students 24,700 36,750 49%  Net Course Registrations 94,850 147,120 55%  As of December 31, 2007 2008 % Change  Total Student Enrollment 30,130 45,200 50%
5 Military Market Exceeding Expectations     Rank by Enrollments1  Army:   #42  Navy:   #52  Air Force:   #1  Marines:   #1   Total DoD:  #1       1Source:  CCME 2008 & Company Estimates   1-5% Military Market Growth1 Militarys Growing Online Focus Increasing Participation Rates    AMUs military market share increased from 10% to 12% in 2008   Increased market share can be achieved by: Executing AMUs existing strategies Expanding partnership with Navy Launching new degree programs & entering new segments   2Includes UMUCs enrollments in the Far East and Europe
6 Built To Succeed in Civilian Markets   Affordability resonates with civilians Unique approaches to niche markets Enter new markets & segments Launch new degrees & specializations Expand referral programs   Title IV Registration Growth:               101% Growth   (Registrations in Thousands) 2007 2008 NCR 10.2 20.5 25 20 15 10 5 0
7 Students by School:  APUS Student Population   A Unique and Diversified Product Offering 74 Total degree programs, including liberal arts 7 Schools within APU and AMU  Focus on Key Influencers and Customer Satisfaction Drive High Referral Rates Referral Rate: Over 50% Retention Rate Improvement: 0.4% increase  Applications by Source:     At December 31, 2008  Others  Print Ads  Internet/ Web Site  Referrals  Science & Technology 9% Education 1% Public Safety & Health 26% Arts & Humanities 21% Security & Global Studies 19% Management 14% Business 10%
8 National Survey of Student Engagement (NSSE)  How do seniors rate their entire educational experience? Would seniors attend the same institution if they could start over again? Administered by Indiana University Center for Postsecondary Research 769 NSSE Institutions and 478,079 students responding  APUS Online Peers NSSE Institutions   Poor Fair Good Excellent APUS 0% 2% 27% 70% Online Peers 2% 7% 37% 54% NSSE Institutions 2% 12% 48% 38%   Definitely No Probably No Probably yes Definitely yes APUS 1% 3% 22% 75% Online Peers 2% 7% 30% 60% NSSE Institutions 5% 13% 38% 44%  APUS Online Peers NSSE Institutions
9 Registrations by Source:  Students by Status:  Military 68%  Civilian 18%  Military- Affiliated 14%  A Student Population with Stable Funding Sources      At December 31, 2008  Military: Active Duty Military DoD Tuition Assistance (TA)   Civilians:  Civilian & Military-Affiliated   Federal Student Aid (Title IV)   Veterans Education Benefits (VA) Cash & Other Cash from VA Benefits, Grants and Out of Pocket Corporate Tuition Reimbursement (approx 1% of revenues) Private Loans     Cash & Other 20% FSA 14% Private Loans 1% TA/VA 65% TA/VA 65% FSA 14% Cash & Other 20% Private Loans 1%
10 Staying Ahead of The Curve   Body: Other Recent Successes: Completed follow-on offerings Appointment of Timothy J. Landon to Board of Directors Company is Sarbanes Oxley Compliant  2009 Initiatives   Continue to improve retention, especially in first 3 classes Launch several new degree programs and specializations Prepare for entry into new market segments
APEI in Strong Financial Position    Rapid revenue growth driven by continued strong registration growth Operating margin improvement Selling & Promotional Costs Instructional Costs General & Administrative Strong Balance Sheet: No long-term debt Increasing cash balance Purchase and build new facilities in Charles Town in 2009 Company introduces first quarter and year end 2009 guidance
12 APEI has achieved rapid growth in student registrations in a challenging economic environment Net Course Registrations Strong Student Population Growth 55% Growth (in thousands)   2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 NCR 19.0 25.6 32.6 37.5 54.8 94.8 147.1
13 APEI has consistently experienced strong revenue growth Revenues Built For Predictable Growth 55% Growth ($ in millions)    2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 Rev 10.7 17.8 23.1 28.2 40.0 69.1 107.1
14 Improvements in Operating Leverage
15 Seasonality in TA and Civilian Registrations  DoD Budget Year End  The Fall season is peak enrollment period for civilian and active duty students   January February March April May June July August September October November December TA 7,128 6,479 6,732 7,379 6,477 6,292 7,551 7,131 8,449 9,277 8,776 7,642 NonTA 4,449 4,007 4,296 4,572 4,474 4,066 5,012 4,941 5,843 5,836 5,427 4,892  Net Course Registrations by Month
16 Operating income growth has increased faster than revenue growth  Built For Improving Operating Performance  75% Growth  Income from continuing operations before interest income and income tax  (1) Excludes a $3.1 million write-off of capitalized software development costs in 2006.    ($ in millions)   2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 Rev 1.9 3.6 2.2 6.0 14.7 25.7
17 Strong Balance Sheet with No Debt        2007  2008 Cash & Cash Equivalents  $27.0  $47.7  Total Assets   $49.0  $78.8 Total Long-Term Debt  $0  $0 Other Items: Depreciation and Amortization $2.8  $4.2 CAPEX    $6.8  $10.0   ($ in millions)
18 The following statements are based on current expectations.  These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.      First Quarter 2009 % Growth Net Course Registrations from New Students approx.  10,500 40% Net Course Registrations approx.  46,300 40%  Total Revenue $31.8 to $32.5 million 37%-40% Net Income (1) $4.6 to $4.8 million 35%-41% EPS  Diluted (1) $0.24 to $0.26 Weighted Ave. Shares Outstanding approx. 19.0 million shares First Quarter 2009 % Growth Net Course Registrations from New Students approx.  10,500 40% Net Course Registrations approx.  46,300 40%  Total Revenue $31.8 to $32.5 million 37%-40% Net Income (1) $4.6 to $4.8 million 35%-41% EPS  Diluted (1) $0.24 to $0.26 Weighted Ave. Shares Outstanding approx. 19.0 million shares   Company Introduces First Quarter 2009 Outlook     (1) Includes stock-based compensation expense of approximately $525,000
19 The following statements are based on current expectations.  These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.         Full Year 2009 % Growth Net Course Registrations from New Students 50,700 or more 38%+ Net Course Registrations 202,500 or more 38%+  Total Revenue $146 to $150 million 36%-40% EBIT $36.2 to $37.0 million 41%-44% Net Income (1) $22.2 to $22.8 million 37%-41% EPS  Diluted (1) $1.16 to $1.20 Weighted Ave. Shares Outstanding: 19.0 to 19.2 million shares   Depreciation and Amortization Expense $5.3 to 5.5 million 25%-30%   Capital Expenditures   $8 to 10 million*  *excludes approximately $10 million of possible new real estate expenditures over the next 18-24 months.   Company Introduces Full Year 2009 Outlook     (1) Includes stock-based compensation expense of approximately $2.2 million
20 Built With A Simple, Sensible Strategy Body: Continue success in military market Expand in select civilian markets Utilize targeted approach to advertising Launch new programs Enter new market segments  APEI has a blueprint for the future
21 Proprietary - Not for duplication


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20090507172434.txt.gz
TIME:20090507172434
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
May 7, 2009
(Date of earliest event reported) 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On May 7, 2009, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter ended March 31,2009.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 5:00 p.m. EST on May 7, 2009 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports First Quarter 2009 Results
Net Income Increases 53% in First Quarter 2009 Compared to the Prior Year Period
CHARLES TOWN, W. Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--May 7, 2009--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System, which operates through American Military University and American Public University  announced strong financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2009.
Recent Highlights:
The Company announced net course registrations of approximately 46,650 in the first quarter of 2009, a year-over-year increase of 41%.
Net course registrations from new students in the first quarter of 2009 increased to approximately 10,500, an increase of 40% over the same period of 2008.
As of March 31, 2009, a total of approximately 49,600 students were enrolled in American Public University System.
American Public Education reported first quarter 2009 revenues increased 43% to $33.2 million, compared to $23.2 million in the first quarter of 2008.
Income from operations before interest income and income tax in the first quarter of 2009 increased 58% to $8.7 million, compared to $5.5 million in the same period of 2008. Operating margin in the first quarter of 2009 increased to 26.3%, compared to 23.5% in the first quarter of 2008.
Net income for the first quarter of 2009 increased 53% to $5.2 million or $0.28 per diluted share, compared to $3.4 million or $0.18 per diluted share in the same period of 2008. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the first quarter of 2009 and 2008 were approximately 18.9 million and 18.8 million, respectively.
Wallace E. Boston, Jr., Chief Executive Officer of American Public Education, Inc., stated, We believe our success is directly attributable to an unyielding commitment to our students before, during and after their enrollment at American Public University System. What that means in practical terms is affordable tuition, a highly-interactive instructional model, and a customer-oriented student experience.
As an important part of our dedication to quality, we regularly test and assess student outcomes, evaluate student satisfaction, and rely on this information to continually improve our programs and enhance the value of our degrees, added Mr. Boston. We believe our strategy translates into a valuable experience for our students and graduates, a strong financial performance for our shareholders, and a business that addresses Americas need for a well-educated population through a high commitment to affordability, access and proven results. The American Public University System is a member of the Higher Learning Commission's Assessment Academy and is also a member of the Transparency by Design initiative.
American Public University System uses a variety of assessment activities designed to improve academic programs as well as to document and enhance student learning. American Public University System publishes the details of its continuous assessment activities at .
http://www.apus.edu/Learning-Outcomes-Assessment/
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the first quarter of 2009 increased 43% to $33.2 million, compared to total revenues of $23.2 million in the first quarter of 2008. Income from operations before interest income and income tax in the first quarter of 2009 increased 58% to $8.7 million, compared to $5.5 million in the same period of 2008. Operating margin in the first quarter of 2009 increased to 26.3%, compared to 23.5% in the first quarter of 2008. Stock-based compensation expense reduced operating income by $535,000 in the first quarter of 2009 and $377,000 in the first quarter of 2008.
Net income for the first quarter of 2009 increased 53% to $5.2 million or $0.28 per diluted share, which includes $346,000 or $0.02 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $3.4 million or $0.18 per diluted share for the first quarter of 2008, including $249,000 or $0.01 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the first quarter of 2009 and 2008 were approximately 18.9 million and 18.8 million, respectively.
Total cash and cash equivalents at March 31, 2009 were $53.0 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the three months ended March 31, 2009 was $6.3 million, compared to $7.0 million in the same period of 2008. Capital expenditures were $1.8 million for the three months ended March 31, 2009, which compares to $2.2 million in capital expenditures in the same period of 2008. Depreciation and amortization was $1.3 million for the three months ended March 31, 2009 and $0.9 million for the same period of 2008.
Note: Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty. Total student enrollment is the number of students who have completed at least one course in the last 12 months or are in the start of the second week of class for the most current semester.
Second Quarter 2009 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
The Company expects net course registrations from new students of approximately 11,350 and net course registrations of approximately 46,600 in the quarter ending June 30, 2009.
The Companys second quarter 2009 revenue is expected to be between $33.8 million and $35.0 million.
The Company estimates that second quarter 2009 net income, including stock-based compensation expense, will be between $4.8 million and $5.2 million or between $0.25 and $0.27 per diluted share. The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding is expected to be approximately 19.0 million shares in the three month period ending June 30, 2009.
Full Year 2009 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
The Company anticipates net course registrations from new students of 50,200 or more and total net course registrations of 202,500 or more in the twelve month period ending December 31, 2009.
The Company expects full year 2009 revenues to be between $147 million and $151 million.
The Company estimates that full year 2009 net income, including stock-based compensation expense, will be between $22.9 million and $23.9 million or between $1.19 and $1.26 per diluted share. The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding is expected to be between 19.0 and 19.2 million shares in the twelve month period ending December 31, 2009.
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys first quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast at 5:00 p.m. Eastern time today. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
About American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, comprises two universities  (AMU) and (APU). Regionally and nationally accredited, APUS serves more than 49,500 part-time students who live and work in all 50 states and more than 100 countries; and offers 74 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements under the heading Full Year 2009 Outlook" and Second Quarter 2009 Outlook above and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: American Public Education, Inc. Harry T. Wilkins, CPA, 304-724-3722 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer OR Christopher L. Symanoskie, 703-334-3880 Director, Investor Relations

Exhibit 99.2
Online Higher Education Built To Succeed  May 7, 2009 First Quarter 2009 Conference Call
Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect, "intend", "may", "should, "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on the slides Second Quarter 2009 Outlook and Full Year 2009 Outlook and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future. Safe Harbor Statement Built To Succeed
A Solid Start to the Year 2009 Strong Growth in Niche Civilian SegmentsFor the three months ended March 31, 2009, net course registrations from students using Title IV grew 87.5% to approximately 7,500 (16% of net course registrations)Expanded Military Outreach Signed two new MOUs  Hired a new military outreach team memberPreparing New Programs for LaunchSubmitted two Masters programs for approval by HLC
Net Course Registrations and Enrollment  For the three months ended March 31, 2008 2009     % Change Net Course Registrations from New Students 7,500 10,500 40% Net Course Registrations 33,100 46,650 41% As of March 31, 2008 2009  % Change Total Student Enrollment 33,000 49,600 50% Note:  Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty.  Total student enrollment is the number of students who have completed at least one course in the last 12 months or are in the start of the second week of class for the most current semester.
College 100 course for new online undergraduate studentsFollows many of the well-researched pathways  Persistence rate of approximately 80% (between College 100 and second class) Participation in the HLCs Assessment AcademyParticipation in the National Survey for Student EngagementParticipation in the Transparency by Design Initiative Specialty accreditationCertified Family Life Educator Preparation Designation from National Council on Family Relations for Child and Family Development Program Specialty Accreditation from the Foundation of Higher  Education for Emergency and Disaster Management ProgramApplying for additional specialty accreditations Partnership at a Distance (PAD) Student Satisfaction Quotient  Influencing APUS Quality and Improving Retention
Challenging Coursework Leads to Strong Outcomes  Preparing for class (studying, reading, writing, doing homework or lab work, etc. related to academic program)  Number of assigned textbooks, books, or book-length packs of course readings  Number of written papers or reports of 20 pages or more;  number of written papers or reports of between 5 and 19 pages; and number of written papers or reports of fewer than 5 pages Coursework emphasizes: Analysis of the basic elements of an idea, experience or theory Coursework emphasizes: Synthesis and organizing of ideas, information, or experiences into new, more complex interpretations and relationships Coursework emphasizes: Making of judgments about the value of information, arguments, or methods Coursework emphasizes: Applying theories or concepts to practical problems or in new situations Working harder than you thought you could to meet an instructor's standards or expectations Campus environment emphasizes: Spending significant amount of time studying and on academic work. Challenging intellectual and creative work is central to student learning and collegiate quality.  Colleges and universities promote high levels of student achievement by emphasizing the importance of academic effort and setting high expectations for student performance. Level of Academic Challenge
APUS mission aligns with that of Congress and the administration   to make higher education more affordable, accessible and transparent.  APUS Activities Support US Higher Education Goals   AccessiblePart of the SolutionAffordableTransparent  The U.S. college attainment rate has fallen to 12th among major industrialized countries (source: Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development )American Opportunity Tax Credit and Simplify the Application Process for Financial Aid  www.whitehouse.gov/agenda/education/US Secretary of Education stresses college affordability, increases in funding for loans."  The Daily Cardinal, April 2009 "I challenge state, college and university leaders to put affordability front and center as they chart a path forward."  President Obama Government/Policy Focus APEI
APUS Enjoys Solid Leadership Position within Military Higher Education#1 in total DOD enrollment*Well regarded by key influencers/military leadership APUS is Attractive to Military Professionals and Families Affordable   minimal out of pocket expense for active duty military A military and public service oriented community of students and faculty Niche degree programs and courses, as well as a wide variety of degree fieldsMilitary-friendly policies a Top 20 Military-Friendly College as ranked by Military Advanced Education Quality, Value, Culture, Mission, Faculty and Programs APUS enjoys many competitive advantages  Knowledge of and relationship with target audience is critical APUS Knows Military Professionals      *Source: CCME 2009
Success in Niche Civilian Markets Title IV enrollment increased 87.5% year over yearCivilian applications increasing  Improving civilian conversion rates a significant opportunity for APUSEnhancing transfer credit processesContinued improvement of Title IV processing Gaining Confidence and Traction in Civilian Markets
Staying Ahead of The Curve  2009 Initiatives: Continue to improve retention, especially in first 3 classesLaunch several new degree programs and specializations Continue to pursue specialty accreditations Improving conversion rates in civilian marketsPrepare for entry into new market segments
APEI Reports Strong First Quarter 2009 Revenue Growth Driven by Strong Increase in Net Course RegistrationsEBIT Increases 58% to $8.7 million Net Income Increases 53% to $5.2 millionReports Earnings of $0.28 Per Diluted Share Strong Balance Sheet:No long-term debtIncreasing cash balance, lower interest income Purchase and build new facilities in Charles Town in 2009/2010Company Introduces Second Quarter 2009 OutlookIncreasing Full Year 2009 Outlook
Continued Margin Improvement
Strong Balance Sheet with No Debt  Cash & Cash Equivalents $53.0 $31.8Total Assets $85.6 $54.7 Total Long-Term Debt $0 $0 Other Items: Depreciation and Amortization $1.3 $0.9 CAPEX $2.2 $1.8 ($ in millions) As of March 31, 2009 2008
Seasonality in New Net Course Registrations Net Course Registrations from New Students Typically, 1Q and 2Q show little sequential increase. 2008 seasonality was unusual due to timing of new Title IV starts (about 300) and unusually large inflow of new military students. Ramp up in civilian applications/ Title IV enrollment. *Represents second quarter 2009 Outlook*
The following statements are based on current expectations.  These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. Second Quarter 2009 % Growth Net Course Registrations from New Students  approx. 11,350 29% Net Course Registrations  approx.  46,600 40% Total Revenue $33.8 to $35.0 million 35%-40% Net Income (1)  $4.8 to $5.2 million 22%-33%(2) EPS  Diluted (1) $0.25 to $0.27  Weighted Ave. Shares Outstanding approx. 19.0 million shares Company Introduces Second Quarter 2009 Outlook   Includes stock-based compensation expense of approximately $525,000 Assumes 41% effective tax rate in 2Q2009, compared to a 34% effective tax rate in 2Q2008
The following statements are based on current expectations.  These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. Full Year 2009 % GrowthNet Course Registrations from New Students 50,200 or more 37%+Net Course Registrations 202,500 or more 38%+Total Revenue$147 to $151 million 37%-41%EBIT $39.5 to $40.5 million  54%-58%Net Income (1)$22.9 to $23.9 million41%-48%EPS  Diluted (1)   $1.19 to $1.26 Weighted Ave. Shares Outstanding:19.0 to 19.2 million shares      Depreciation and Amortization Expense$5.3 to 5.5 million 25%-30%  Capital Expenditures  $8 to 10 million**excludes approximately $10 million of possible new real estate expenditures over the next 18-24 months. Company Increases Full Year 2009 Outlook   (1) Includes stock-based compensation expense of approximately $2.2 million
APEI has achieved rapid growth in student registrations in a challenging economic environmentNet Course Registrations Strong Student Population Growth 38% Growth  (in thousands) 2009(e) represents 2009 Full Year Outlook of 202,500 or more net course registrations 7 year CAGR: 40%
APEI has consistently experienced strong revenue growthRevenues  Built For Predictable Growth 39% Growth ($ in millions) 2009(e) represents midpoint of 2009 Full Year Outlook 7 year CAGR: 46%
Operating income growth has increased faster than revenue growthBuilt For Improving Operating Performance 55% Growth Income from continuing operations before interest income and income tax (1) Excludes a $3.1 million write-off of capitalized software development costs in 2006.  ($ in millions) 2009(e) represents midpoint of 2009 Full Year Outlook 7 year CAGR: 54%
Built With A Simple, Sensible Strategy Continue success in military market Expand in select civilian markets  Utilize targeted approach to advertising Launch new programs  Enter new market segments APEI has a blueprint for the future
Proprietary - Not for duplication


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20090804160207.txt.gz
TIME:20090804160207
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
August 4, 2009
(Date of earliest event reported) 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On August 4, 2009, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2009.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 4:30 p.m. EST on August 4, 2009 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports Second Quarter 2009 Results
Revenues Increased 43% in Second Quarter 2009 Compared to the Prior Year Period
CHARLES TOWN, W.Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--August 4, 2009--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System, which operates through American Military University and American Public University  announced strong financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2009.
Recent Highlights:
The Company announced net course registrations of approximately 47,900 in the second quarter of 2009, a year-over-year increase of 44%.
Net course registrations from new students in the second quarter of 2009 increased to approximately 11,200, an increase of 27% over the same period of 2008.
As of June 30, 2009, a total of approximately 53,600 students were enrolled in American Public University System, a year-over-year increase of 49%.
American Public Education reported second quarter 2009 revenues increased 43% to $35.7 million, compared to $25.0 million in the second quarter of 2008.
Income from operations before interest income and income tax in the second quarter of 2009 increased 52% to $8.8 million, compared to $5.8 million in the same period of 2008. Operating margin in the second quarter of 2009 increased to 24.6%, compared to 23.0% in the second quarter of 2008.
Net income for the second quarter of 2009 increased 35% to $5.3 million or $0.28 per diluted share, compared to $3.9 million or $0.21 per diluted share in the same period of 2008. Net income for the second quarter of 2008 was impacted by a lower effective tax rate of approximately 34%, compared to approximately 40% in the second quarter of 2009.
American Public University System announced a partnership with Connections Academy, a leading operator of K-12 virtual public schools, to offer high school students the opportunity to earn a high school diploma and a Bachelors degree in six years.
American Public Education announces that Sharon van Wyk, PhD has joined the organization as Chief Operations Officer.
Wallace E. Boston, Jr., Chief Executive Officer of American Public Education, Inc., stated, In addition to reporting strong second quarter results, I am pleased to announce that Dr. Sharon van Wyk has joined our team as Chief Operations Officer. She recently served as the Vice President of Process Excellence, Infrastructure & Online Customer Support at , a leading international provider of business and financial management solutions with $3.1 billion revenue.
Intuit
At , her leadership and innovative ideas generated process improvements, enhanced the customer experience, and increased TurboTax market share. In addition to wide-ranging management experience, Dr. Sharon van Wyk possesses several process improvement certifications including Master Black Belt and Six Sigma Instructor. She has experience launching Lean, Agile and Scrum.
Intuit
I welcome Dr. Sharon van Wyk to American Public University System  I believe we will greatly benefit from her contributions, especially as we grow more efficient and continue to enroll an increasing number of civilian students, added Mr. Boston.
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the second quarter of 2009 increased 43% to $35.7 million, compared to total revenues of $25.0 million in the second quarter of 2008. Income from operations before interest income and income tax in the second quarter of 2009 increased 52% to $8.8 million, compared to $5.8 million in the same period of 2008. Operating margin in the second quarter of 2009 increased to 24.6%, compared to 23.0% in the second quarter of 2008. Stock-based compensation expense reduced operating income by $552,000 in the second quarter of 2009 and $469,000 in the second quarter of 2008.
Net income for the second quarter of 2009 increased 35% to $5.3 million or $0.28 per diluted share, which includes $355,000 or $0.02 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $3.9 million or $0.21 per diluted share for the second quarter of 2008, including $307,000 or $0.02 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. Net income for the second quarter of 2008 was impacted by a lower effective tax rate of approximately 34%, compared to approximately 40% in the second quarter of 2009. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the second quarter of 2009 and 2008 were approximately 18.9 million and 18.8 million, respectively.
For the six months ended June 30, 2009, total revenues were $68.9 million, an increase of 43% compared to total revenues of $48.2 million in the same period of 2008. Income from operations before interest income and income tax for the six months ended June 30, 2009 increased to $17.5 million, compared to $11.2 million in the same period of 2008. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each period's operating income by $1.1 million and $0.8 million, respectively.
Net income for the six months ended June 30, 2009 increased 44% to $10.6 million or $0.56 per diluted share, which includes $701,000 or $0.04 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $7.3 million or $0.39 per diluted share in the same period of 2008, including $556,000 or $0.03 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. Net income for the six months ended June 30, 2008 was impacted by a lower effective tax rate of approximately 37%, compared to approximately 40% in the same period of 2009. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the six months ended June 30, 2009 and 2008 were approximately 18.9 million and 18.8 million, respectively.
Total cash and cash equivalents as of June 30, 2009 were $57.1 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the six months ended June 30, 2009 was $12.6 million, compared to $12.1 million in the same period of 2008. Capital expenditures were $4.4 million for the six months ended June 30, 2009, which compares to $4.6 million in capital expenditures in the same period of 2008. Depreciation and amortization was $2.7 million for the six months ended June 30, 2009 and $1.9 million for the same period of 2008.
American Public University System announces a partnership with Connections Academy, a leading operator of K-12 virtual public schools, to provide an accelerated path to earning a college degree. The partnership offers high school students the opportunity to earn a high school diploma through Connections Academys national private school, , and an Associates degree through American Public University System in four years. Participating students may also earn a Bachelors degree from American Public University System in just two additional years.
National Connections Academy
This new program, called the combines the flexibility of online learning with rigorous academic programs that together create greater access to education opportunities and generate significant cost savings for students and their families. For additional information, visit .
College Advantage Program,
http://www.connectionsacademy.com/private-school/
Note: Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty. Total student enrollment is the number of students who have completed at least one course in the last 12 months or are in the start of the second week of class for the most current semester.
Third Quarter 2009 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
The Company expects net course registrations from new students of approximately 13,600 and net course registrations of approximately 53,800 in the quarter ending September 30, 2009.
The Companys third quarter 2009 revenue is expected to be between $35.0 million and $36.0 million.
The Company estimates that third quarter 2009 net income, including stock-based compensation expense, will be between $4.8 million and $5.2 million or between $0.25 and $0.27 per diluted share. The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding is expected to be approximately 19.0 million shares in the three month period ending September 30, 2009.
Full Year 2009 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
The Company anticipates net course registrations from new students of approximately 49,000 and total net course registrations of approximately 205,200 in the twelve month period ending December 31, 2009.
The Company expects full year 2009 revenues to be between $147 million and $150 million.
The Company estimates that full year 2009 net income, including stock-based compensation expense, will be between $23.0 million and $23.9 million or between $1.20 and $1.26 per diluted share. The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding is expected to be between 19.0 and 19.2 million shares in the twelve month period ending December 31, 2009.
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys second quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast at 4:30 p.m. Eastern time today. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
About American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, comprises two universities  (AMU) and (APU). Regionally and nationally accredited, APUS serves more than 53,600 part-time students who live and work in all 50 states and more than 100 countries; and offers 74 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements under the heading Full Year 2009 Outlook" and Third Quarter 2009 Outlook above and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: American Public Education, Inc. Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304-724-3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Director, Investor Relations 703-334-3880

Exhibit 99.2
Ahead of the Curve.Online higher educationfor a complex world.Second Quarter 2009Conference Call August 4, 2009
Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect, "intend", "may", "should, "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on the slides Third Quarter 2009 Outlook and Full Year 2009 Outlook and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future. Safe Harbor Statement
Continued Success with Military Community Military Times Edge Magazine ranked AMU #2 in Top 50 schools chosen by service members using tuition assistance in 2008. The Top 50
Focused on Our Mission Strong Growth in Civilian SegmentsSecond quarter 2009 net course registrations from students using Title IV grew 100% to approximately 8,400 (18% of net course registrations)New Programs and New InitiativesSubmitted two new Masters programs to HLCAPUS partners with Connections AcademyEnables students to earn a high school diploma and an Associates degree in 4 yearsProgram participants may earn a Bachelors degree in additional 2 yearshttp://www.connectionsacademy.com/private-school/Focus on Customer Service and Quality Sharon van Wyk, PhD joins as Chief Operations Officer Formerly, Vice President of Process Excellence, Infrastructure & Online Customer Support at Intuit, a $3 billion business and financial management solutions company.
Net Course Registrations and Enrollment Body:For the three months ended June 30, 20082009 % Change Net Course Registrations from New Students8,80011,200 27% Net Course Registrations 33,30047,90044% For the six months ended June 30, 20082009 % Change Net Course Registrations from New Students16,30021,800 34% Net Course Registrations 66,40094,50042% As of June 30,20082009 % Change Total Student Enrollment35,90053,60049% Note:  Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty.  Total student enrollment is the number of students who have completed at least one course in the last 12 months or are in the start of the second week of class for the most current semester.
Transitioning to Civilian Growth Drivers Civilian Students.  More Classes Per Year (6 classes on average) more annual revenue per studentHigher Retention better lifetime valueLarger Market Size additional growth opportunitiesSegments Rely on Key Influencers allows for continue targeted advertisingHigh Referral Rate lower cost of acquisition vs. peersLower Conversion Rates opportunities for improvementAPUS Tuition Below Title IV Limits strong funding source/lower debt burden APUS targets underserved markets where affordability, accessibility and/or the interest in unique programs are a major consideration.
APUS Story Virtually Unchanged Since IPOExpand share of and presence in the Military community Pursue select civilian markets with a cost-effective marketing Launch new programs and enter new markets Source: Company Reports & APEI Estimates Education Peers APEI  no undergraduate tuition increase since 2001; no planned tuition increases.Public/Private Schools  6% average annual tuition increase from 1996 to 2007.+120%(%) 1Q2009 Revenue Growth(%) 1Q2009 EBITDA MarginHigh Margin, Low GrowthLow Margin, Low GrowthHigh Margin, High GrowthLow  Margin, High GrowthAPEI +BMO Capital Markets and US Department of Education  Peer AveragePeer AverageAPEI Goal Quadrant
APEI Reports Strong Second Quarter 2009 Results Revenues increase 43% to $35.7 million  EBIT Increases 52% to $8.8 million Second quarter 2009 tax rate was 40%, compared to 34% in second quarter 2008Net Income Increases 35% to $5.3 millionReports Earnings of $0.28 Per Diluted Share Strong Balance Sheet:No long-term debtIncreasing cash balance, lower interest income Purchase and build new facilities in Charles Town in 2009/2010Introduces Third Quarter 2009 OutlookRefines Full Year 2009 Outlook
Continued Margin Improvement Three Months   Six Months Ended June 30,  Ended June 30, 2009 2008  2009 2008  Revenues 100.0 % 100.0 % 100.0 %  100.0 % Costs and expenses: Instructional costs and services 40.2 42.1 39.4 42.4 Selling and promotional 14.4 10.5 13.8 9.9 General and administrative 16.9 20.3 17.6 20.5 Depreciation and amortization 3.8  4.1  3.8  4.0 Total costs and expenses 75.3 77.0 74.6 76.8 Income from operations before  interest income and income taxes 24.7  23.0  25.4  23.2   Interest income, net0.0  0.8  0.1  1.0  Income from operations  before income taxes 24.7  23.8  25.5  24.2   Income tax expense 9.8 8.1 10.2 9.0 Net Income 14.9 %  15.7 %  15.3 %  15.2 %
Strong Balance Sheet with No Debt Cash & Cash Equivalents  $57.1 $47.7 Total Assets   $91.4   $78.8 Total Long-Term Debt  $0   $0 Other Items: Depreciation and Amortization $1.4   $1.0 CAPEX    $2.6   $2.4 ($ in millions)  As of June 30, As of December 31, 2009 2008 Three Months Ended June 30, 2009 2008
The following statements are based on current expectations.  These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. Full Year 2009 % GrowthNet Course Registrations from New Students approx. 49,000   33%Net Course Registrations approx. 205,200   40%Total Revenue $147 to $150 million 37%-40%EBIT $39.5 to $40.5 million 54%-58%Net Income (1) $23.0 to $23.9 million 42%-48%EPS  Diluted (1) $1.20 to $1.26 Weighted Ave. Shares Outstanding: 19.0 to 19.2 million shares Depreciation and Amortization Expense $5.3 to 5.5 million 25%-30% Capital Expenditures   $8 to 10 million**excludes approximately $10 million of possible new real estate expenditures over the next 18-24 months. Company Refines Full Year 2009 Outlook (1) Includes stock-based compensation expense of approximately $2.2 million
The following statements are based on current expectations.  These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. Third Quarter 2009 % GrowthNet Course Registrations from New Students approx. 13,600 31%Net Course Registrations approx. 53,800 38%Total Revenue $35.0 to $36.0 million 28%-31%Net Income (1) $4.8 to $5.2 million 26%-37%EPS  Diluted (1) $0.25 to $0.27 Weighted Ave. Shares Outstanding approx. 19.0 million shares  Company Introduces Third Quarter 2009 Outlook Includes stock-based compensation expense of approximately $575,000
Early start leads to greater percentage of earned revenue in first month, while a later start leads to a lower percentage of revenue recognized in the first month. Timing of Starts In Third & Fourth Quarter 2009  September Cohort Revenue Recognition: 2008 2009E  September October 56% 44% $1.2 million more revenue  ($1.6 million less revenue)  In September   44% 56%
APUS Story Virtually Unchanged Since IPO Expand share of and presence in the Military community Pursue select civilian markets with a cost-effective marketing Launch new programs and enter new markets Source: RBC, Company Reports & APEI Estimates   Education Peers APEI no undergraduate tuition increase since 2001; no planned tuition increases. Public/Private Schools  6% average annual tuition increase from 1996 to 2007.+  120%  (%) 1Q2009 Revenue Growth  (%) 1Q2009 EBITDA Margin  High Margin, Low Growth  Low Margin, Low Growth  High Margin, High Growth  Low  Margin, High Growth  APEI +BMO Capital Markets and US Department of Education Peer Average  Peer Average  APEI Goal Quadrant
Ahead of the Curve.Online higher education for a complex world.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20090814165754.txt.gz
TIME:20090814165754
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
o
o
o
 
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(b) On August 12, 2009, David L. Warnock notified American Public Education, Inc. (the "Company") of his resignation from the Company's Board of Directors effective August 12, 2009. On August 13, 2009, Phillip A. Clough notified the Company that he would not stand for re-election to the Company's Board of Directors at the Company's 2010 Annual Meeting of Shareholders. Mr. Clough will serve the remainder of his term as Chairman of the Company's Board of Directors.
On August 13, 2009, the Company issued a press release regarding the matters described above. The complete text of this press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this current report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
CHARLES TOWN, W.Va.(BUSINESS WIRE)Aug. 13, 2009 American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ:APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System, which operates through American Military University and American Public University  announced that David L. Warnock and Phillip A. Clough, Non-Executive Chairman of the Board, plan to depart from American Public Education's Board of Directors. Mr. Warnock and Mr. Clough are both affiliated with the company's former private equity investors.
Mr. Warnock has resigned as a member of the company's board of directors effective August 12, 2009. Mr. Clough intends to continue serving on the board as Chairman until the company's annual stockholder meeting on May 14, 2010.
Mr. Warnock has been a member of the company's board of directors since 2005 and is a managing member and co-founder of Camden Partners, as well as Chief Executive Officer of Camden Learning Corporation. Mr. Clough has been a member of the company's board of directors since 2002 and is a Managing General Partner of ABS Capital Partners. Camden Partners and ABS Capital Partners were early private equity investors in American Public Education, both of which have now liquidated their ownership in APEI.
"It has been an extraordinary experience to serve an organization so passionate about and dedicated to improving the lives of students by providing affordable and respected online degree programs. I am privileged to have had the opportunity to work closely with our Board of Trustees and faculty to create outstanding educational opportunities for our nation's military personnel and first responders. While departing to focus on my other business commitments, I leave American Public Education with great confidence in the company's prospects for future growth and continued success," stated Mr. Warnock.
Mr. Clough stated, "The Board has planned for the fact that with the sale of the shares held by ABS Capital Partners and Camden Partners, the composition of the Board would change over time. Earlier this year, two new directors, Tim Landon and Barbara Fast, were added to the Board and Chris Everett was named Vice Chairman. With David's announcement, I thought it was an appropriate time to solidify my plans to also transition my focus to other business commitments. The recent additions and Chris' leadership have greatly strengthened the Board and ensured that today's announcement will have no impact on the Board's effectiveness."
Clough continued, "My association with APEI since 2002 has been the most fulfilling professional experience of my career. The university system has an important and compelling mission. The tireless devotion of the staff and faculty to providing quality, affordable and flexible education to our military service members and other public servants is an inspiration to me. I look forward to serving the remainder of my term with energy and feel comfortable that the timing of this decision is right. The Company is performing well, has excellent leadership and a very bright future."
 
Wallace E. Boston, President and Chief Executive Officer, stated, "Both personally and on behalf of the Company and the Board of Directors, I want to thank Phil and David for their strong leadership and many years of service. As a result of their careful guidance and dedication to our mission, American Public University System has become a national leader in affordable, online higher education and is well positioned for continued growth and success."
About American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ:APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, comprises two universities  (AMU) and (APU). Regionally and nationally accredited, APUS serves more than 53,600 part-time students who live and work in all 50 states and more than 100 countries; and offers 74 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements under the heading "Full Year 2009 Outlook" and "Third Quarter 2009 Outlook" above and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
Source: American Public Education, Inc.
Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304-724-3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Director, Investor Relations 703-334-3880
American Public Education, Inc.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20091105160630.txt.gz
TIME:20091105160630
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
November 5, 2009
(Date of earliest event reported) 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On November 5, 2009, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2009.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 5:00 p.m. EDT on November 5, 2009 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports Third Quarter 2009 Results
Net Course Registrations from New Students Increased Approximately 41% in Third Quarter 2009 Compared to the Prior Year Period
CHARLES TOWN, W.V.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--November 5, 2009--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System (APUS), which operates through American Military University and American Public University  announced strong financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2009.
Recent Highlights:
Net course registrations from new students in the third quarter of 2009 increased to approximately 14,700, an increase of approximately 41% over the same period of 2008.
Net course registrations increased to approximately 55,300 in the third quarter of 2009, a year-over-year increase of 42%.
As of September 30, 2009, a total of approximately 59,300 students were enrolled in American Public University System, a year-over-year increase of 44%.
American Public Education reported third quarter 2009 revenues increased 33% to $36.5 million, compared to $27.4 million in the third quarter of 2008.
Income from operations before interest income and income tax in the third quarter of 2009 increased 35% to $8.4 million, compared to $6.2 million in the same period of 2008. Operating margin in the third quarter of 2009 increased to 23.0%, compared to 22.6% in the third quarter of 2008.
Net income for the third quarter of 2009 increased 31% to $5.0 million or $0.27 per diluted share, compared to $3.8 million or $0.20 per diluted share in the same period of 2008.
American Public University System received approval for and launched a Masters degree in Legal Studies and a Bachelors degree in General Studies. These two new programs bring the total number of degrees offered to 76 degrees, with a new degree pending approval by its regional accrediting body and other degrees under development.
American Public University System was recently recognized by The Sloan Consortium (Sloan-C), a renowned non-profit group of higher education institutions, with . The annual award honors the institution that best demonstrates its commitment to excellence in online learning.
The Ralph E. Gomory Award for Quality Online Education
The International Association of Emergency Managers (IAEM), a non-profit educational organization dedicated to saving lives and protecting property during emergencies and disasters, honored the Emergency and Disaster Management Program at APUS with the The annual award goes to the institution that made significant contributions to the formal education of students pursuing a career in emergency management.
2009 Academic Recognition Award.
American Public University System announced a graduate tuition increase to $300 per credit hour ($900 per three credit course) for courses beginning in April 2010 or later.
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the third quarter of 2009 increased 33% to $36.5 million, compared to total revenues of $27.4 million in the third quarter of 2008. Income from operations before interest income and income tax in the third quarter of 2009 increased 35% to $8.4 million, compared to $6.2 million in the same period of 2008. Operating margin in the third quarter of 2009 increased to 23.0%, compared to 22.6% in the third quarter of 2008. Stock-based compensation expense reduced operating income by $562,000 in the third quarter of 2009 and $396,000 in the third quarter of 2008.
Net income for the third quarter of 2009 increased 31% to $5.0 million or $0.27 per diluted share, which includes $359,000 or $0.02 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $3.8 million or $0.20 per diluted share for the third quarter of 2008, including $261,000 or $0.01 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the third quarter of 2009 and 2008 was approximately 18.9 million in each period.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2009, total revenues were $105.3 million, an increase of 39% compared to total revenues of $75.6 million in the same period of 2008. Income from operations before interest income and income tax for the nine months ended September 30, 2009 increased 49% to $25.9 million, compared to $17.4 million in the same period of 2008. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each period's operating income by $1.6 million and $1.2 million, respectively.
Net income for the nine months ended September 30, 2009 increased 40% to $15.6 million or $0.82 per diluted share, which includes $1.1 million or $0.06 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $11.1 million or $0.59 per diluted share in the same period of 2008, including $817,000 or $0.04 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the nine months ended September 30, 2009 and 2008 were approximately 18.9 million and 18.8 million, respectively.
Total cash and cash equivalents as of September 30, 2009 were $63.8 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the nine months ended September 30, 2009 was $22.8 million, compared to $19.8 million in the same period of 2008. Capital expenditures were $8.6 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2009, which compares to $6.9 million in capital expenditures in the same period of 2008. Depreciation and amortization was $3.9 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2009 and $3.0 million for the same period of 2008.
Note: Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty. Total student enrollment is the number of students who have completed at least one course in the last 12 months or are in the start of the second week of class for the most current semester.
Fourth Quarter 2009 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
The Company expects net course registrations from new students of approximately 13,600 and net course registrations of approximately 58,000 in the quarter ending December 31, 2009.
The Companys fourth quarter 2009 revenue is expected to be approximately $42.7 million.
The Company estimates that fourth quarter 2009 net income, including stock-based compensation expense, will be approximately $7.9 million or approximately $0.42 per fully diluted share. The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding is expected to be approximately 19.0 million shares in the three month period ending December 31, 2009.
Full Year 2009 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
The Company anticipates net course registrations from new students of approximately 50,000 and total net course registrations of approximately 207,800 in the twelve month period ending December 31, 2009.
The Company expects full year 2009 revenues to be approximately $148.0 million.
The Company estimates that full year 2009 net income, including stock-based compensation expense, will be approximately $23.5 million or approximately $1.24 per fully diluted share. The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding is expected to be approximately 18.9 million shares in the twelve month period ending December 31, 2009.
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys third quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast at 5:00 p.m. Eastern time today. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
About American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, comprises two universities  (AMU) and (APU). Regionally and nationally accredited, APUS serves more than 59,300 part-time students who live and work in all 50 states and more than 100 countries; and offers 76 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements under the heading Full Year 2009 Outlook" and Fourth Quarter 2009 Outlook above and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: American Public Education, Inc. Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304-724-3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Director, Corporate Communications 703-334-3880

Exhibit 99.2
Ahead of the Curve. Online higher educationfor a complex world. Third Quarter 2009Conference Call  November 5, 2009
Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect, "intend", "may", "should, "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on the slides Fourth Quarter 2009 Outlook and Full Year 2009 Outlook and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future. Safe Harbor Statement
Operational Highlights & Recent Developments Strong 3Q2009 Enrollment and Net Course Registration Growth Net course registrations1 increased 42%  Net course registrations from new students2 increased 41% Total student enrollment3 increased 44% to 59,300 Launched MA in Legal Studies and BA in General Studies APUS recognized by The Sloan Consortium, a renowned non-profit group of higher education institutions, for its excellence in online learning First for-profit institution to receive The Sloan Consortiums top honor APUS among a distinctive list of institutions earning Sloans top honors Dr. Phil Ice, APUS Director of Course Design, Research & Development, awarded the 2009 Sloan-C Effective Practice Award for Using the Community of Inquiry Framework Survey for Multi-Level Institutional Evaluation and Continuous Quality Improvement 1 Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty. 2 Net course registrations from new students represents net course registrations from students registering in courses for the first time.  Students who register for  courses subsequent to their first monthly start are not considered new students. 3 Total student enrollment is the number of students who have completed at least one course in the last 12 months or are in the start of the second week of class for the most current semester.
Operational Highlights & Recent Developments International Association of Emergency Managers (IAEM) honored the APUS Emergency and Disaster Management Program with the 2009 Academic Recognition Award. Ranked Ninth in Americas 200 Best Small Companies by Forbes.com Launched new website, redesigned for changing mix of students Graduate tuition for courses beginning in April 2010 or later will increase to $300 per credit hour ($900 per 3 credit course)
Strong Interest from Military and Civilian Students in Q3 Expanding Leadership Among Institutions Serving the MilitaryNet course registrations from students using TA increased 32% Extended office and visitation hours at several military basesNew military spouse program generating increased enrollmentSuccessful Execution of Civilian Strategy Net course registrations from students using Title IV grew 95% Strong lead flow from civilians continuesIncreasing percentage of leads from traditional students (18-24 years)   Students by Type represent the category which students self identify at the time of registration.As of September 2009
Focused on Long-Term Performance and Success Affordability, Product Differentiation & Value 76 Degree programs, including liberal arts and other unique degrees No undergraduate tuition increase since 2002 Low fees and a book grant program for most undergraduate students  Quality Academic Programs and Customer Focus  High student satisfaction and student referral rates Consultative approach to student enrollment  Continued pursuit of specialty accreditations  Transparent and data-driven approach to measuring student outcomes MAPP   NSSE Community of Inquiry Framework Survey (COI) Major Field Tests Transparency by Design
APEI Reports Solid Third Quarter 2009 Results Revenues increased 33% to $36.5 million  Income from operations before interest income and income taxes increased 35% to $8.4 million  Net Income increases 31% to $5.0 millionReports Earnings of $0.27 per diluted share  Strong Balance Sheet: No long-term debt Increasing cash balance Refining Full Year 2009 Outlook
Continued Strong Margins
Strong Balance Sheet with No Debt Cash & Cash Equivalents             $63.8                $47.7Total Assets                      $105.1               $78.8Total Long-Term Debt              $0                   $0 Depreciation and Amortization       $3.9                 $3.0CAPEX                                        $8.6                 $6.9     ($ in millions)           As of Sept 30,             As of December 31,       2009                         2008                  Nine Months Ended Sept 30,        2009                          2008
The following statements are based on current expectations.  These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.           4th Quarter 2009    % GrowthNet Course Registrations from New Students          approx. 13,600      37%Net Course Registrations   approx. 58,000      38%Total Revenue    approx. $42.7 million         36%Net Income (1)   approx. $7.9 million          57%EPS  Fully Diluted (1)    approx. $0.42Weighted Ave. Shares Outstanding     approx. 19.0 million shares     
          Fourth Quarter 2009 Outlook   
          Includes stock-based compensation expense of approximately $560,000
The following statements are based on current expectations.  These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.           Full Year 2009      % GrowthNet Course Registrations from New Students          approx. 50,000      36%Net Course Registrations   approx. 207,800     41%Total Revenue    approx. $148.0 million        38%Net Income (1)   approx. $23.5 million         45%EPS  Fully Diluted (1)    approx. $1.24Weighted Ave. Shares Outstanding:    approx. 18.9 million shares    Depreciation and Amortization Expense  $5.3 to 5.5 million          Capital Expenditures          $8 to 10 million**excludes approximately $10 million of possible new real estate expenditures over the next 18-24 months.         Refines Full Year 2009 Outlook    (1) Includes stock-based compensation expense of approximately $2.2 million
Ahead of the Curve. Online higher education for a complex world.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20091228160133.txt.gz
TIME:20091228160133
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 November 3, 2009 ---------------- (Date of earliest event reported) American Public Education, Inc. - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Exact Name of Registrant as Specified in its Charter) Delaware 001-33810 01-0724376 - ------------------------------- -------------- ------------------------- (State or other jurisdiction (Commission (I.R.S. Employer of Incorporation) File Number) Identification No.) 111 W. Congress Street Charles Town, West Virginia 25414 304-724-3700 - ------------------------------ -------------- ------------------------- (Address of principal (Zip Code) (Registrant's telephone number executive offices) including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: [] Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) [] Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) [] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) [] Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c)) - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers. (b) Mark Leuba, Senior Vice President, Information Technology of American Public University System, Inc. (the "University"), a wholly-owned subsidiary of American Public Education, Inc. (the "Company"), ceased to serve as an executive officer of the Company in connection with the execution of the Separation Agreement and General Release described below and resigned his position effective December 4, 2009. (e) On November 3, 2009, the University and Mark Leuba executed a Separation Agreement and General Release in connection with Mr. Leuba's expected departure from the University. The Separation Agreement provides, among other things, that Mr. Leuba would resign from his position on or before December 4, 2009, will be entitled to receive executive placement services for three months, will be reimbursed for COBRA expenses through May 31, 2010 and would execute a Consulting Agreement for which he will receive a $100,000 retainer. The Separation Agreement and General Release also contains a general release by Mr. Leuba in favor of the University. The Consulting Agreement provides that in consideration of the retainer, Mr. Leuba will provide technology consulting services to the Company through May 31, 2010. As an independent consultant to the Company, Mr. Leuba will continue to vest in equity awards previously granted to him during the term he serves as a consultant. The foregoing descriptions of the Separation Agreement and General Release and the Consulting Agreement are qualified in their entirety by reference to the actual agreements, copies of which are attached to this current report as Exhibits 10.1 and 10.2, respectively, and are incorporated by reference herein. Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits. (d) Exhibits Exhibit 10.1 Separation Agreement and General Release between American Public University System, Inc. and Mark Leuba. Exhibit 10.2 Consulting Agreement between American Public Education, Inc. and Mark Leuba. 2
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. American Public Education, Inc. Date: December 28, 2009 By: /s/ Harry T. Wilkins -------------------------------------- Harry T. Wilkins, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 3
INDEX TO EXHIBITS Exhibit No. Description - ---------- ----------- Exhibit 10.1 Separation Agreement and General Release between American Public University System, Inc. and Mark Leuba. Exhibit 10.2 Consulting Agreement between American Public Education, Inc. and Mark Leuba.

Exhibit 10.1 SEPARATION AGREEMENT AND GENERAL RELEASE ---------------------------------------- This Separation Agreement and General Release (the "Agreement") is being entered into between American Public University System (the "University") and Mark Leuba, the undersigned. For and in consideration of the mutual promises contained herein, and for other good and sufficient consideration, receipt of which is hereby acknowledged, the University and I (sometimes hereafter referred to as the "Parties") agree as follows: 1. Separation from Employment (a) My employment with the University shall end on the earlier of: (1) December 4, 2009; or (2) such earlier date as I may tender my resignation or commence other employment (the "Separation Date"). The Parties agree that my separation shall be treated as a resignation and I agree that I will not seek employment with the University or any of its affiliates in the future. (b) I shall be paid at my current base salary rate through the Separation Date and will be paid for all accrued unused vacation leave as of that date. (c) Additionally, as consideration for my promises in this Agreement, the University agrees to provide me three months of executive placement services, at a total cost not to exceed $10,000.00. (d) As of the Separation Date, I shall not be eligible and am not eligible to participate in any University benefits plan, including, but not limited to, dental and medical insurance, 401(k) plan, vacation leave, sick leave, long term disability insurance, or life insurance, except to any extent provided by applicable law. However, if I elect to continue medical insurance pursuant to the federal law commonly referred to as COBRA, the University will incur the expense of my medical coverage by making my COBRA payments for up to five months unless coverage is obtained through another employer's plan prior to May 31, 2010. If I obtain other employment prior to May 31, 2010, I will notify Amy Panzarella, Director HR and such medical insurance shall cease as of the date of my new employment. As of December 5, 2009, I am not eligible to continue participation in the company's 401(k) plan, disability insurance or life insurance. I will be entitled to continued vesting under the equity incentive plans of the University to the extent provided in the applicable award agreements.
(e) Between the Separation Date and May 31, 2010 I will make myself available as an independent consultant, and not as an employee, for the purposes set forth in, and pursuant to the form of, the consulting agreement attached hereto as Exhibit A (the "Consulting Agreement"). I will be compensated for such consulting services through the payment of a retainer fee of $100,000, as more fully described in the Consulting Agreement. (f) Once all of the payments referred to in this paragraph 1 of this Agreement have been made, I shall have been paid all compensation due and owing to me under this Agreement and under any contract I have or may have had with the University or from any other source of entitlement, including all wages, salary, commissions, bonuses, incentive payments, profit-sharing payments, leave, severance pay or other benefits. I specifically acknowledge that I am not entitled to any separate payment for unused vacation or other leave. I further acknowledge and agree that the payments referred to in this paragraph 1, in addition to compensating me fully for time worked and services rendered through the end of my employment, include consideration for my promises contained in this Agreement, and that such consideration is above and beyond any wages, salary, or other sums to which I am entitled from the University under the terms of my employment or under any other contract or law. 2
2. General Release. On behalf of myself and my agents, heirs, executors, administrators, successors and assigns, I hereby release and forever discharge the University, American Public Education, Inc., and any and all of their respective affiliates, officers, directors, employees, agents, counsel, and successors and assigns, from any and all complaints, claims, demands, damages, lawsuits, actions, and causes of action, whether known, unknown or unforeseen, arising out of or in connection with any event, transaction or matter occurring or existing prior to or at the time of my execution of the Agreement, which I have or may have against any of them for any reason whatsoever in law or in equity, under federal, state, local, or other law, whether the same be upon statutory claim, contract, tort or other basis, including without limitation any and all claims arising from or relating to my employment or the termination of my employment and any and all claims relating to any employment agreement, any employment statute or regulation, or any employment discrimination law, including without limitation Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act ("ADEA"), the Older Workers Benefit Protection Act, the Civil Rights Act of 1866, the Equal Pay Act of 1963, all as amended, all state and local laws, regulations and ordinances prohibiting discrimination in employment (including without limitation the Virginia Human Rights Act and the West Virginia Human Rights Act), and other laws and regulations relating to employment, including but not limited to the Family and Medical Leave Act, the Fair Labor Standards Act, the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, and the West Virginia Wage Payment and Collection Act, all as amended. I agree, 3
without limiting the generality of the above release, not to file any claim or lawsuit seeking damages and asserting any claims that are lawfully released in this paragraph. I further hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waive any and all rights to recover any damages concerning the claims that are lawfully released in this paragraph. I represent and warrant that I have not previously filed or joined in any such claims against the University or any of its affiliates, and that I have not given or sold any portion of any claims released herein to anyone else, and that I will indemnify and hold harmless the persons and entities released herein from all liabilities, claims, demands, costs, expenses and/or attorneys' fees incurred as a result of any such assignment or transfer. Notwithstanding the foregoing, neither party is releasing any right to enforce this Agreement, and I am not releasing: (a) any claims for unemployment compensation or workers compensation benefits or other rights that may not be released as a matter of law; (b) any claims solely relating to the validity of this General Release under the ADEA, as amended; (c) any non-waivable right to file a charge with the U.S. Equal Employment Opportunity Commission ("EEOC"); or (d) any rights I may have with respect to vesting of equity awards through May 31, 2010 to the extent I continue as an independent consultant and the terms of the applicable awards so provide. If the EEOC were to pursue any matters that are released herein, I agree that this Agreement will control as the exclusive remedy and full settlement of all such claims by me for money damages. I HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGE AND AGREE THAT THIS RELEASE IS A GENERAL RELEASE AND THAT BY SIGNING THIS AGREEMENT, I AM SIGNING AND AGREEING TO THIS RELEASE. 4
3. No Admission. The Parties agree that nothing contained in this Agreement shall constitute or be treated as an admission of liability or wrongdoing by either of them. 4. Proprietary and/or Confidential Information. I agree that any sensitive, proprietary or confidential information or data relating to the University or any of its affiliates, including without limitation trade secrets, customer lists, customer contacts, customer relationships, the University's financial data, long range or short range plans, and other data and information of a competition-sensitive nature, or any confidential or proprietary information of others licensed to the University, that I acquired or may acquire while an employee of the University or as an independent consultant to the University shall not be disclosed or used for my own purposes or in a manner detrimental to the University's interests. I agree to use my best efforts to prevent disclosure of such confidential information and data. In the event that I receive a subpoena that calls or may call for the disclosure of any such confidential information or data, I will provide at least five (5) business days advance notice to the University before responding to such subpoena (unless five days notice is not possible, in which case I will provide as much notice as is possible) and I will reasonably cooperate with the University in allowing the University an opportunity to object to disclosure of such confidential information or data. 5. Return of Information and Property. On or prior to the Separation Date, I will return all records or copies of University information, documents or files and no copies of the same will be retained by me. In addition, on or prior to the Separation Date, I will return all University property to the University, including but not limited to, keys, access cards, credit cards, and any other computer hardware or software issued by the University to me. I shall immediately file any and all outstanding expense reports. 5
6. Duties and Transition Assistance. During the period until the Separation Date, I will transition my CIO responsibilities to others as directed by the University, will perform specific tasks as assigned by the University, and will work from such locations as are specified by the University. I agree to cooperate fully with and provide information to the University to assist in the transition process during the balance of my employment and during the consulting period. 7. I agree to direct all prospective employers and others seeking references regarding me to Wallace Boston, CEO or Amy Panzarella, Director HR, and no one else. 8. Breach or Violation. I agree that in the event of any violation of the provisions of this Agreement, in addition to any damages allowed by law, the University shall be entitled to injunctive relief and to terminate my service as an independent consultant. 9. Modification; Severability. The Parties agree that if a Court of competent jurisdiction finds that any term of this Agreement is for any reason excessively broad in scope, duration, or otherwise, such term shall be construed or modified in a manner to enable it to be enforced to the maximum extent possible. Further, the covenants in this Agreement shall be deemed to be a series of separate covenants and agreements. If, in any judicial proceeding, a Court of competent jurisdiction shall refuse to enforce any of the separate covenants deemed included herein, then at the option of the University, wholly unenforceable covenants shall be deemed eliminated from the Agreement for the purpose of such proceeding to the extent necessary to permit the remaining separate covenants to be enforced in such proceeding. 10. Certain Representations. The Parties represent and acknowledge that in executing this Agreement such party does not rely and has not relied upon any representation or statement made by the other party or the other party's agents, representatives or attorneys with regard to the subject matter, basis or effect of this Agreement or otherwise. 6
11. Entire Agreement. This Agreement contains the entire agreement between the Parties relating to the subject matter of this Agreement, and may not be altered or amended except by an instrument in writing signed by both Parties hereto. 12. Assignment. This Agreement and the rights and obligations of the Parties hereunder may not be assigned by either party without the prior written consent of the other party. 13. Binding Agreement. This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Parties and their respective representatives, successors and permitted assigns. 14. Waiver. Neither the waiver by either party of a breach of or default under any of the provisions of the Agreement, nor the failure of such party, on one or more occasions, to enforce any of the provisions of the Agreement or to exercise any right or privilege hereunder shall thereafter be construed as a waiver of any subsequent breach or default of a similar nature, or as a waiver of any provisions, rights or privileges hereunder. 15. Further Assurances. The Parties agree to take or cause to be taken such further actions as may be necessary or as may be reasonably requested in order to fully effectuate the purposes, terms, and conditions of this Agreement. 16. Governing Law. This Agreement shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of Virginia (excluding the choice of law rules thereof). The language of all parts of this Agreement shall in all cases be construed as a whole, according to its fair meaning, and not strictly for or against either party. 7
17. Acknowledgment. I acknowledge that I have read and understand the foregoing Agreement and execute it voluntarily and without coercion. I further acknowledge that the University has advised me to consult with an attorney prior to executing this Agreement. I understand that I have 21 days to consider, execute and deliver this Agreement to the University, unless I voluntarily choose to execute the Agreement before the end of the 21-day period. I further understand that I can revoke my acceptance of this Agreement within seven (7) days of signing it by providing written notice of my revocation to Sharon van Wyk at the University on or before the end of the seventh calendar day after I sign this Agreement. IN WITNESS HEREOF, THE PARTIES HAVE AFFIXED THEIR SIGNATURES BELOW: Mark Leuba American Public University System /s/ Mark Leuba /s/ Sharon van Wyk - -------------------- ------------------------ By: Mark Leuba By: Sharon van Wyk, EVP/COO Date: November 3, 2009 Date: November 3, 2009 8

Exhibit 10.2 CONSULTING AGREEMENT THIS CONSULTING AGREEMENT (the "Agreement") is made and entered in to as of the 2nd day of November, 2009, by and between American Public Education, Inc., a Delaware Corporation (the "Company") having its principal place of business at 111 West Congress Street, Charles Town, West Virginia 25414, and Mark Leuba (the "Consultant") having a place of business at 3788 Dorsey Search Circle, Ellicott City, MD 21042. WHEREAS, the Consultant has expertise in technology matters related to the for-profit education industry, and WHEREAS, the Company desires to obtain the benefits of the Consultant's expertise and knowledge as a consultant and the Consultant desires to provide consulting services to the Company on the terms provided herein. NOW, THEREFORE, the consideration of the premises and mutual covenants and agreements contained herein, the parties agree as follows: Section 1: Services to be provided by the Consultant ----------------------------------------- 1.01 Consulting Services. Contemporaneous with this Agreement, Consultant and the Company are entering into a Separation Agreement and General Release (the "Separation Agreement") that provides for the Consultant to make himself available as an independent consultant, and not as an employee. This Agreement sets forth the terms by which the Consultant will provide the services referenced in the Separation Agreement. The Consultant agrees to provide technology consulting services (the "Services") on a non-exclusive basis to the Company, related to technology and other matters relevant to the Company's business as reasonably agreed to by the Company and the Consultant from time to time from December 4, 2009 through May 31, 2010. The Consultant shall report to the Chief Operations Officer of the Company. 1.02 Equity Awards. Consultant is a former employee of the Company and as such, Consultant received various stock option grants pursuant to the Company equity incentive plans. The Services provided under this Agreement qualify as Services as defined in the Company's 2002 Incentive Stock Plan (the "Plan") and Consultant shall be a Service Provider as defined in the Plan. Consultant's change in responsibilities from an employee to a consultant shall not result in interrupted or terminated Service (as defined by the Plan). Therefore, upon the Consultant ceasing to be an employee and becoming a consultant on December 4, 2009 pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, the Incentive Stock Option No. 28 granted on January 24, 2005 and the Incentive Stock Option No. 47 granted on May 4, 2007 shall remain in full force and effect pursuant to the terms thereof, provided that they will no longer qualify as "incentive stock options." Provided the consultant continues in service, and subject to the other terms of the Plan and the applicable awards, the Consultant shall vest: (a) in the remaining 20% of Option No. 28 on January 24, 2010, and (b) in the remaining 20% of Option No. 47 on May 4, 2010. 1 of 5
Section 2. Compensation ------------ 2.01 Fees and Expenses. In consideration for the Consultant's services and the agreements contained herein, the Company agrees to pay the Consultant a retainer fee of $100,000 for services from December 4, 2009 through May 31, 2010 payable upon receipt of invoice. During the term of this agreement, the Consultant will be responsible for all reasonable and customary expenses incurred by the Consultant in performing services for the Company pursuant to this Agreement. 2.02 Indemnification. As additional consideration for the Services performed by the Consultant hereunder, the Company agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the Consultant from and against any losses, claims, damages or liabilities arising from or based on his performance of Services hereunder. However, the Company shall not be liable in and such case to the extent that any loss, claim, damage or liability arises out of or is based upon the gross negligence of willful misconduct of an indemnified party. Promptly after receipt by the Consultant of notice of the commencement of any action, it shall, if a claim in respect thereof is to be made against the Company under this indemnification provision, notify the Company in writing of the commencement thereof. Upon the Company having notice of the pendency of any such action, the Company shall be entitled in its discretion to participate therein and/or to assume the defense thereof. Section 3. Relationship of the Parties --------------------------- 3.01 Independent Contractor. The Consultant is an independent contractor and is not an agent or employee of, and has no authority to bind, the Company by contract or otherwise. The Consultant will perform the Services under the general direction of the Company, but the Consultant will determine, in the Consultant's sole discretion, the manner and means by which the Services are accomplished, subject to the requirement that the Consultant shall at all times comply with applicable law. The Company has no right or authority to control the manner or means by which the Services are accomplished.
3.02 Employment Taxes and Benefits. The Consultant will report as self-employment income all compensation received by the Consultant pursuant to this Agreement. The Consultant will indemnify the Company and hold it harmless from and against all claims, damages, losses and expenses, including reasonable fees and expenses of attorneys and other professionals, relating to any obligation imposed by law on the Company to pay any withholding taxes, social security, unemployment or disability insurance, or similar items in connection with compensation received by the Consultant pursuant to this Agreement. The Consultant will not be entitled to receive any vacation or illness payments, or to participate in any plans, arrangements, or distributions by the Company pertaining to any bonus, profit sharing or similar benefits for the Company's employees. Section 4. Confidential Information. ------------------------- The Consultant agrees that any sensitive, proprietary or confidential information or data relating to the University or any of its affiliates, including without limitation trade secrets, customer lists, customer contacts, customer relationships, the University's financial data, long range or short range plans, and other data and information of a competition-sensitive nature, or any confidential or proprietary information of others licensed to the University, that the Consultant acquired or may acquire while an employee of the University or as an independent consultant to the University shall not be disclosed or used for the Consultant's own purposes or in a manner detrimental to the University's interests. The Consultant agrees to use his best efforts to prevent disclosure of such confidential information and data. In the event that the Consultant receives a subpoena that calls or may call for the disclosure of any such confidential information or data, the Consultant will provide at least five (5) business days advance notice to the University before responding to such subpoena (unless five days notice is not possible, in which case the Consultant will provide as much notice as is possible) and the Consultant will reasonably cooperate with the University in allowing the University an opportunity to object to disclosure of such confidential information or data. Section 5. Term ---- The Initial Term of this Agreement shall be December 4, 2009 through May 31, 2010. Notwithstanding any termination of this Agreement by the Consultant, in consideration of payments received hereunder, the Consultant shall remain bound by the provisions of this Agreement that specifically relate to periods, activities or obligations upon or subsequent to the termination of this Agreement.
Section 6. Termination and Expiration -------------------------- 6.01 Breach. Either party may terminate this Agreement in the event of a breach by the other party of this Agreement or the Separation Agreement if such breach continues uncured for a period of thirty (30) days after written notice. 6.02 Expiration. Unless terminated earlier, this Agreement will expire at the end of the Initial Term. Section 7. Effect of Expiration or Termination ---------------------------------------- 7.01 Survival of Obligations.Upon expiration or termination of this Agreement for any reason, each party will be released from all obligations to the other arising after the date of expiration or termination, except that expiration or termination of this Agreement will not relieve either party of its obligations under Sections 3.02, 4, 7, 8 and 9, nor will expiration or termination relieve the Consultant or the Company from any liability arising from any breach of this Agreement; and 7.02 Return of Confidential Information. Each receiving party will promptly notify the disclosing party of all Confidential Information in the receiving party's possession and, at the expense of the receiving party and in accordance with the disclosing party's instructions, will promptly deliver to the disclosing party, or destroy at the disclosing party's request, all such Confidential Information. Section 8. Limitation of Liability ----------------------- IN NO EVENT SHALL EITHER PARTY BE LIABLE FOR ANY SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, INDIRECT OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES OF ANY KIND IN CONNECTION WITH THIS AGREEMENT, EVEN IF SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN INFORMED IN ADVANCE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. Section 9. General ------- 9.01 Assignment. The Consultant may not assign this Agreement or any of the Consultant's rights or delegate the Consultant's duties under this Agreement either in whole or in part, whether by operation of law or otherwise, without the prior written consent of the Company. Any attempted assignment or delegation without such consent will be void and of no force and effect. 9.02 Governing Law; Severability. This Agreement shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of Virginia (excluding the choice of law rules thereof). The language of all parts of this Agreement shall in all cases be construed as a whole, according to its fair meaning, and not strictly for or against either party.
9.03 Notices. Any notices under this Agreement will be sent by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, or a nationally recognized overnight courier to the address set forth above or such other address as the party specifies in writing. Such notice will be effective upon its mailing. 9.04 Counterparts. This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original, but all of which together shall constitute one and the same document. 9.05 Complete Understanding; Modification This Agreement constitutes the complete and exclusive understanding and agreement of the parties and supersedes all prior understandings and agreements, whether written or oral, with respect to the subject matter hereof. Any waiver, modification or amendment of any provision of this Agreement will be effective only if in writing and signed by the parties hereto. COMPANY CONSULTANT By: /s/ Sharon van Wyk /s/ Mark Leuba ----------------------- ------------------- Sharon van Wyk Mark Leuba Title: EVP/COO


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20100106083153.txt.gz
TIME:20100106083153
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure
The slide presentation of American Public Education, Inc. (the "Company") attached to this current report as exhibit 99.1, and incorporated in this current report by reference, contains information about the Company and its results of operations for presentation at investor meetings on January 5 and 6, 2010.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20100222160252.txt.gz
TIME:20100222160252
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
February 22, 2010
(Date of earliest event reported) 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 22, 2010, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2009.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 5:00 p.m. EDT on February 22, 2010 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports Fourth Quarter and Year End 2009 Results
Full Year 2009 Revenues Increased 39%; Net Income Increased 48% to $23.9 Million or Approximately $1.27 per Diluted Share Compared to the Prior Year
CHARLES TOWN, W. Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--February 22, 2010--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System (APUS), which operates through American Military University and American Public University  announced financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2009.
Recent Highlights:
Net course registrations from new students in the fourth quarter of 2009 increased to approximately 13,700, an increase of approximately 38% over the same period of 2008.
Net course registrations increased to approximately 58,000 in the fourth quarter of 2009, a year-over-year increase of 39%.
As of December 31, 2009, a total of approximately 63,800 students were enrolled in American Public University System, a year-over-year increase of 41%.
Fourth quarter 2009 revenues increased 39% to $43.7 million, compared to $31.5 million in the fourth quarter of 2008.
Income from operations before interest income and income tax in the fourth quarter of 2009 increased 69% to $14.0 million, compared to $8.3 million in the same period of 2008. Operating margin in the fourth quarter of 2009 increased to 32.0%, compared to 26.3% in the fourth quarter of 2008.
Net income for the fourth quarter of 2009 increased 66% to $8.4 million or $0.44 per diluted share, compared to $5.0 million or $0.27 per diluted share in the same period of 2008.
In February 2010, American Public University System received approval from The Higher Learning Commission to offer two new masters degrees, a new bachelors degree, and 10 new certificate programs.
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the fourth quarter of 2009 increased 39% to $43.7 million, compared to total revenues of $31.5 million in the fourth quarter of 2008. Income from operations before interest income and income tax in the fourth quarter of 2009 increased 69% to $14.0 million, compared to $8.3 million in the same period of 2008. Operating margin in the fourth quarter of 2009 increased to 32.0%, compared to 26.3% in the fourth quarter of 2008. Stock-based compensation expense reduced operating income by $574,000 in the fourth quarter of 2009 and $432,000 in the fourth quarter of 2008.
Net income for the fourth quarter of 2009 increased 66% to $8.4 million or $0.44 per diluted share, which includes $366,000 or $0.02 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $5.0 million or $0.27 per diluted share for the fourth quarter of 2008, including $282,000 or $0.01 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the fourth quarter of 2009 and 2008 was approximately 18.9 million in each period.
For the twelve months ended December 31, 2009, total revenues were $149.0 million, an increase of 39% compared to total revenues of $107.1 million in the same period of 2008. Income from operations before interest income and income tax for the twelve months ended December 31, 2009 increased 55% to $39.9 million, compared to $25.7 million in the same period of 2008. Operating margin increased to 26.8% in the year 2009, compared to 24.0% in the same period of 2008. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each period's operating income by $2.2 million and $1.7 million, respectively.
Net income for the twelve months ended December 31, 2009 increased 48% to $23.9 million or $1.27 per diluted share, which includes $1.4 million or $0.08 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $16.2 million or $0.86 per diluted share in the same period of 2008, including 1.1 million or $0.06 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the twelve months ended December 31, 2009 and 2008 were approximately 18.9 million and 18.8 million, respectively.
Total cash and cash equivalents as of December 31, 2009 were $74.9 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the twelve months ended December 31, 2009 was $36.8 million, compared to $29.8 million in the same period of 2008. Capital expenditures were $10.8 million for the twelve months ended December 31, 2009, which compares to $10.0 million in capital expenditures in the same period of 2008. Depreciation and amortization was $5.2 million for the twelve months ended December 31, 2009 and $4.2 million for the same period of 2008.
Net Course Registrations and Student Enrollment:
Note: Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial cost. Total student enrollment is the number of students who have completed at least one course in the last 12 months or are in the start of the second week of class for the most current semester.
Full Year 2010 and 2011 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
For fiscal year 2010, American Public Education currently estimates the following:
Net course registrations to increase between 35% and 38% year-over-year
Revenues to increase between 36% and 39% year-over-year
Net income to increase between 36% and 37% year-over-year
For fiscal year 2011, the Company currently anticipates net course registrations will increase approximately 32% to 35% year-over-year
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys third quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast at 5:00 p.m. Eastern time today. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
About American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, comprises two universities  (AMU) and (APU). Regionally and nationally accredited, APUS serves more than 63,800 part-time students who live and work in all 50 states and in more than 100 countries; and offers 76 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: Harry T. Wilkins, CPA, 304-724-3722 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer or Christopher L. Symanoskie, 703-334-3880 Associate Vice President, Corporate Communications
American Public Education, Inc.

Exhibit 99.2
Advancing at a steady click: The success of our students. The value of our approach. A M E R I C A N P U B L I C E D U C A T I O N , I N C. 1 A M E R I C A N P U B L I C E D U C A T I O N , I N C. Fourth Quarter 2009 Investor Call
Safe Harbor Statement Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect, "intend", "may", "should, "will" and "would". These forwardlooking statements include, without limitation, statements on the slides First Quarter and Full Year 2010 Outlook and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future. A M E R I C A N P U B L I C E D U C A T I O N , I N C. 2
3           A Successful Year for American Public Education           Total student enrollment increased 41% to 63,800 students in 2009 Net course registrations increased 41%Double-digit revenue and earnings growth in the year 2009 Revenues increased 39% to $149.0 million Operating income increased 55% to $39.9 million  Reported full year earnings of $1.27 per diluted share, a 48% increase over 2008Expanding academic quality and gaining recognition  APUS recognized by The Sloan Consortium for excellence in online learning International Association of Emergency Managers (IAEM) honored the APUS Emergency and Disaster Management Program with the 2009 Academic Recognition Award. Received numerous specialty accreditations Three degrees expected to be launched in 2010
4         Title IV Registration Growth:                               90% Growth           (Registrations in Thousands)           Continued Expansion within Military and Civilian Communities          Active Duty Military Registration Growth:                                        (Registrations in Thousands)           31% Growth
          5           Registrations by Source:           Students by Status:           Military66%           Civilian34%           TA  56%           Title IV19%           Cash & Other20%           Veteran Benefits5%           Students by School:           Public Safety & Health 26%           Arts & Humanities 22%           Education 1%           Science & Technology 9%           Business 10%           Management 14%           Security & Global Studies 18%           Students by Level:           Bachelors61%           Masters 23%           Diverse Student Population           Associates16%
6           The Value of Our Distinctive Approach           Affordable tuition with few fees and undergraduate book grant programBroad array of online programs with frequent class starts   76 degree programs, including many unique programs 16 and 8 week course duration and monthly starts Focus on academic quality and transparency  Data-driven approach to managing the entire learning enterprise  Demonstrated results through outcomes assessments and student surveysTransparency by Design Customer service and process improvement  Partnership at a Distance   Illustrated by responsibilities of new hires, Sharon van Wyk (COO) and Dale Young (CIO) Targeted, relationship oriented approach to marketing Consultative enrollment and student advising processes
7 Manage robust top line growth while enhancing academic quality Continue to improve retention rates and driving higher customer satisfaction Implement new, state-of-the-art learning management system (LMS)Launch new degree programs and specializations Serve and expand our relationships and partnershipsVertical marketing managers to focus on additional market segments (e.g., environmental; community colleges; security management)       Steadily Advancing in The Year 2010
8          Financial Overview
9           Recent Highlights in Fourth Quarter 2009 Strong 4Q2009 Net Course Registration Growth Net course registrations increased 39% Net course registrations from new students increased 38% Continued success among key audience segments  Strong financial performance during 4Q2009 Revenues increased 39% to $43.7 million  Operating income increased 69% to $14.0 million  Reported earnings of $0.44 per share, a 66% increase over the prior year period  As previously disclosed, graduate tuition for courses beginning in April 2010 or later will increase to $300 per credit hour ($900 per 3 credit course)
10 Increased Operating Efficiency in 2009
11           Strong Balance Sheet with No Debt           As of December 31, 2008                                   2009           Cash & Cash Equivalents           Total Assets           Total Long-Term Debt           Depreciation and Amortization           CAPEX           ($ in millions)           $47.7           $78.8           $0           $74.9           $115.8           $0           $4.2           $5.2           $10.0           $10.8           Year Ended December 31, 2008                             2009
12           The following statements are based on current expectations.  These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.  Net course registration growth         Revenue growth        Net Income growth               For fiscal year 2011, the Company currently anticipates net course registrations will increase approximately 32% to 35% year-over-year.           1Q2010    36% to 38%38% to 40%35% to 36%           FYQ2010  35% to 38%36% to 39%     36% to 37%           Introducing Full Year 2010 & 2011 Outlook
13           RevenuesIn millions            Income from operations before interest income and income taxIn millions         (1) Excludes a $3.1 million write-off of capitalized software development costs in 2006.            Net Course RegistrationsIn thousands           Strong Growth and Operating Leverage           1           CAGR: 45%           CAGR: 45%           CAGR: 62%
14           Advancing at a steady click:           The success of our students. The value of our approach.           A M E R I C A N  P U B L I C  E D U C A T I O N  ,  I N C.           Fourth Quarter 2009 Investor Call


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20100506160557.txt.gz
TIME:20100506160557
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
May 6, 2010
(Date of earliest event reported) 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On May 6, 2010, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2010.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 5:00 p.m. EDT on May 6, 2010 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports First Quarter 2010 Results
First Quarter 2010 Revenues Increased 43%; Net Income Increased 46% to $7.6 Million or Approximately $0.40 per Diluted Share Compared to the Prior Year
CHARLES TOWN, W.Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--May 6, 2010--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System (APUS), which operates through American Military University and American Public University  announced financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2010.
Recent Highlights:
First quarter 2010 revenues increased 43% to $47.3 million, compared to $33.2 million in the first quarter of 2009.
Net course registrations increased to approximately 64,900 in the first quarter of 2010, a year-over-year increase of 39%.
Net course registrations from new students in the first quarter of 2010 increased to approximately 13,300, an increase of approximately 26% over the same period of 2009.
As of March 31, 2010, a total of approximately 70,600 students were enrolled in American Public University System, a year-over-year increase of 42%.
Income from operations before interest income and income taxes in the first quarter of 2010 increased 50% to $13.1 million, compared to $8.7 million in the same period of 2009.
Net income for the first quarter of 2010 increased 46% to $7.6 million or $0.40 per diluted share, compared to $5.2 million or $0.28 per diluted share in the same period of 2009.
American Public Education raises full year 2010 net income growth outlook to between 36% and 39% year-over-year.
American Public University System announces a new partnership to provide classes to faculty and other employees of Connections Academy, a leading national operator of K-12 virtual public schools.
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the first quarter of 2010 increased 43% to $47.3 million, compared to total revenues of $33.2 million in the first quarter of 2009. Income from operations before interest income and income taxes in the first quarter of 2010 increased 50% to $13.1 million, compared to $8.7 million in the same period of 2009. Operating margin in the first quarter of 2010 increased to 27.8%, compared to 26.3% in the first quarter of 2009. Stock-based compensation expense reduced operating income by $755,000 in the first quarter of 2010 and $535,000 in the first quarter of 2009.
Net income for the first quarter of 2010 increased 46% to $7.6 million or $0.40 per diluted share, which includes $475,000 or $0.03 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $5.2 million or $0.28 per diluted share for the first quarter of 2009, including $346,000 or $0.02 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. The weighted average of diluted shares outstanding for the first quarter of 2010 and 2009 was approximately 19.0 million and 18.9 million, respectively.
Total cash and cash equivalents as of March 31, 2010 were $85.5 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the three months ended March 31, 2010 was $14.2 million, compared to $6.3 million in the same period of 2009. Capital expenditures were $3.7 million for the three months ended March 31, 2010, which compares to $1.8 million in capital expenditures in the same period of 2009. Depreciation and amortization was $1.4 million for the three months ended March 31, 2010 and $1.3 million for the same period of 2009.
American Public University System announces an agreement to make its online programs available to faculty and other employees of Connections Academy, a leading national operator of K-12 virtual public schools. Through this partnership, eligible Connections Academy employees may take up to four APUS classes annually with minimal or no out-of-pocket cost. The program is designed to enhance Connections Academys employee education benefit and complement its commitment to life-long learning.
Note: Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial cost. Total student enrollment is the number of students who have completed at least one course in the last 12 months or are in the start of the second week of class for the most current semester.
Full Year 2010 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
For fiscal year 2010, American Public Education currently estimates the following:
Net course registrations to increase between 35% and 38% year-over-year
Revenues to increase between 36% and 39% year-over-year
Net income to increase between 36% and 39% year-over-year
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys first quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast at 5:00 p.m. Eastern time today. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
About American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, comprises two universities  (AMU) and (APU). Regionally and nationally accredited, APUS serves more than 70,600 part-time students who live and work in all 50 states and in more than 100 countries; and offers more than 100 online certificate and degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: American Public Education, Inc. Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304-724-3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Associate Vice President, Corporate Communications 703-334-3880

Exhibit 99.2
Slide: 1 Advancing at a steady click:  The success of our students. The value of our approach.  A M E R I C A N  P U B L I C  E D U C A T I O N  ,  I N C.  First Quarter 2010 Investor Call
Slide: 2 Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect, "intend", "may", "should, "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on the slides Second Quarter and Full Year Outlook and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future. Safe Harbor Statement
Slide: 3 A Successful Start to 2010  Total student enrollment increased 42% to 70,600 students as of 3/31/2010 Net course registrations increased 39% Net course registrations from new students increased 26% Robust revenue and earnings growth in first quarter 2010 Revenues increased 43% to $47.3 million Operating income increased 50% to $13.1 million  Net income increased 46% to $7.6 million, or $0.40 per diluted share APUS Recent Highlights Sakai selected as foundation for new Learning Management System (LMS) Signs agreement to become a preferred education provider for LAPD personnel Announces new program providing classes to employees of Connections Academy Strong growth in net course registrations from students using VA Benefits Preparing three new degrees for launch in late 2010/early 2011 Master of Science in Information Technology, with several concentrations Master of Arts in Psychology RN to Bachelor of Science in Nursing
Slide: 4 Body: Manage robust top line growth while enhancing academic quality Continue to improve retention rates and driving higher customer satisfaction Implement new, state-of-the-art learning management system (LMS) Launch new degree programs and specializations in 2H2010 Serve and expand our relationships and partnerships Vertical marketing managers to focus on additional market segments (e.g., environmental; community colleges; security management) Steadily Advancing Our Strategic Plan
Slide: 5  Financial Overview
Slide: 6  Increased Operating Efficiency
Slide: 7  Strong Balance Sheet with No Debt  As of March 31,  2009 2010  Cash & Cash Equivalents  Total Assets  Total Long-Term Debt  Depreciation and Amortization  CAPEX  ($ in millions)  $74.9  $115.8  $0  $85.5  $127.7  $0  $1.3  $1.4  $1.8  $3.7  Three Months Ended March 31, 2009 2010
Slide: 8  Outlook:  Full Year 2010 Net course registration growth 35% to 38% Revenue growth 36% to 39% Net Income growth 36% to 39%  On Track to Achieve Long-Term Outlook The following statements are based on current expectations.  These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. Quarterly Outlook/Seasonality: 2Q2010 3Q2010 4Q2010 Net course registration growth 34% to 36% -- -- Revenue growth 28% to 30% 40% to 42% 33% to 35% Net Income growth 16% to 18% 56% to 58% 35% to 37%
Slide: 9  Revenues In millions Income from operations before interest income and income tax In millions 2010e represents the midpoint of APEIs full year outlook range. (1) Excludes a $3.1 million write-off of capitalized software development costs in 2006.  Net Course Registrations In thousands  Strong Track Record For Delivering High Growth  1
Slide: 10 Advancing at a steady click:  The success of our students. The value of our approach.  A M E R I C A N  P U B L I C  E D U C A T I O N  ,  I N C.  First Quarter 2010 Investor Call


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20100525171656.txt.gz
TIME:20100525171656
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
o
o
o
 
 
 
Section 5  Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.07 Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
American Public Education, Inc.'s (the "Company") 2010 Annual Meeting of Stockholders (the "Annual Meeting") was held on May 20, 2010. As of March 30, 2010, the date of record for determining the Company stockholders entitled to vote on the proposals presented at the Annual Meeting, there were 18,364,101 shares of Company common stock issued and outstanding and entitled to vote at the Annual Meeting. At the meeting, the holders of 16,740,384 shares of the Company's issued and outstanding common stock were represented in person or by proxy, constituting a quorum. The proposals are described in detail in the Company's definitive proxy statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on April 8, 2010. The vote results detailed below represent final results as certified by the Inspector of Elections.
Following are descriptions of the matters voted on and the final results of such voting:
Proposal 1: Election of Directors:
The following members were elected to the Company's Board of Directors to hold office for the term expiring at the 2011 Annual Meeting of Stockholders or until their successors are elected and qualified or until his or her earlier death, resignation or removal:
Proposal 2: Ratification of the appointment of McGladrey & Pullen, LLP as the Company's independent registered public accounting firm for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2010:
The proposal was approved by the following vote:
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION, INC.
Date: May 25, 2010
By: Harry T. Wilkins Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
   /s/ Harry T. Wilkins                        


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20100805160646.txt.gz
TIME:20100805160646
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
August 5, 2010
(Date of earliest event reported) 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On August 5, 2010, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2010.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 5:00 p.m. EDT on August 5, 2010 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports Second Quarter 2010 Results
CHARLES TOWN, W.Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--August 5, 2010--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ:APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System (APUS), which operates through American Military University (AMU) and American Public University (APU)  announced financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2010.
Recent Highlights:
Net course registrations increased to approximately 64,100 in the second quarter of 2010, a year-over-year increase of 34%.
Net course registrations from new students in the second quarter of 2010 increased to approximately 13,900, an increase of approximately 24% over the same period of 2009.
As of June 30, 2010, a total of approximately 72,300 students were enrolled in American Public University System, a year-over-year increase of 35%.
Net course registrations from civilian students (non-active duty military) increased 53% in the second quarter of 2010, driven by a 59% increase in net course registrations from new civilian students.
Second quarter 2010 revenues increased 30% to $46.3 million, compared to $35.7 million in the second quarter of 2009.
Income from operations before interest income and income taxes in the second quarter of 2010 increased 34% to $11.7 million, compared to $8.8 million in the same period of 2009.
Net income for the second quarter of 2010 increased 32% to $7.0 million or $0.37 per diluted share, compared to $5.3 million or $0.28 per diluted share in the same period of 2009.
The Company believes increased operations activity and recent deployments across all branches of the U.S. Military is affecting net course registrations from active duty military students at AMU. American Public Education anticipates third quarter 2010 net course registrations to increase between 20% and 22%, revenue to increase between 29% and 31%, and net income to increase between 5% and 10% over the prior year period.
American Public Education announced that its Board of Directors has authorized a program to repurchase up to $20 million worth of shares of the Companys outstanding common stock.
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the second quarter of 2010 increased 30% to $46.3 million, compared to total revenues of $35.7 million in the second quarter of 2009. Income from operations before interest income and income taxes in the second quarter of 2010 increased 34% to $11.7 million, compared to $8.8 million in the same period of 2009. Income from operations before interest income and income taxes was impacted by a $1.6 million reduction in compensation expense related to accrued incentive compensation payments for the year included in each of the respective expense categories. The reduction of accrued incentive compensation is primarily related to the Companys expectation that it will not be required to pay the portion of annual incentive plan compensation tied to financial performance. Operating margin in the second quarter of 2010 increased to 25.3%, compared to 24.7% in the second quarter of 2009. Stock-based compensation expense reduced operating income by $722,000 in the second quarter of 2010 and $552,000 in the second quarter of 2009.
Net income for the second quarter of 2010 increased 32% to $7.0 million or $0.37 per diluted share, which includes $447,000 or $0.02 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $5.3 million or $0.28 per diluted share for the second quarter of 2009, including $355,000 or $0.02 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. The weighted average number of diluted shares outstanding for the second quarter of 2010 and 2009 was approximately 19.0 million and 18.9 million, respectively.
For the six months ended June 30, 2010, total revenues were $93.6 million, an increase of 36% compared to total revenues of $68.9 million in the same period of 2009. Income from operations before interest income and income tax for the six months ended June 30, 2010 increased to $24.9 million, compared to $17.5 million in the same period of 2009. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each period's operating income by $1.5 million and $1.1 million, respectively.
Net income for the six months ended June 30, 2010 increased 39% to $14.7 million or $0.77 per diluted share, which includes $923,000 or $0.05 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $10.6 million or $0.56 per diluted share in the same period of 2009, including $701,000 or $0.04 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the six months ended June 30, 2010 and 2009 were approximately 19.0 million and 18.9 million, respectively.
Total cash and cash equivalents as of June 30, 2010 were $86.2 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the six months ended June 30, 2010 was $18.2 million, compared to $12.6 million in the same period of 2009. Capital expenditures were $8.5 million for the six months ended June 30, 2010, which compares to $4.4 million in capital expenditures in the same period of 2009. Depreciation and amortization was $3.0 million for the six months ended June 30, 2010 and $2.7 million for the same period of 2009.
Military Enrollment and Third Quarter 2010 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
American Public Education has recently observed adverse changes in our historical pattern of growth in net course registrations from active duty military students at AMU. While the Company cannot determine all of the factors that are causing it to occur, American Public Education believes the changes in net course registrations from active duty military students may in part be due to increased operations activity and recent deployments across all branches of the U.S. Military, particularly the United States Marine Corps. The Company believes that increased demands on many active duty military personnel, combined with limited internet access associated with some deployments in Afghanistan and at sea, are likely to limit the ability of certain active duty military students to pursue higher education in the near term. The Company cannot determine whether net course registrations from active duty military students will return to previous expectations, grow more slowly than expected, remain flat or decline.
As a result, American Public University Systems plans to accelerate its existing strategic plan to address civilian markets through APU, with an emphasis on public service professionals and selected groups of working adults.
American Public Education is revising guidance for the third quarter of 2010 and is returning to its prior practice of only providing guidance for current periods. Guidance given previously for 2010 and beyond should no longer be relied upon. American Public Education anticipates third quarter 2010 net course registrations to increase between 20% and 22%, revenue to increase between 29% and 31%, and net income to increase between 5% and 10% over the prior year period.
Share Repurchase Program:
American Public Education announced that its Board of Directors has authorized a program to repurchase up to $20 million worth of shares of the Companys common stock. Subject to market conditions, applicable legal requirements and other factors, the repurchases may be made in open market transactions, including pursuant to a trading plan adopted in accordance with Rule 10b5-1 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The repurchase program is subject to a purchase limit (Program Share Cap) that is intended to result in the Company having no fewer than 18,000,000 total shares of Stock outstanding; as of August 3, 2010 there were approximately 477,000 shares available for purchase in accordance with the Program Share Cap.
Note: Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial cost. Total student enrollment is the number of students who have completed at least one course in the last 12 months or are in the start of the second week of class for the most current semester.
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys second quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast at 5:00 p.m. Eastern time today. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
About American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ:APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, comprises two universities  (AMU) and (APU). Regionally and nationally accredited, APUS serves more than 72,300 part-time students who live and work in all 50 states and in more than 100 countries; and offers more than 100 online certificate and degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements regarding expected growth, military deployments and share repurchase activity. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304-724-3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Associate Vice President, Corporate Communications 703-334-3880
American Public Education

Exhibit 99.2
Advancing Online Higher Education A M E R I C A N  P U B L I C  E D U C A T I O N  ,  I N C. Second Quarter 2010 Investor Call
2 Safe Harbor Statement Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect, "intend", "may", "should, "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on slides Advancing Our Current Strategic Plan and Third Quarter Outlook, as well as statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009 as filed with the SEC, and in the Companys other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
3 Recent Highlights & Academic Accolades Student enrollment increased 35% to 72,300 students as of June 30, 2010 Net course registrations increased 34% Net course registrations from new students increased 24% Revenue and earnings growth in second quarter 2010 Revenues increased 30% to $46.3 million Operating income increased 34% to $11.7 million Net income increased 32% to $7.0 million, or $0.37 per diluted share Increasingly Recognized for Academic Excellence APUS awarded an Effective Practice Award by Sloan-C for research on Semantic Mapping of Learning Assets Dr. Gwendolyn M. Hall, Dean of Security and Global Studies, has been appointed as a member of the U.S. Department of Defense Threat Reduction Advisory Committee (TRAC) Dr. Phil Ice, Director of Course Design, Research & Development, is one of four academic leaders worldwide elected to Adobes Higher Education Leaders Advisory Board
4 Advancing Our Current Strategic Plan Decline in Military Course Registrations Impacting AMU; Likely from Level of Deployments and  Activity. The Company is uncertain of the total impact.  Company anticipates third quarter 2010 net course registrations to increase between 20% and 22% year over year. As a result, APUS intends to accelerate its existing strategic plans to address civilian markets.  Increase civilian outreach with existing marketing model Expand PR efforts/branding APU in civilian communities Enhance successful outreach to Veterans and other military-affiliated audiences Engage political influencers and academic audiences Provide high academic quality and customer satisfaction Continue improving retention rates and driving higher customer satisfaction Implement new, state-of-the-art learning management system (LMS) Launch new degree programs and specializations in 4Q2010/1Q2011 The above statements are based on current expectations.  These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
5 Financial Overview
6 Increased Operating Efficiency Three Months Six Months Ended June 30, 2010 2009 Ended June 30, 2010 2009 Revenues 100.0 % 100.0 % 100.0 % 100.0 % Costs and expenses: Instructional costs and services 37.6 40.2 37.8 39.4 Selling and promotional 17.6 14.4 16.3 13.8 General and administrative 16.1 16.9 16.1 17.6 Depreciation and amortization 3.4 3.8 3.2 3.8 Total costs and expenses 74.7 75.3 73.4 74.6 Income from operations before interest income and income taxes 25.3 24.7 26.6 25.4 Interest income, net 0.1 0.0 0.1 0.1 Income from operations before income taxes 25.4 24.7 26.7 25.5 Income tax expense 10.3 9.8 11.0 10.2 Net Income 15.1 % 14.9 % 15.7 % 15.3 %
7 Third Quarter Outlook Anticipated Year Over Year Growth Prior 3Q2010 Revised 3Q2010 Registrations 29% to 31%2 20% to 22% Revenue 40% to 42% 29% to 31% Net Income1 56% to 58% 5% to 10% Selling and Promotional Expense as % of Revenue: 17% to 18% 20% to 21% 1 Increased spending on instruction, marketing, and Walmart partnership is partially offset by incentive compensation payment decrease. 2 Implied growth range, not issued in previous outlook
8 Strong Balance Sheet with No Debt As of December 31, 2010 As of June 30, 2010 ($ in millions) Cash & Cash Equivalents Total Assets Total Long-Term Debt $74.9 $115.8 $0 $86.2 $134.7 $0 Six Months Ended June 30, 2009 2010 Depreciation and Amortization CAPEX $2.7 $4.4 $3.0 $8.5
9 Additional Highlights Board of Directors authorized $20 million share repurchase program Open market trades, including ability to use a 10b5-1 plan Intended to result in no fewer than 18.0 million shares outstanding Recertification application for Title IV participation has been approved, removing APUS from provisional status
10 Advancing Online Higher Education A M E R I C A N  P U B L I C  E D U C A T I O N  ,  I N C. Second Quarter 2010 Investor Call


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20100806140107.txt.gz
TIME:20100806140107
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
August 6, 2010
(Date of earliest event reported)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Section 7  Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
American Public Education, Inc. received a request for information and documents from the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Health, Education, Labor and Pensions.  The Company understands that the request is one of thirty made to for-profit colleges in connection with the Committees review of matters related to for-profit colleges participating in Title IV programs.  The Company expects to respond appropriately to the Committees request.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20100908162508.txt.gz
TIME:20100908162508
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
o
o
o
 
 
 
Section 8  Other Events
Item 8.01. Other Events.
American Public Education, Inc. (the "Company") today announced that its Board of Directors has amended the Company's share repurchase program, which was initially announced on August 5, 2010. The amendment removes the share cap under the share repurchase program that was intended to result in the Company having no fewer than 18,000,000 total shares of common stock outstanding. As amended, the Company's share repurchase program authorizes the repurchase of shares of the Company's common stock in an aggregate value of $20 million, with no limitation on the aggregate number of shares that may be repurchased. Subject to market conditions, applicable legal requirements and other factors, the repurchases may be made in open market transactions, including pursuant to a trading plan adopted in accordance with Rule 10b5-1 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20101108160156.txt.gz
TIME:20101108160156
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
November 8, 2010
(Date of earliest event reported)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On November 8, 2010, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2010.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 5:00 p.m. EDT on November 8, 2010 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports Third Quarter 2010 Results
CHARLES TOWN, W.Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--November 8, 2010--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System (APUS), which operates through American Military University (AMU) and American Public University (APU)  announced financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2010.
Recent Highlights:
Net course registrations increased to approximately 69,200 in the third quarter of 2010, a year-over-year increase of 25%.
Net course registrations from new students in the third quarter of 2010 increased to approximately 16,000, an increase of approximately 9% over the same period of 2009.
As of September 30, 2010, a total of approximately 77,700 students were enrolled in American Public University System, a year-over-year increase of 31%.
American Public Education reported third quarter 2010 revenues increased 32% to $48.3 million, compared to $36.5 million in the third quarter of 2009.
Income from operations before interest income and income tax in the third quarter of 2010 increased 11% to $9.3 million, compared to $8.4 million in the same period of 2009.
Net income for the third quarter of 2010 increased 11% to $5.6 million or $0.30 per diluted share, compared to $5.0 million or $0.27 per diluted share in the same period of 2009.
As of September 30, 2010, the Company repurchased 340,000 shares under its repurchase program for an aggregate amount of $9.2 million.
American Public Education anticipates fourth quarter 2010 net course registrations to increase between 26% and 29%; net course registrations from new students to increase between 18% and 20%; revenues to increase between 27% and 30% over the prior year period; and net income to be between $0.45 and $0.47 per diluted share.
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the third quarter of 2010 increased 32% to $48.3 million, compared to total revenues of $36.5 million in the third quarter of 2009. Income from operations before interest income and income tax in the third quarter of 2010 increased 11% to $9.3 million, compared to $8.4 million in the same period of 2009. Stock-based compensation expense reduced operating income by $704,000 in the third quarter of 2010 and $562,000 in the third quarter of 2009.
Income from operations before interest income and income tax in the third quarter of 2010 includes $326,000 of additional legal fees and related expenses in connection with preparing responses to the request for information from the U.S. Senate Committee on Health, Education, Labor and Pensions relating to the Committees hearings on for-profit colleges.
Net income for the third quarter of 2010 increased 11% to $5.6 million or $0.30 per diluted share, which includes $434,000 or $0.02 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $5.0 million or $0.27 per diluted share for the third quarter of 2009, including $359,000 or $0.02 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the third quarter of 2010 and 2009 was approximately 18.9 million in each period.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2010, total revenues were $141.9 million, an increase of 35% compared to total revenues of $105.3 million in the same period of 2009. Income from operations before interest income and income tax for the nine months ended September 30, 2010 increased 32% to $34.2 million, compared to $25.9 million in the same period of 2009. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each period's operating income by $2.2 million and $1.6 million, respectively.
The Company repurchased 340,000 shares under the Companys previously announced repurchase program for an aggregate amount of $9.2 million. As of September 30, 2010, there was $10.8 million available for further repurchases of the Companys shares under the repurchase program.
Net income for the nine months ended September 30, 2010 increased 30% to $20.3 million or $1.07 per diluted share, which includes $1.4 million or $0.07 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $15.6 million or $0.82 per diluted share in the same period of 2009, including $1.1 million or $0.06 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the nine months ended September 30, 2010 and 2009 were approximately 19.0 million and 18.9 million, respectively.
Total cash and cash equivalents as of September 30, 2010 were $86.6 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the nine months ended September 30, 20010 was $32.8 million, compared to $22.8 million in the same period of 2009. Capital expenditures were $14.4 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2010, which compares to $8.6 million in capital expenditures in the same period of 2009. Depreciation and amortization was $4.7 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2010 and $3.9 million for the same period of 2009.
Fourth Quarter 2010 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason.
American Public Education anticipates fourth quarter 2010 net course registrations to increase between 26% and 29%; net course registrations from new students to increase between 18% and 20%; revenues to increase between 27% and 30% over the prior year period; and net income to be between $0.45 and $0.47 per diluted share.
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys third quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast at 5:00 p.m. Eastern time today. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
About American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, comprises two universities  (AMU) and (APU). Regionally and nationally accredited, APUS serves more than 75,000 adult learners worldwide and offers 79 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, Inc. or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education, Inc. and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate," "believe," "could," "estimate," "expect," "intend," "may," "should," "will" and "would." These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements regarding expected growth and share repurchase activity. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: American Public Education, Inc. Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304-724-3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Associate Vice President, Corporate Communications 703-334-3880

Exhibit 99.2
Advancing Online Higher Education AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION,  INC. Third Quarter 2010 Investor Call apei
Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect, "intend", "may", "should, "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on slides Advancing Our Current Strategic Plan and Third Quarter Outlook, as well as statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009 and the Companys Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended June 30 and September 30, 2010 as filed with the SEC, and in the Companys other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future. Safe Harbor Statement 2
Third Quarter 2010 Update Military Growth Slowed in 3Q; Current Military Enrollment Appears to be Stabilizing Civilian Growth Continues StrongIncremental Marketing Proving Successful Initial Transition to Sakai Learning Management Platform Appears to be Successful APUS Academic Center to Open in NovemberCompany repurchased 340,000 shares under the repurchase program for an aggregate amount of $9.2 million..As of September 30, 2010 Net Course Registrations by Pay Type Cash & Other Sources 18% TA 48% Title IV 25% VA 9% Pay Type Growth (YoY) 10% 58% 12% 111% 3
Advancing Our Approach in 2010/2011 A Mission-Driven Organization Executing Existing Strategic Plan Academic Quality Addressing Need for Affordability Relationship Marketing  Focus Leveraging Investments in Sakai and Facilities Preparing for New Regulations Investing in Future Growth Addressing new and existing opportunities 4
Financial Overview 5 AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION
Third Quarter 2010 Update Revenues increased 32% to $48.3 million compared to 2009 period Operating income increased 11% to $9.3 million compared to 2009 period Includes $326,000 of HELP Committee legal expenses Also includes a $676,000 reinstatement of an accrual that was reversed in the previous quarter related to the portion of the annual incentive plan that is tied to financial performance. Net income increased 11% to $5.6 million, or $0.30 per diluted share compared to 2009 period Strong Balance Sheet with No Debt $86.6 million in Cash & Cash Equivalents Low Bad Debt Expense Less Than 1% of Revenue Stock Repurchase 6
Income Data as Percentage of Revenue  100.0 % 100.0 % 100.0 % 100.0 % Costs and expenses: Instructional costs and services 40.3 40.4 38.7 39.7 Selling and promotional 19.9 15.3 17.5 14.3 General and administrative 17.0 17.7 16.4 17.6 Depreciation and amortization 3.5 3.5 3.3 3.8 Total costs and expenses 80.7 76.9 75.9 75.4 Income from operations before interest income and income taxes 19.3 23.1 24.1 24.6 Interest income, net 0.1 0.0 0.1 0.1 Income from operations before income taxes 19.4 23.1 24.2 24.7 Income tax expense 7.8 9.3 9.9 9.9 Net Income 11.6 % 13.8 % 14.3 % 14.8 % Nine Months Ended September 30,20102009Three Months Ended September 30,20102009 Revenues 7
Fourth Quarter 2010 Growth Outlook Fourth Quarter 2010 Net course registrations growth 26% to 29% Net course registration growth from new students 18% to 20% Revenue growth 27% to 30% Earnings per share $0.45 to $0.47 The following statements are based on current expectations.  These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.
Advancing Online Higher Education AMERICAN  PUBLIC EDUCATION, INC. Third Quarter 2010 Investor Call


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20101206163047.txt.gz
TIME:20101206163047
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
December 1, 2010
(Date of earliest event reported)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item 5.02. Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On December 1, 2010, Dr. Frank McCluskey announced that, effective March 17, 2011, he was retiring from his position as Executive Vice President and Provost of American Public University System, Inc., a wholly owned subsidiary of American Public Education, Inc.  It is currently expected that Dr. McCluskey will serve as Scholar in Residence of Educational Theory at American Public University System after he steps down from his current position.  
Item 7.01.  Regulation FD.
On December 6, 2010, American Public University System issued a press release announcing the resignation of Dr. Frank McCluskey.  That press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
Item 9.01.  Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits
Exhibit 99.1        Press Release of American Public University System, Inc. issued December 6, 2010.
2
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
3

Exhibit 99.1
Dr. Frank B. McCluskey Plans to Retire as Executive Vice President and Provost of American Public University System
Recognized Expert on Learning Outcomes to Serve as Scholar in Residence of Educational Theory
CHARLES TOWN, W.Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--December 6, 2010--American Public University System (APUS) today announced that Dr. Frank B. McCluskey plans to retire from his role as of APUS effective March 17, 2011. His affiliation with APUS is expected to continue through a new role as .
executive vice president and provost
scholar in residence
of educational theory
Dr. McCluskey, 61, has served the university for nearly six years during which the institution earned regional accreditation and increased recognition from the academic community. Over the span of 21 years of leadership roles in higher education, he has published numerous papers and given scholarly presentations on such topics as online pedagogy, active learning, and the administration of online learning in higher education.
Dr. Wallace E. Boston, APUS president and chief executive officer, We are tremendously grateful for the dedicated service of Dr. McCluskey and his unyielding commitment to student learning which has resulted in APUS being recognized as a leader in online higher education. His work and accomplishments have furthered the academic achievement and career advancement of thousands of university graduates throughout the years.
Dr. McCluskey is expected to serve the university as  In this role, he will advise the institution on matters of online learning and advancing effective instructional and outcomes measurement practices in collaboration with higher education leaders nationwide.
scholar in residence
of educational theory.
We look forward to Dr. McCluskeys continued association with the university and his contributions to advancing best practices in online higher education, added Dr. Boston.
About American Public University System
American Public University System, winner of the Sloan Consortium's 2009 Ralph E. Gomory Award for Quality Online Education and a recipient of Sloan's Effective Practice Award in 2009 and 2010, offers 79 online degree programs through its American Public University and American Military University institutions. APUS's relevant curriculum, affordability and flexibility help more than 75,000 working adults worldwide pursue degrees in subjects ranging from homeland security to management and liberal arts. For more information, visit .
www.apus.edu
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, Inc. or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education, Inc. and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements regarding expected growth and share repurchase activity. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: Brian Muys, 703-334-3225 or Chris Symanoskie, 703-334-3880
American Public University System
bmuys@apus.edu
csymanoskie@apus.edu


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20110217160149.txt.gz
TIME:20110217160149
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
February 17, 2011
(Date of earliest event reported)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 17, 2011, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2010.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 5:00 p.m. EST on February 17, 2011 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports Fourth Quarter and Full Year 2010 Results
Full Year 2010 Net Income Increased 25% to $29.9 Million or Approximately $1.59 per Diluted Share Compared to the Prior Year
CHARLES TOWN, W.Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--February 17, 2011--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System (APUS), which operates through American Military University (AMU) and American Public University (APU)  announced financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2010.
Recent Highlights:
Net course registrations from new students in the fourth quarter of 2010 increased to approximately 16,500, an increase of approximately 20% over the same period of 2009.
Net course registrations increased to approximately 73,900 in the fourth quarter of 2010, a year-over-year increase of 27%.
As of December 31, 2010, a total of approximately 83,700 students were enrolled in American Public University System, a year-over-year increase of 31%.
American Public Education reported fourth quarter 2010 revenues increased 29% to $56.3 million, compared to $43.7 million in the fourth quarter of 2009.
Income from operations before interest income and income tax in the fourth quarter of 2010 increased 13% to $15.8 million, compared to $14.0 million in the same period of 2009.
Net income for the fourth quarter of 2010 increased 14% to $9.6 million or $0.52 per diluted share, compared to $8.4 million or $0.44 per diluted share in the same period of 2009.
American Public Education anticipates first quarter 2011 net course registrations from new students to increase approximately 27%; net course registrations to increase approximately 25%; revenues to increase approximately 20% over the prior year period; and net income to be between $0.43 and $0.45 per diluted share.
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the fourth quarter of 2010 increased 29% to $56.3 million, compared to total revenues of $43.7 million in the fourth quarter of 2009. Income from operations before interest income and income tax in the fourth quarter of 2010 increased 13% to $15.8 million, compared to $14.0 million in the same period of 2009. Stock-based compensation expense reduced operating income by $624,000 in the fourth quarter of 2010 and $574,000 in the fourth quarter of 2009.
Net income for the fourth quarter of 2010 increased 14% to $9.6 million or $0.52 per diluted share, which includes $386,000 or $0.02 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $8.4 million or $0.44 per diluted share for the fourth quarter of 2009, including $366,000 or $0.02 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the fourth quarter of 2010 and 2009 were approximately 18.4 million and 18.9 million, respectively.
For the twelve months ended December 31, 2010, total revenues were $198.2 million, an increase of 33% compared to total revenues of $149.0 million in the same period of 2009. Income from operations before interest income and income tax for the twelve months ended December 31, 2010 increased 25% to $50.0 million, compared to $39.9 million in the same period of 2009. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each period's operating income by $2.8 million and $2.2 million, respectively.
Income from operations before interest income and income tax in the twelve months ended December 31, 2010 includes $492,000 of additional legal fees and related expenses in connection with preparing responses to the request for information from the U.S. Senate Committee on Health, Education, Labor and Pensions relating to the Committees hearings on for-profit colleges. During the third and fourth quarter of 2010, the Company repurchased approximately 682,000 shares under the Companys previously announced and completed repurchase program for an aggregate amount of $20 million.
Net income for the twelve months ended December 31, 2010 increased 25% to $29.9 million or $1.59 per diluted share, which includes $1.7 million or $0.09 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $23.9 million or $1.27 per diluted share in the same period of 2009, including $1.4 million or $0.07 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the twelve months ended December 31, 2010 and 2009 were approximately 18.8 million and 18.9 million, respectively.
Total cash and cash equivalents as of December 31, 2010 were $81.4 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the twelve months ended December 31, 2010 was $47.1 million, compared to $36.8 million in the same period of 2009. Capital expenditures were $22.5 million for the twelve months ended December 31, 2010, which compares to $10.8 million in capital expenditures in the same period of 2009. Depreciation and amortization was $6.5 million for the twelve months ended December 31, 2010 and $5.2 million for the same period of 2009.
Share Repurchase Program
American Public Education announced that its Board of Directors has authorized a common stock share repurchase program that is designed to provide an opportunity to potentially offset some of the dilution that results from the issuance of additional shares under the Company's equity incentive and employee stock purchase plans. Under this program, the Company has authorization to repurchase up to the cumulative number of shares issued or deemed issued under the Company's equity incentive and employee stock purchase plans beginning with shares issued in 2011. Subject to market conditions, applicable legal requirements and other factors, the repurchases may be made in open market transactions, including pursuant to a trading plan adopted in accordance with Rule 10b5-1 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. There is no guarantee that any share repurchases will be made, and the Board of Directors may modify, suspend, extend or terminate the program at any time.
First Quarter 2011 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason.
American Public Education anticipates first quarter 2011 net course registrations from new students to increase approximately 27%; net course registrations to increase approximately 25%; revenues to increase approximately 20% over the prior year period; and net income to be between $0.43 and $0.45 per diluted share.
1
1
First quarter revenues are expected to be impacted by the timing of monthly starts, which will effectively result in an additional week of revenue flowing into the second quarter as a result of a later class start in March.
On January 3, 2011, APUS combined one-credit lab courses with their related three-credit classes. As a result, the company plans to report future net course registrations for the resulting four-credit courses as one registration. In the first quarter 2011 outlook, net course registration growth rates exclude other non-credit registrations and are presented as if labs and classes were combined in the prior year period.
1
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys fourth quarter and full year earnings conference call will be broadcast at 5:00 p.m. EST today. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
About American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, comprises two universities  (AMU) and (APU). Regionally and nationally accredited, APUS serves more than 83,000 adult learners worldwide and offers 79 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, Inc. or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education, Inc. and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements regarding expected growth and share repurchase activity. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: American Public Education, Inc. Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304-724-3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Associate Vice President, Corporate Communications 703-334-3880

Exhibit 99.2
Slide:    1                Advancing Online Higher Education          A M E R I C A N  P U B L I C  E D U C A T I O N  ,  I N C. Fourth Quarter 2010 Investor Call
Slide:    2         Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements are some times identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect, "intend", "may", "should, "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on slide First Quarter 2011 Outlook, as well as statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009 and the Companys Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarters ended June 30 and September 30, 2010 as filed with the SEC, and in the Companys other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
Slide:    3         Fourth Quarter 2010 Update    Civilian Growth Accelerates;           Driven by Effective Awareness Campaigns & The Compelling Value Proposition of AMU and APU.Military Enrollment Stabilizes;                   Showing Slight Improvements in Recent Months.Investing in Quality, Brand & Infrastructure;                    Transition to Sakai LMS Proceeding as Planned; APUS Academic Center Opens; Investing in Brand Awareness and Expanding Relationships;  Expanding Collaboration with Academic Community and Related Audiences.      As of December 31, 2010       Net Course Registrations          by Pay Type     Cash & Other Sources 15%      TA 49%    Title IV29%         VA7%
Slide:    4         Key Accomplishments in 2010   Increasing Recognition;                 Two-time recipient (2009-2010) of Sloan-C Effective Practice Award.  This is the first time that representatives from a single institution have been recognized in consecutive years.Scholarly Research;                    Faculty and staff are encouraged to research and write peer reviewed articles, conference presentations, workshops, and white papers, as well as to support and engage their academic and professional communities.Extensive Self-Study Evaluation;                 As a normal part of the reaccreditation process, APUS completed an extensive, multi-year self evaluation.  The study engages students, alumni, employers, faculty, staff and other audiences served by APUS.    Three New Degree Programs;             Master of Science in Information Technology, with several concentrations; Master of Arts in Psychology; and RN to Bachelor of Science in Nursing.
Slide:    5         APUS is Leading the Way       Affordable Tuition  More affordable than in-state tuition at most state schoolsUndergraduate book grant program and few feesNo undergraduate tuition increase in a decade Less student debt upon graduation Focus on Learning Outcomes Recognized for approach to measuring student learning Transparent, demonstrated outcomes Small average class sizes Relationship-Oriented Awareness Campaigns Supporting professional associations and community groupsServe communities as partner not vendor Social networking; Limited use of Lead Gen  an integrated approach Consultative Approach to Enrollment and Advising Appropriately sized advising department Trained for academic advising and customer service
Slide:    6         AMU & APU Graduates           * 2010 APUS Alumni Survey, APUS Employer Survey.            The Best Judge of Quality: Successful Alumni       More than 40% of APUS graduates return for a second degree 98% of APUS alumni employers surveyed would hire another graduate from APUS*93% of alumni surveyed 1 year after graduation agreed or strongly agreed that AMU/APU meet their overall expectations* More than 90% of alumni surveyed would recommend AMU/APU to family, friends or co-workers*       CAGR 60%
Slide:    7         Financial Overview
Slide:    8         Fourth Quarter 2010 Update    Fourth quarter 2010 revenues increased 29% year-over-year to $56.3 million Operating income increased to $15.8 million Net income increased to $9.6 million, or $0.52 per diluted share Strong Balance Sheet with No Debt $81.4 million in Cash & Cash Equivalents Limited Share Repurchase Program Authorized by Board of Directors
de:    9         First Quarter 2011 Outlook  First Quarter 2011 (Y/Y) Net course registration growth from new students1  approximately 25% Net course registrations growth1   approximately 27% Revenue growth approximately 20%  Earnings per diluted share     $0.43 to $0.45      The following statements are based on current expectations.  These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.          1On January 3, 2011, APUS combined one-credit lab courses with their related three-credit classes.  As a result, the company plans to report future net course registrations for the resulting four-credit courses as one registration. In the first quarter 2011 outlook, net course registration growth rates exclude other non-credit registrations and are presented as if labs and classes were combined in the prior year period.For comparison, adjusted first quarter 2010 net course registrations are being provided to reflect historical net course registrations had the courses been combined during the prior year period and excluding non-credit registrations:. First Quarter 2010    As Reported         Adjusted  Net Course Registrations      64,900    62,000Net Course Registrations from New Students 13,300    13,000
Slide:    10        Unique Approach is Key Long-Term Success          A Mission-Driven Organization Executing Existing Strategic Plan  Academic Quality Addressing Need for Affordability  Relationship Oriented Leveraging Investments in Sakai and New Facilities Preparing for New RegulationsInvesting in Future Growth Addressing new and existing opportunities
Slide:    11               Advancing Online Higher Education          A M E R I C A N  P U B L I C  E D U C A T I O N  ,  I N C. Third Quarter 2010 Investor Call


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20110510170052.txt.gz
TIME:20110510170052
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
May 10, 2011
(Date of earliest event reported)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On May 10, 2011, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2011.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 5:00 p.m. EST on May 10, 2011 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports First Quarter 2011 Results
CHARLES TOWN, W.V.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--May 10, 2011--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System (APUS), which operates through American Military University (AMU) and American Public University (APU)  announced financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2011.
Recent Highlights:
Net course registrations from new students in the first quarter of 2011 increased to approximately 17,800, an increase of approximately 37% over the same period of 2010.
1
Net course registrationsincreased to approximately 81,100 in the first quarter of 2011, a year-over-year increase of 31%.
1
As of March 31, 2011, a total of approximately 90,600 students were enrolled in American Public University System, a year-over-year increase of 33%.
First quarter 2011 revenues increased 24% to $58.7 million, compared to $47.3 million in the first quarter of 2010.
Net income for the first quarter of 2011 increased to $7.9 million or $0.43 per diluted share, compared to $7.6 million or $0.40 per diluted share in the same period of 2010.
American Public Education anticipates second quarter 2011 net course registrations from new students to increase approximately 27%; net course registrations to increase approximately 25%; revenues to increase approximately 28%; and net income to be between $0.43 and $0.46 per diluted share.
1
1
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the first quarter of 2011 increased 24% to $58.7 million, compared to total revenues of $47.3 million in the first quarter of 2010. Income from operations before interest income and income tax was $13.1 million in the first quarter of 2011, which was the same as in the prior year period. Stock-based compensation expense reduced operating income by $862,000 in the first quarter of 2011 and $755,000 in the first quarter of 2010.
Net income for the first quarter of 2011 increased to $7.9 million or $0.43 per diluted share, which includes $528,000 or $0.03 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. This compares to net income of $7.6 million or $0.40 per diluted share for the first quarter of 2010, including $475,000 or $0.03 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the first quarter of 2011 and 2010 were approximately 18.4 million and 19.0 million, respectively.
Total cash and cash equivalents as of March 31, 2011 were $96.5 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the three months ended March 31, 2011 was $19.9 million, compared to $14.2 million in the same period of 2010. Capital expenditures were $3.6 million for the three months ended March 31, 2011, compared to $3.7 million in the prior year period. Depreciation and amortization was $2.1 million for the three months ended March 31, 2011 and $1.4 million for the same period of 2010.
Note: Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty.
On January 3, 2011, APUS combined each one-credit lab course with its related three-credit class resulting in one four-credit course. Net course registrations and net course registration growth rates exclude other non-credit registrations and are presented throughout this press release as if labs and classes were combined in the prior year period.
1
Second Quarter 2011 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason.
American Public Education anticipates second quarter 2011 net course registrations from new students to increase approximately 27%year-over-year; net course registrations to increase approximately 25% year-over-year; revenues to increase approximately 28% over the prior year period; and net income to be between $0.43 and $0.46 per diluted share.
1
1
As noted under Net Course Registrations above, net course registration growth rates exclude other non-credit registrations and are presented as if labs and classes were combined in the prior year period.
1
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys first quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast at 5:00 p.m. EDT today. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, operates through (AMU) and (APU). APUS serves more than 90,000 adult learners worldwide and offers 79 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts. Nationally recognized for its best practices in online higher education, APUS provides an affordable education through classes taught by experienced faculty who are leaders in their fields and committed to the academic achievement of their students.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
American Public University System is accredited by The Higher Learning Commission and is a member of the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools (NCA), . For more information on American Public Education, Inc., visit. For more information on APUS, visit.
www.ncahlc.org
www.americanpubliceducation.com
www.apus.edu
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, Inc. or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education, Inc. and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements regarding expected growth, expected revenues and expected earnings. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304.724.3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Associate Vice President, Corporate Communications 703.334.3880
American Public Education, Inc.

Exhibit 99.2
First Quarter 2011 Conference Call May 10, 2011
1
Safe Harbor Statement Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, Inc. or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements are some times identified by words such as anticipate, believe, could", estimate, expect, intend, may, should, will and would. The se forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on slide Second Quarter 2011 Outlook, as well as statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the Risk Factors section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010 and the Companys Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter March 31, 2011 as filed with the SEC, and in the Companys other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
2
First Quarter 2011 Highlights Focusing on quality and affordabililty drives continued succes in civilian and military communities supporting scholarly research enhances the student experience, strengthens academic reputation and improves faculty satisfaction. Building Relationships strengthens brand awareness and generates referrals: allows the university to build meaningful long-term partnerships with organizations, groups and industries. Investing in quality brand and infrastructure transition to Sakai proceeding as planned focus on relationships and partnerships yielding positive results investing in compliance and infrastructure for larger student population and building new finance facility.
3
First Quarter 2011 Highlights Focusing on Quality & Affordability For three months ending March 31, 2011 Net Course Registrations by Pay Type Cash & Other 15% TA 47% Title IV 30% VA 8% Drives continued success in civilian and military communities. Supporting Scholarly Research Enhances the student experience, strengthens academic reputation, and improves faculty satisfaction. Building Relationships Strengthens brand awareness and generates referrals; allows the university to build meaningful, long-term partnerships with organizations, groups and industries. Investing in Quality, Brand & Infrastructure Transition to Sak ai proceeding as planned; focus on relationships and partnerships yielding positive results; investing in compliance and infrastructure for larger student population; and building new academic/administrative facility.
Continued Military Market share gains in 2010 despite a high level of military development activity and transition APUS continued to expand presence in the military community
4
Certified by ACBSP APUS will soon announce participation in a major grant initiative Six-month consortium pilot project on predictive analytics initiative, involving six major online institutions Utilizes foundational work pioneered at APUS with APUS principal investigator Collaboration with Learning Community Shared panel with Gates Foundation and DoE at Consumer Electrics Show Presented at Higher Learning Commissions Annual Conference Winner of a Next Generation Learning Grant from Gates Foundation Expanding Relationships BAE Systems and Sun-Maid National Military Fish and Wildlife Association, and Airforwarders Association (AfA) Lockheed Martin Center for Security A nalysis (LMSCA) and others.
5
First Quarter 2011 Financial Highlights First quarter 2011 revenues increased 24% year-over-year to $58.7 million Operating income was $13.1 million Net income increased to $7.9 million, or $0.43 per diluted share Strong Balance Sheet with No Debt $96.5 million in Cash & Cash Equivalents Limited Share Repurchase Program Authorized by Board of Directors
6
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. 1 On January 3, 2011, APUS combined one-credit lab courses with their related three-credit classes. As a result, the company now reports future net course registrations for the resulting four-credit courses as one registration. In the second quarter 2011 outlook, net course registration growth rates exclude other non-credit registrations and are presented as if labs and classes were combined in the prior year period. Below we show adjusted second quarter 2010 net course registrations as originally reported and adjusted to combine lab courses with their related class: Second Quarter 2010 As Reported Adjusted Net Course Registrations Net Course Registrations from New Students 64,100 13,900 61,000 13,600 Other Placeholder: Second Quarter 2011 Outlook Second Quarter 2011 (Y/Y) Net course registration growth from new students1 approximately 27% Net course registration growth1 approximately 25% Revenue growth approximately 28% Earnings per diluted share $0.43 to $0.44
7
Unique Approach and Civilian Students Key to Long-Term Success A Mission-Driven Organization Executing Existing Strategic Plan Focus on Academic Quality Addressing Need for Affordability Relationship Oriented Building Infrastructure for Growing Civilian Student Population Preparing for New Regulations and Compliance Addressing new and existing opportunities by building relationships Other Placeholder:
8
First Quarter 2011 Conference Call May 10, 2011
9


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20110714160137.txt.gz
TIME:20110714160137
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
July 14, 2011
(Date of earliest event reported)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item 7.01  Regulation FD Disclosure.
American Public University System (APUS), a wholly-owned subsidiary of American Public Education, Inc. (APEI) operating through American Military University and American Public University, today announced that the Higher Learning Commission (HLC) has reaffirmed its accreditation without any stipulations on its affiliation status.  APUS has been accreditedby HLC since 2006 and is a member of the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools (www.ncahlc.org).
APUS was recently assessed under HLCs Program to Evaluate and Advance Quality (PEAQ), a comprehensive evaluation process that includes an institutional self-study, an on-site evaluation by trained peer reviewers from other HLC-accredited institutions, and final decision-making by HLC bodies. APUSs next comprehensive evaluation is scheduled for the 2020-21 academic year, and it has an interim progress report regarding development of University-wide coordination and improvement of graduate studies due in July 2015.
HLC is one of six regional agencies in the U.S. that evaluate and accredit institutions as a whole. Other agencies provide voluntary accreditation for specific programs. HLC accredits approximately 1,100 institutions of higher education in a 19-state region and is recognized by the U.S. Department of Education and the Council for Higher Education Accreditation (www.chea.org).
In addition to regional HLC accreditation, APUS is nationally accredited by the Distance Education and Training Council (DETC).  APUS has also obtained programmatic accreditation for specific academic programs through applicable accrediting organizations. These specialized accreditations also require a significant amount of self-study and presentation of evidence to satisfy the requirements of each accrediting organization.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20110802160212.txt.gz
TIME:20110802160212
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
August 2, 2011
(Date of earliest event reported)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On August 2, 2011, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2011.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 5:00 p.m. EST on August 2, 2011 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports Second Quarter 2011 Results
CHARLES TOWN, W.V.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--August 2, 2011--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System (APUS), which operates through American Military University (AMU) and American Public University (APU)  announced financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2011.
Recent Highlights:
Net course registrations from new students in the second quarter of 2011 increased to approximately 18,900, an increase of approximately 39% over the same period of 2010.
1
Net course registrationsincreased to approximately 77,900 in the second quarter of 2011, a year-over-year increase of 28%.
1
As of June 30, 2011, there were a total of 96,800 active students at American Public University System, a year-over-year increase of 34%.
Second quarter 2011 revenues increased 31% to $60.8 million, compared to $46.3 million in the second quarter of 2010.
Net income for the second quarter of 2011 increased 29% to $9.0 million, or $0.49 per diluted share, compared to $7.0 million, or $0.37 per diluted share, in the same period of 2010.
American Public Education anticipates third quarter 2011 net course registrations from new students to increase approximately 35% year over year; net course registrations to increase approximately 28% year over year; revenues to increase approximately 29% year over year; and net income to be between $0.41 and $0.43 per diluted share.
1
1
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the second quarter of 2011 increased 31% to $60.8 million, compared to total revenues of $46.3 million in the second quarter of 2010. Income from operations before interest income and income taxes in the second quarter of 2011 increased 27% to $14.9 million, compared to $11.7 million in the same period of 2010. Stock-based compensation expense reduced operating income by $746,000 in the second quarter of 2011 and $722,000 in the second quarter of 2010.
Net income for the second quarter of 2011 increased 29% to $9.0 million, or $0.49 per diluted share, which includes $452,000, or $0.03 per diluted share, in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. This compares to net income of $7.0 million, or $0.37 per diluted share for the second quarter of 2010, including $447,000, or $0.02 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the second quarter of 2011 and 2010 were approximately 18.3 million and 19.0 million, respectively.
For the six months ended June 30, 2011, total revenues were $119.5 million, an increase of 28% compared to total revenues of $93.6 million in the same period of 2010. Income from operations before interest income and income tax for the six months ended June 30, 2011 increased to $28.0 million, compared to $24.9 million in the same period of 2010. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each period's operating income by $1.6 million and $1.5 million, respectively.
Net income for the six months ended June 30, 2011 to $16.8 million, or $0.92 per diluted share, which includes $980,000, or $0.05 per diluted share, in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. This compares to net income of $14.7 million, or $0.77 per diluted share, in the same period of 2010, including $923,000, or $0.05 per diluted share, in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the six months ended June 30, 2011 and 2010 were approximately 18.4 million and 19.0 million, respectively.
Total cash and cash equivalents as of June 30, 2011 were approximately $94.5 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the six months ended June 30, 2011 was approximately $25.7 million, compared to $18.2 million in the same period of 2010. Capital expenditures were approximately $6.8 million for the six months ended June 30, 2011, compared to $8.5 million in the prior year period. Depreciation and amortization was $4.3 million for the six months ended June 30, 2011 and $3.0 million for the same period of 2010.
Note: Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty.
On January 3, 2011, APUS combined each one-credit lab course with its related three-credit class resulting in one four-credit course. Net course registrations and net course registration growth rates exclude other non-credit registrations and are presented throughout this press release as if labs and classes were combined in the prior year period.
1
Third Quarter 2011 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason.
American Public Education anticipates third quarter 2011 net course registrations from new students to increase approximately 35%year-over-year; net course registrations to increase approximately 28% year-over-year; revenues to increase approximately 29% over the prior year period; and net income to be between $0.41 and $0.43 per diluted share.
1
1
As noted under Net Course Registrations above, net course registration growth rates exclude other non-credit registrations and are presented as if labs and classes were combined in the prior year period.
1
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys second quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast at 5:00 p.m. EDT today. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, operates through (AMU) and (APU). APUS serves more than 96,800 adult learners worldwide and offers 87 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts. Nationally recognized for its best practices in online higher education, APUS provides an affordable education through classes taught by experienced faculty who are leaders in their fields and committed to the academic achievement of their students.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
American Public University System is accredited by The Higher Learning Commission and is a member of the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools (). For more information about APUS graduation rates, median debt of students who completed programs, and other important information, visit .
www.ncahlc.org
www.apus.edu/disclosure
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, Inc., or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education, Inc. and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements regarding expected growth, expected revenues and expected earnings. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2011 and other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: American Public Education, Inc. Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304-724-3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Associate Vice President, Corporate Communications 703-334-3880

Exhibit 99.2
Second Quarter 2011 Conference Call August 2, 2011 Leading the Way
Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, Inc. or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements are some times identified by words such as anticipate, believe, could", estimate, expect, intend, may, should, will and would. These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on slide Third Quarter 2011 Outlook, as well as statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the Risk Factors section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010 and the Companys Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter March 31, 2011 as filed with the SEC, and in the Companys other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future. Safe Harbor Statement 2
For three months ending June 30, 2011 Net Course Registrations by Pay Type  Cash & Other 14% TA 44% Title IV 34% VA 8% Second Quarter 2011 Results:Affordability and quality appear to be key drivers of the AMU/APU value proposition.  Relationship building, referral programs, and interactive media remain highly successful elements of an integrated approach to advertising.  New programs, partnerships, civilian student outreach, and new markets are primary components of the long-term strategy. Pay Type 2Q2011 Growth (Y/Y) Title IV 96% TA 9% VA 21% Cash & Other -1% 3
Civilian Community Growth is key to long-term success New television and radio brand building campaign for APU yielding positive results.AMUs Military CommunityAMU signs a new Department of Defense (DOD) Memorandum of Understanding (MOU).Military Tuition Assistance (TA) program may be adversely impacted by Department of Defense budget cuts. Collaboration with Learning Community The Higher Learning Commission (HLC) reaffirmed APUS accreditation without any stipulations on its affiliation status.Dr. Phil Ice was recognized with the Innovation in Distance Learning Administration Wagner Award at the 2011 Distance Learning Administration Conference. Focus on Quality & Affordability drives continued success in civilian and military communities, strengthens academic reputation, and improves faculty satisfaction. 4
Appropriate Investments in Quality & Long-Term Success Building Relationships to develop referrals and meaningful, long-term partnerships with organizations, groups and industries.National Association of Environmental Professionals  (NAEP) Investing in Student Services & Infrastructure to support a larger student population and address new compliance requirements.Sakai conversion proceeding as planned Expanding support for mobile devices and other productivity tools Improving FSA fraud prevention through enhanced identity verification programs/processesNew IT disaster recovery site in Texas to open in fourth quarter 2011Entering New Markets to further diversify and strengthen existing academic offerings, as well as to reach new and diverse audiences.   AA and BA in Retail ManagementBS and MS in AccountingAA in Criminal JusticeMS in Sports & Health Sciences BA and MA in Reverse Logistics  among the first of its kind 5
Conformance Creates Higher Standards Than Compliance For profit data sharing initiatives not required by Department of Education: Transparency by Design: 2008-current public companies participating - APEI, CPLA, BPI http://wcet.wiche.edu/advance/transparency-by-designWCET/Gates Predictive Analytics for Online Student Retention:Public companies participating - APOL, APEIhttp://wcet.wiche.edu/advance/par-framework The Accord:  20 regionally accredited for-profit institutions agreeing to transparency standards  Public companies participating - APEI, STRA 6
Second quarter 2011 revenues increased 31% year-over-year to $60.8 million Operating income increased 27% year-over-year to $14.9 million Net income increased 29% y/y to $9.0 million, or $0.49 per diluted share Strong Balance Sheet with No Debt $94.5 million in Cash & Cash Equivalents Second Quarter 2011 Financial Highlights 7
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. 1 On January 3, 2011, APUS combined one-credit lab courses with their related three-credit classes. As a result, the company now reports future net course registrations for the resulting four-credit courses as one registration. In the third quarter 2011 outlook, net course registration growth rates exclude other non-credit registrations and are presented as if labs and classes were combined in the prior year period. Below we show adjusted third quarter 2010 net course registrations as originally reported and adjusted to combine lab courses with their related class: Third Quarter 2010 As Reported Adjusted Net Course Registrations Net Course Registrations from New Students  69,200 16,000 66,000 15,600 Third Quarter 2011 (Y/Y) approximately 35% 28% 29% $0.41 to $0.43Earnings per diluted share Revenue growth Net course registration growth Net course registration growth from new students Third Quarter 2011 Outlook 8
Second Quarter 2011 Conference Call August 2, 2011 Leading the Way


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20110914101024.txt.gz
TIME:20110914101024
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
 
   Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
 
   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
 
   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Section 7   Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
Attached as Exhibit 99.1 are slides being presented by American Public Education, Inc. in investor and other meetings.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
 
 
 
 
1
September 2011, Russell 2000 Small Cap Strategies Conference
 
When is a Fad a Trend?  Growth Through Innovation
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
    
2
Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect, "intend", "may", "should, "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on the slides and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010 and Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 31, 2011 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
Safe Harbor Statement
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
3
Revenues
In millions 
Net Course Registrations
In thousands
 
CAGR: 42%
 
CAGR: 43%
 
CAGR: 51%
 
APUS is Leading the Way
 
Net IncomeIn millions
$198.0
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
4  AMU/APU Graduates  Source:  (1)National Survey of Student Engagement (NSSE), 2009.(2) American Public University System, 1-year Post-graduation Survey, July 2010.(3) American Public University System, 3-year Post-graduation Survey, March 2009-July 2010.(4) American Public University System, Alumni Employer Survey, March 2006-September 2010.Surveys Indicate A Positive Student Experience APUS Seniors: 98% evaluated their experience as positive.(1) 96% say they would choose APUS again.(1)APUS Alumni:93% agreed or strongly agreed that AMU/APU met their overall expectations(2)Over 90% would recommend AMU/APU to family, friends or co-workers(2) 91% report theyre currently employed full-time.(3)65% agree their degree helped them obtain a promotion/job.(3)Employers of APUS Alumni:99% surveyed would hire another graduate from APUS.(4) 84% would recommend the university to employees.(4) 98% agree APUS grads possess field-specific academic skills.(4)
 
 
CAGR 60%
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
5
Organic growth in students
Other Placeholder:
5
Active Student CountsIn thousands
Slide:
 
6
 
Student growth in old degrees vs. new degrees
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
6 Program Enrollments  Net Registered StudentsIn thousands*2011 net registered students as of 6/30/11Registration growth  old vs. new degrees
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
7  Program Enrollments  Net Course RegistrationsIn thousands*2011 net registrations as of 6/30/11  Registration growth -
old
 vs.
new
 degrees
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
8  Leading the Way - A Differentiated Value Proposition  Source: Stifel Nicolaus and APEI EstimatesPeer Group:APOL, BPI, CPLA, CECO, COCO, DV, EDMC, LOPE, ESI, LINC, NAUH, STRA and UTI   Most affordable tuition in peer group Unique brand with strong reputation  Growing recognition for academic quality  Transparent student outcomes  Expanding civilian market opportunities  Efficient online system (PAD) Unique, effective marketing model  High referral rates  Consultative approach to advising
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20111107160302.txt.gz
TIME:20111107160302
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
November 7, 2011
(Date of earliest event reported)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On November 7, 2011, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2011.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 5:30 p.m. Eastern time on November 7, 2011 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports Third Quarter 2011 Results
Third Quarter 2011 Net Course Registrations Increased 32% Year-Over-Year
CHARLES TOWN, W.Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--November 7, 2011--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System (APUS), which operates through American Military University (AMU) and American Public University (APU)  announced financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2011.
Recent Highlights:
Net course registrationsincreased to approximately 87,300 in the third quarter of 2011, a year-over-year increase of 32%.
1
Net course registrations from new students in the third quarter of 2011 increased to approximately 23,900, an increase of approximately 53% over the same period of 2010.
1
As of September 30, 2011, there were a total of 105,700 active students at American Public University System, a year-over-year increase of 36%.
Third quarter 2011 revenues increased 35% to $65.3 million, compared to $48.3 million in the third quarter of 2010.
Income from operations before interest income and income taxes in the third quarter of 2011 increased 61% to $15.0 million, compared to $9.3 million in the same period of 2010.
Net income for the third quarter of 2011 increased 95% to $10.9 million, or $0.60 per diluted share, compared to $5.6 million, or $0.30 per diluted share, in the same period of 2010.
American Public Education anticipates fourth quarter 2011 net course registrations from new students to increase approximately 29% year-over-year; net course registrations to increase approximately 28% year-over-year; revenues to increase approximately 29% over the prior year period; and net income to be between $0.58 and $0.60 per diluted share.
1
1
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the third quarter of 2011 increased 35% to $65.3 million, compared to total revenues of $48.3 million in the third quarter of 2010. Income from operations before interest income and income taxes in the third quarter of 2011 increased 61% to $15.0 million, compared to $9.3 million in the same period of 2010. Stock-based compensation expense reduced operating income by $812,000 in the third quarter of 2011 and $704,000 in the third quarter of 2010.
Income tax expense for the third quarter of 2011 was reduced by approximately $1.8 million, or $0.10 per diluted share, as a result of recording an income tax expense adjustment for the full-year 2010 and an adjustment to the projected effective tax rate for the nine months ended September 31, 2011. The reduction in the effective tax rate in 2011 is primarily due to the state tax, and research and development tax credit studies that were completed during the third quarter of 2011. The state tax study was undertaken to refine the allocation of income to various states. The research and development tax credit study was completed to claim the credit for increased software development activities qualifying under the tax law. The company anticipates an effective tax of 38% in the fourth quarter of 2011 and full-year 2012.
Net income for the third quarter of 2011 increased 95% to $10.9 million, or $0.60 per diluted share, which includes $491,000, or $0.03 per diluted share, in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. This compares to net income of $5.6 million, or $0.30 per diluted share for the third quarter of 2010, including $434,000, or $0.02 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the third quarter of 2011 and 2010 were approximately 18.3 million and 18.9 million, respectively.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2011, total revenues were $184.7 million, an increase of 30% compared to total revenues of $141.9 million in the same period of 2010. Income from operations before interest income and income tax for the nine months ended September 30, 2011 increased to $43.0 million, compared to $34.2 million in the same period of 2010. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each period's operating income by $2.4 million and $2.2 million, respectively.
Net income for the nine months ended September 30, 2011 increased to $27.8 million, or $1.52 per diluted share, which includes $1.5 million, or $0.08 per diluted share, in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. This compares to net income of $20.3 million, or $1.07 per diluted share, in the same period of 2010, including $1.4 million, or $0.07 per diluted share, in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the nine months ended September 30, 2011 and 2010 were approximately 18.3 million and 19.0 million, respectively.
Total cash and cash equivalents as of September 30, 2011 were approximately $107.3 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the nine months ended September 30, 2011 was approximately $47.5 million, compared to $32.8 million in the same period of 2010. Capital expenditures were approximately $13.8 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2011, compared to $14.0 million in the prior year period. Depreciation and amortization was $6.7 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2011 and $4.7 million for the same period of 2010.
Note: Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty.
On January 3, 2011, APUS combined each one-credit lab course with its related three-credit class resulting in one four-credit course. Net course registrations and net course registration growth rates exclude other non-credit registrations and are presented throughout this press release as if labs and classes were combined in the prior year period.
1
Fourth Quarter 2011 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason.
American Public Education anticipates fourth quarter 2011 net course registrations from new students to increase approximately 29%year-over-year; net course registrations to increase approximately 28% year-over-year; revenues to increase approximately 29% over the prior year period; and net income to be between $0.58 and $0.60 per diluted share.
1
1
As noted under Net Course Registrations above, net course registration growth rates exclude other non-credit registrations and are presented as if labs and classes were combined in the prior year period.
1
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys third quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast today at 5:30 p.m. Eastern time. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, operates through (AMU) and (APU). APUS serves more than 100,000 adult learners worldwide and offers 87 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts. Nationally recognized for its best practices in online higher education, APUS provides an affordable education through classes taught by experienced faculty who are leaders in their fields and committed to the academic achievement of their students.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
American Public University System is accredited by The Higher Learning Commission and is a member of the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools (). For more information about APUS graduation rates, median debt of students who completed programs, and other important information, visit .
www.ncahlc.org
www.apus.edu/disclosure
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, Inc., or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education, Inc. and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements regarding expected growth, expected revenues and expected earnings. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2011 and other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: American Public Education, Inc. Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304.724.3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Associate Vice President, Investor Relations 703.334.3880

Exhibit 99.2
Third Quarter 2011 Conference Call November 7, 2011 Leading the Way
Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, Inc. or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements are some times identified by words such as anticipate, believe, could", estimate, expect, intend, may, should, will and would. These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on slide Third Quarter 2011 Outlook, as well as statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the Risk Factors section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010 and the Companys Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter June 30, 2011 as filed with the SEC, and in the Companys other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
For three months ending September 30, 2011 Net Course Registrations by Primary Pay Type Cash & Other 13% TA 40% Title IV 39% VA 8% Third Quarter 2011 Results:Affordability and quality appear to be key drivers of the AMU/APU value proposition. Relationship building, referral programs, and interactive media remain highly successful elements of an integrated approach to advertising. New programs, partnerships, civilian student outreach, brand building/ awareness, and new markets are primary components of the long-term strategy.
Academic and Operational Highlights Academic Research  Dr. Phil Ice delivered keynote address on the Future of Learning Analytics at the National Association of Distance Education Organizations of South Africa (NADEOSA) annual conference.Notable New Hire  Dr. Ron Kovach, Vice President of Student Services at APUSFormerly the Assistant Vice Chancellor for Academic Affairs at Purdue University CalumetAll Courses Now Available in Sakai  New APU Branding Campaign - http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=h92_pzPibdQAPEI #2 on Forbes Best Small Public Companies in America
Third quarter 2011 revenues increased 35% year-over-year to $65.3 million Operating income increased 61% year-over-year to $15.0 million Effective tax rate was 27% in the third quarter of 2011Earnings per diluted share increased 100% y/y to $0.60 per diluted share Strong Balance Sheet with No Debt $107.3 million in Cash & Cash Equivalents Third Quarter 2011 Financial Highlights
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. 1 On January 3, 2011, APUS combined one-credit lab courses with their related three-credit classes. As a result, the company now reports future net course registrations for the resulting four-credit courses as one registration. In the third quarter 2011 outlook, net course registration growth rates exclude other non-credit registrations and are presented as if labs and classes were combined in the prior year period.Below we show adjusted third quarter 2010 net course registrations as originally reported and adjusted to combine lab courses with their related class: Fourth Quarter 2010 As Reported Adjusted Net Course Registrations Net Course Registrations from New Students 73,90016,500 70,40016,100 Fourth Quarter 2011 Outlook Fourth Quarter 2011 (Y/Y)Net course registration growth from new students 1 approximately 29% Net course registration growth 1 approximately 28% Revenue growth approximately 29% Earnings per diluted share $0.58 to $0.60
Third Quarter 2011 Conference Call November 7, 2011 Leading the Way


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20111109090050.txt.gz
TIME:20111109090050
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
November 9, 2011
(Date of earliest event reported)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Section 7   Regulation FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
 Attached as Exhibit 99.1 are slides being presented by American Public Education, Inc. in investor and other meetings.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 99.1
Leading the Way February 2011 November 2011 Investor Presentation apei American public education, INC.
Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect, "intend", "may", "should, "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on the slides and statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010 and Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 31, 2011 as filed with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future. Safe Harbor Statement  apei AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION, INC 2
2011 - Celebrating 20 Years of Service and Leadership Founded as American Military University (AMU) in 1991 by James P. Etter, a Marine Corps Officer In 2002, AMU expanded into the American Public University System (APUS), adding American Public University (APU) Nationally Accredited (DETC) in 1995 Regionally Accredited (NCA) in 2006 Serving over 100,000 students worldwide* To provide quality higher education with emphasis on educating the nations military and public service communities by offering respected, relevant, accessible and affordable, student-focused online programs, which prepare them for service and leadership in a diverse, global society. *As of September 30, 2011  3 apei American public education, INC.
For three months ending September 30, 2011 Net Course Registrations by Primary Pay Type Cash & Other 13% TA 40% Title IV 39% VA 8% Pay Type3Q2011 Growth (Y/Y) Title IV 105% VA 22% TA 6% Cash & Other-2% Third Quarter 2011 Results: Affordability and quality appear to be key drivers of the AMU/APU value proposition. Relationship building, referral programs, and interactive media remain highly successful elements of an integrated approach to advertising. New programs, partnerships, civilian student outreach, brand building/ awareness, and new markets are primary components of the long-term strategy. 4
A Unique Mission to be Affordable Undergraduate Cost Excludes military scholarship supplements that cover certain tuition costs of military students. Source: The College Board, 2011 Trends in College Pricing and Company Estimates Graduate Cost Average Public Four-Year In-State Published Tuition Increased 8.3% Between 2010-11 and 2011-12(1) 5 $10,000 $20,000 $30,000 $40,000 $50,000 $60,000 $70,000 AMU/APU UMUC In-State Public Four-Year In-State Ashford University Online U. of Phoenix Online Strayer University Cost estimates are based on the lowest published tuition rate; other programs and average tuition may be higher. Tuition, Books & Fees Tuition, Books & Fees $5,000 $10,000 $15,000 $20,000 $25,000 $30,000 AMU/APU UMUC In-State Public Master's In-State Ashford University Online U. of Phoenix Online Strayer University
Broad Array of Degree Programs, 100% Online Students by Level: Students by School: Unique Programs Unique Faculty Unique Experience Classes: Middle East Culture, Explosive Ordinance Disposal, Asymmetric Warfare Experts in their field: Dr. Alan Hale (U.S. Astronomer); Dr. James Reilly (U.S. Astronaut); Dr. Gwen Hall (recognized national security expert) 87 Degree Programs: Homeland Security, Space Studies, Emergency & Disaster Management, Liberal Arts 320 full-time and 1,400 part-time faculty Small class sizes: average class 14 students; limit class sizes to 25 students Flexible: 8 and 16 week courses with monthly starts Public Safety & Health 25% Arts & Humanities 24% Education 1% Science & Technology 10% Business 10% Management 14% Security & Global Studies 17% Bachelors 61% Associates 17% Masters 22% As of December 31, 2010 6 apei AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION, INC
Rigorous Processes Create Academic Excellence Specialized tools measure learning  PAD System; Data Warehouse, Dashboards  Semantic Analysis and Predictive Modeling  Nationally benchmarked surveys/exams Engage various audiences  CURCOM (Curriculum Committee)  Industry Advisory Councils  Expert Faculty  Sloan-C and other organizations  Accrediting bodies/regulators Analyze and share outcomes  Transparency by Design  Sakai open source community apei AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION, INC
Higher Standards Achieved by Exceptional Faculty & Support Scholarly Research  Write peer reviewed articles and white papers  400+ books/articles presented or published in 2010  Present at conferences and workshops  Support academic and professional communities Faculty Development  Faculty hired through rigorous selection criteria  Training and development; mentor/coach programs  Faculty evaluation through surveys, audits and data World Leading eLibrary System  Over 100,000 books/ebooks  More than 30,000 scholarly journals  Innovative search and tutorial services for students  24/7 support by 15 librarians apei AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION, INC 8
Strong Student Outcomes & Growing Recognition Specialty accreditations, for example: National Council on Family Relations (NCFR) Foundation For Higher Education Accreditation (FFHEA) Accreditation Council for Business Schools and Programs American Sport Education Program (ASEP) Society of Human Resource Management (SHRM) Council of Education for Public Health (CEPH) Numerous awards and recognition, for example:  2009 Sloan Consortium Ralph E. Gomory Award for Quality Online Education  2009 Sloan Consortium Effective Practice Award  2010 Sloan Consortium Effective Practice Award Critical Thinking Humanities Math Natural Science Reading Social Sciences Writing 2010 ETS Proficiency Profile: National APUS 9 apei AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION, INC
Going Above and Beyond Basic Regulatory Compliance 10 APUSs next comprehensive HLC evaluation is scheduled for the 2020-21 academic year - interim progress report regarding development of University-wide coordination and improvement of graduate studies due in July 2015 A liberal arts degree granting institution liberal arts degrees are Title IV eligible Volunteered to be first online participant in MIVER (Military Accreditation) GE & Other Benchmarks: APEI Requires repayment rate of at least 35% 47%+ Loan repayment rate less than 30% of discretionary income by program No programs currently at risk Average student loan balance $4,436+ Incentive Compensation Compliant 90/10 Rule Compliant Final FY 09 2-yr Cohort Default Rate 4.0% +Source: Department of Education and APEI Estimates Partnering with Non-Profits and For-Profits: Transparency by Design  APEI, AIU, BPI, CPLA, Kaplan WCET/Gates Predictive Analytics for Online Student Retention  APOL, APEI The Accord  20 regionally accredited for-profit institutions agreeing to transparency standards  APEI, STRA Sakai  active participant in open source LMS community AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION, INC 10
Greater awareness is created primarily through relationships, referral programs and interactive media - driving long-term customer satisfaction; supporting affordable tuition. Applications by source: Referrals Targeted Approach  Precise advertisement placement  Use of social media, viral marketing  Limited use of lead gen A Distinctive Approach to Creating Greater Awareness Relationship Focus  Focus on key influencers  Field representatives develop relationships  Consultative approach to student enrollment Sustainable Advantages  Low relative marketing costs and high referrals  Relationships/credibility with key influencers  Over 40% of alumni re-enroll for a second degree Other Print Internet/ Interactive As of December 31, 2010 AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION, INC 11
Military Position and Opportunity Market Opportunity with 2.1 Million Active Duty Military  Nearly 400,000 utilizing tuition assistance to pursue higher education*  Approximately 71% of military students are online*  Education is primary recruitment tool; 21st century soldier requires advanced education Solid Leadership Position within Military Higher Education  #1 in total DoD enrollment*  #1 in Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, and #2 in Army*  Well regarded by key influencers/military leadership  Top 20 Military-Friendly College as ranked by Military Advanced Education Continued Strong Military Leadership on Board  Lieutenant General Julius Becton, Jr.  Lieutenant General Richard G. Trefry  General Alfred M. Gray  Major General Barbara G. Fast * Source: 2011 CCME 12 AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION, INC
Strong Value Proposition in Civilian Markets APU's combined undergraduate tuition and course materials are nearly 20% less than the average 4-year public university's in-state rates. (1) OnlineLearning Market According to Eduventures  Nearly 4 Million online learners expected in 2015  Market-funded opportunity enhanced by constrained nonprofit supply  Very few (<15%) prospective learners refuse to consider wholly online study  79% of HR professionals say they have hired an online graduate in 2010(2) Target Niches in Civilian Market  Law Enforcement (0.75M); Fire and Emergency (1.3M); and Teachers (3.5M)  Corporate & Other Relationships Affordability & Quality Increasingly Important to Civilians  Tuition below Title IV loan limits  Lower debt burden upon graduation (1)The College Board, Trends in College Pricing 2011, October 2011 (2)Society of Human Resource Management (SHRM) survey of HR professionals, September 2010. 13 AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION, INC
106 283 582 829 1,099 1,595 2,018 3,334 4,607 0 500 1000 1500 2000 2500 3000 3500 4000 4500 5000 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 AMU/APU Graduates Source: (1)National Survey of Student Engagement (NSSE), 2009. (2) American Public University System, 1-year Post-graduation Survey, July 2010. (3) American Public University System, 3-year Post-graduation Survey, March 2009-July 2010. (4) American Public University System, Alumni Employer Survey, March 2006-September 2010. Surveys Indicate A Positive Student Experience APUS Seniors:  98% evaluated their experience as positive.(1)  96% say they would choose APUS again.(1) APUS Alumni: 93% agreed or strongly agreed that AMU/APU met their overall expectations(2) Over 90% would recommend AMU/APU to family, friends or co-workers(2)  91% report theyre currently employed full-time.(3) 65% agree their degree helped them obtain a promotion/job.(3) Employers of APUS Alumni: 99% surveyed would hire another graduate from APUS.(4)  84% would recommend the university to employees.(4)  98% agree APUS grads possess field-specific academic skills.(4) 1 4 AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION, INC
94.8 147.1 207.8 272.2 0 50 100 150 200 250 300 $69.1 $107.1 $149.0 $0 $50 $100 $150 $200 8.8 $16.2 $23.9 $29.9 $0 $10 $20 $30 Revenues In millions Net Course Registrations In thousands A PUS is Leading the Way Net Income In millions $198.0 15 AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION, INC
Leading the Way - A Differentiated Value Proposition 16 Source: Stifel Nicolaus Estimates and Reports Peer Group: APOL, BPI, CPLA, CECO, COCO, DV, EDMC, LOPE, ESI, LINC, NAUH, STRA and UTI  Most affordable tuition in peer group  Unique brand with strong reputation  Growing recognition for academic quality  Transparent student outcomes  Expanding civilian market opportunities  Efficient online system (PAD)  Unique, relationship marketing model  High referral rates  Consultative approach to advising -10% 0% 10% 20% 30% 40% 50% 60% 3Q09 4Q09 1Q10 2Q10 3Q10 4Q10 1Q11 2Q11 3Q11 American Public Education, Inc. Peer Group APEI Registration Growth Rate vs. Enrollment Growth of Peers AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION, INC 16
Leading the Way February 2011 November 2011 Investor Presentation AMERICAN PUBLIC EDUCATION, INC


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20111209110019.txt.gz
TIME:20111209110019
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
December 9, 2011
(Date of earliest event reported)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
In an opinion dated December 8, 2011 in the matter Gaer v. American Public Education, Inc. et al., (civil action no. 3:10-CV-81), the United States District Court for the Northern District of West Virginia granted the motion to dismiss filed on behalf of American Public Education, Inc., Dr. Boston and Mr. Wilkins and dismissed the case in its entirety with prejudice.  No appeal of that ruling has been filed by the plaintiff, although the time period within which to do so has not yet expired.  
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
2


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20120228160553.txt.gz
TIME:20120228160553
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
February 28, 2012
(Date of earliest event reported)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 28, 2012, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2011.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 5:00 p.m. Eastern time on February 28, 2012 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.  In addition, American Public Education provides an investor fact sheet on its investor relations website, .  A copy of the investor fact sheet is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.3 and is incorporated in this report by reference.
www.americanpubliceducation.com
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports Fourth Quarter and Full-Year 2011 Results
CHARLES TOWN, W. Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--February 28, 2012--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System (APUS), which operates through American Military University (AMU) and American Public University (APU)  announced financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2011.
Recent Highlights:
Net course registrationsincreased to approximately 95,400 in the fourth quarter of 2011, a year-over-year increase of 36%.
1
Net course registrations by new students in the fourth quarter of 2011 increased to approximately 24,600, an increase of approximately 53% over the same period of 2010.
1
As of December 31, 2011, there were a total of approximately 110,000 active students at American Public University System, a year-over-year increase of 31%.
Fourth quarter 2011 revenues increased 34% to $75.7 million, compared to $56.3 million in the fourth quarter of 2010.
Income from operations before interest income and income taxes in the fourth quarter of 2011 increased 25% to $19.8 million, compared to $15.8 million in the same period of 2010.
Net income for the fourth quarter of 2011 increased 35% to $13.0 million, or $0.71 per diluted share, compared to $9.6 million, or $0.52 per diluted share, in the same period of 2010.
Walmart is proud to add a family benefit to its Lifelong Learning Program in partnership with APU whereby spouses and dependents of eligible Walmart and Sams Club associates in the United States can access the programs Lifelong Learning Grant.
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the fourth quarter of 2011 increased 34% to $75.7 million, compared to total revenues of $56.3 million in the fourth quarter of 2010. Income from operations before interest income and income taxes in the fourth quarter of 2011 increased 25% to $19.8 million, compared to $15.8 million in the same period of 2010. Stock-based compensation expense reduced operating income by $769,000 in the fourth quarter of 2011 and $624,000 in the fourth quarter of 2010.
Net income for the fourth quarter of 2011 increased 35% to $13.0 million, or $0.71 per diluted share, which includes $464,000, or $0.03 per diluted share, in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. This compares to net income of $9.6 million, or $0.52 per diluted share for the fourth quarter of 2010, including $368,000, or $0.02 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the fourth quarter of 2011 and 2010 were approximately 18.2 million and 18.4 million, respectively.
For the twelve months ended December 31, 2011, total revenues were $260.4 million, an increase of 31% compared to total revenues of $198.2 million in the same period of 2010. Income from operations before interest income and income tax for the twelve months ended December 31, 2011 increased 26% to $62.9 million, compared to $50.0 million in the same period of 2010. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each period's operating income by $3.2 million and $2.8 million, respectively.
Net income for the twelve months ended December 31, 2011 increased to $40.8 million, or $2.23 per diluted share, which includes $1.9 million, or $0.10 per diluted share, in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. This compares to net income of $29.9 million, or $1.59 per diluted share, in the same period of 2010, including $1.7 million, or $0.09 per diluted share, in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the twelve months ended December 31, 2011 and 2010 were approximately 18.3 million and 18.8 million, respectively.
Total cash and cash equivalents as of December 31, 2011 were approximately $119.0 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the twelve months ended December 31, 2011 was approximately $70.4 million, compared to $47.1 million in the same period of 2010. Capital expenditures were approximately $24.9 million for the twelve months ended December 31, 2011, compared to $22.5 million in the prior year period. Depreciation and amortization was $9.2 million for the twelve months ended December 31, 2011 and $6.5 million for the same period of 2010.
Walmart is proud to add a family benefit to its Lifelong Learning Program in partnership with APU whereby spouses and dependents of eligible Walmart and Sams Club U.S. associates access the programs Lifelong Learning Grant. The grant, provided by APUS, is equivalent to 15% of tuition costs. Spouses and dependents of eligible associates may begin enrolling under the program for classes starting on April 2. The addition of the family benefit increases access to affordable higher education and advances the programs goal to increase the number of persons with a college degree.
nd
Net Course Registrations:
For the three months ended December 31,
For the twelve months ended December 31,
Note: Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty.
On January 3, 2011, APUS combined each one-credit lab course with its related three-credit class resulting in one four-credit course. Net course registrations and net course registration growth rates exclude other non-credit registrations and are presented throughout this press release as if labs and classes were combined in both periods.
1
First Quarter 2012 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason.
American Public Education anticipates first quarter 2012 net course registrations by new students to increase approximately 14% year-over-year; net course registrations to increase between approximately 20% and 22% year-over-year; revenues to increase approximately 27% over the prior year period; and net income to be between $0.45 and $0.49 per diluted share.
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys fourth quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast today at 5:00 p.m. Eastern time. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, operates through (AMU) and (APU). APUS serves more than 100,000 adult learners worldwide and offers 87 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts. Nationally recognized for its best practices in online higher education, APUS provides an affordable education through classes taught by experienced faculty who are leaders in their fields and committed to the academic achievement of their students.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
American Public University System is accredited by The Higher Learning Commission and is a member of the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools (). For more information about APUS graduation rates, median debt of students who completed programs, and other important information, visit .
www.ncahlc.org
www.apus.edu/disclosure
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, Inc., or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education, Inc. and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements regarding expected growth, expected revenues and expected earnings. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011 and other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: American Public Education, Inc. Harry T. Wilkins, CPA, 304-724-3722 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer or Christopher L. Symanoskie, 703-334-3880 Associate Vice President, Investor Relations

Exhibit 99.2
Fourth Quarter and Full Year 2011 Conference Call Leading the Way February 2011 February 28, 2012
Safe Harbor Statement Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, Inc. or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements are some times identified by words such as anticipate, believe, could", estimate, expect, intend, may, should, will and would. These forward looking statements include without limitation statements on slide First Quarter 2012 Outlook forward-include, limitation, Outlook, as well as statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the Risk Factors section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011 as filed with the SEC, and in the Companys other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future. 2
Net Course Registrations by Primary Pay Type Full Year 2011 Results: Cash & Other 13% FSA/Title IV 37% VA 9% Civilian students serve as primary growth driver, while the diversification of AMU/APUs student population Military/TA 41% continues as planned  The focus on quality and customer satisfaction appears to have positively For twelve months ending December 31, 2011 Pay FY2011 (Y/Y) influenced the percentage of AMU/APU alumni who return for a second degree. An integrated, relationship-oriented Type Growth FSA/Title IV 100% VA 44% Military/TA 9% approach to marketing, combined with targeted investments in branding, extend APUs reach nationwide. Cash & Other -2% 3
Growing Recognition for Academic Quality and Learning Outcomes Walmart is proud to add a family benefit to its Lifelong Learning Program in partnership with APU whereby spouses and dependents of eligible Walmart and Sams Club associates in the United States can access the programs Lifelong Learning Grant. APUS launches ePress  an electronic publishing project to create affordable, open access course materials. In 2011, APUS faculty members delivered more than 800 presentations; earned over 100 awards; and authored over 300 submitted or published articles, papers and books. Focused on strengthening several core competencies, such as measuring student learning, assessing student preparedness, and strengthening teaching presence: Using Lumina Foundations Degree Qualifications Profile Building a graduate culture for future doctoral programs Seeking program-level accreditation for Nursing, Public Health, and Fire Science Continued process improvements aimed at improving retention and outcomes 114 Full-time faculty recently hired The Accrediting Commission of the Distance Education and Training Council (DETC) recently re-accredit APUS. 4
Driven to Create a Positive Student Experience AMU & APU Graduates 21,300+ Alumni APUS Graduating Seniors Surveyed: 98% evaluated their experience as positive.(1) 96% say they would choose APUS again.(1) APUS Alumni Surveyed: 95% agreed or strongly agreed that AMU/APU met their expectations(2) 91% would recommend AMU/APU to family, friends or co-workers(2) 91% report theyre currently employed full-time.(3) 65% agree their degree helped them obtain a promotion/job.(3) Employers of APUS Alumni Surveyed: 99% would hire another graduate from APUS.(4) 98% would recommend the university to employees (4) employees.( ) 98% agree APUS grads possess field-specific academic skills.(4) 5 Source: (1) National Survey of Student Engagement (NSSE), 2009. (2) American Public University System, 1-year Post-graduation Survey, January  December 2011. (3) American Public University System, 3-year Post-graduation Survey, March 2009-July 2010. (4) American Public University System, Alumni Employer Survey, January  December 2011.
Factors Possibly Impacting Military Communities Total DoD course enrollments using TA remained roughly flat year-over-year 75% of all TA courses through distance learning Possible Tuition Assistance cuts Potential for deployments and drawdowns (Afghanistan) Probable reductions to troop end strength AMU Registration of Estimated (% Total) FY2010 FY2011 AMU Rank Marines 19.7% 21.3% #1 Navy 8.8% 9.6% #1 Ai F 18 5% 20 5% #1 Air Force 18.5% 20.5% Army 12.9% 14.1% #2+ Total 14.6% 15.9% #1 6 + Estimated ranking based on 2010 data (most recent available). Source for DoD Enrollments: DANTES Voluntary Education Fact Sheets, FY 09-FY11 Source for APUS Enrollments: Vol Ed Service Chiefs briefings, CCME 2012 and APUS Estimates
Differentiated Value Proposition = Larger Market Distribution of (Fees: 0.0% $42,000 and over Public and Nonprofit 0.0% Private Sector Adult Undergraduates age 25+) by Tuition and APEIs low tuition provides opportunities to both expand 0.1% 0.3% 0.2% 0.4% 1.0% $39,000 to $41,999 $36,000 to $38,999 $33,000 to $35,999 $30,000 to $32,999 $27,000 to $29,999 0.0% 0.1% 0.1% 12.5% 10.9% the addressable market and capture private market share. 1.2% 1.5% 1.6% 3.5% 6.2% $24,000 to $26,999 $21,000 to $23,999 $18,000 to $20,999 $15,000 to $17,999 $12,000 to $14,999 2.2% 1.5% 2.1% 15.6% 28.2% Private Sector Audience: 0.5 MM Annual Tu 9.8% 12.0% 27.7% 34.4% 0% 10% 20% 30% 40% $9,000 to $11,999 $6,000 to $8,999 $3,000 to $5,999 $3,000 3.8% 0.0% 0.0% 0% 10% 20% 30% 40% APEIs Target Audience: 3.2 MM 45.8% 7 % % % % % Total: 5.6 Million Total 0.8 Million Source: IPEDS, Eduventures, and American Public Education Estimates. Degree-granting schools only.
The APUS Strategic Vision - A Quality Leader During the next phase in APUSs development, in alignment with our mission, we seek to broaden student diversity (at home and abroad) and leverage technology to support the nations educational goals while being acknowledged as: One of the best values in online higher education.  A thought leader contributing to positive changes in higher education, and Recognized for: Rich, engaging, quality learning experience; Affordability relative to public institutions; and Committed partnerships with our key stakeholders. Moreover, APUS intends to be a key influencer in how higher education rises to meet ongoing challenges and opportunities, acting with integrity and in collaboration with key constituencies. 8
Fourth quarter 2011 revenues increased 34% year-over-year to $75.7 million Fourth Quarter Financial Highlights: Operating income increased 25% year-over-year to $19.8 million Effective tax rate was 35% in the fourth quarter of 2011 EPS diluted increased approximately 37% y/y to $0.71 per diluted share  Strong Balance Sheet with No Debt $119.0 million in Cash & Cash Equivalents $29 9 $40.8 $40 $50 Revenues In millions Net Course Registrations In thousands Net Income In millions 1 1 $8.8 $16.2 $23.9 29.9 $10 $20 $30 9 $0 1 On January 3, 2011, APUS combined each one-credit lab course with its related three-credit class resulting in one four-credit course. Net course registrations exclude other non-credit registrations and are presented as if labs and classes were combined during the year 2010 and 2011.
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and First Quarter 2012 Outlook actual results may differ materially. First Quarter 2012 (Y/Y) Net course registration growth by new students approximately 14% Net approximately 20 22% course registration growth 20-Revenue growth approximately 27% Earnings per diluted share $0.45 to $0.49 Effective tax rate approximately 39% Additional Highlights and Considerations: Changing 10 student mix primarily driven by growth in civilian student enrollment Additional FSA fraud/abuse prevention measures implemented in 1Q2012 Investments in FSA automation and other improvements may drive future efficiencies ePress initiative may help lower cost of course materials in the future 10
Fourth Quarter and Full Year 2011 Conference Call Leading the Way February 2011 February 28, 2012

Exhibit 99.3


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20120326160218.txt.gz
TIME:20120326160218
EVENTS:	Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(Date of earliest event reported)
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
 Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
 
 
Section 3  Securities and Trading Markets
Item 3.03  Material Modification to Rights of Security Holders.
As described in Item 5.03 below, the contents of which are incorporated herein by reference, effective March 23, 2012 the Board of Directors (the Board) of American Public Education, Inc. (the Company) approved amendments to the bylaws of the Company providing for a majority vote standard for director elections and adopted the Third Amended and Restated Bylaws of the Company to effect these amendments.  These amendments modify the rights of the holders of the Companys Common Stock in the election of directors by establishing a majority voting standard for uncontested elections.
A copy of the Third Amended and Restated Bylaws of the Company is filed as Exhibit 3.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference.
Item 5  Corporate Governance and Management
Item 5.03 
Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
.  Effective March 23, 2012, the Board, upon the recommendation of the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee of the Board (the Committee), approved amendments to the Companys bylaws that provide for a majority voting standard for uncontested director elections and a mechanism for the consideration of the resignation of an incumbent director who does not receive a majority of the votes cast in an uncontested election.  These amendments were effected by the Boards adoption of the Third Amended and Restated Bylaws of the Company.  These amendments were approved and the Third Amended and Restated Bylaws were adopted by the Board as part of the Companys continuing efforts to enhance corporate governance.
Majority Voting for Election of Directors
The amendments to the Companys bylaws affected Section 2.10 and changed the vote standard for the election of directors in an uncontested election from a plurality to a majority of the votes cast.  Under the adopted majority voting standard, a majority of the votes cast means that the number of shares voted for a director nominee must exceed 50% of the votes cast with respect to that director nominee.  In contested elections where the number of nominees exceeds the number of directors to be elected, the vote standard will continue to be a plurality of votes cast.
In addition, the amendments to the Companys bylaws affected Section 3.3 and provided that if an incumbent director is nominated in an uncontested election, the director nominee is required, as a condition of the directors nomination, to submit an irrevocable letter of resignation to the Board.  If an incumbent director nominee does not receive a majority of the votes cast, the Committee, or another committee designated by the Board, will make a recommendation to the Board on whether to accept or reject the resignation, or whether other action should be taken. The Board will act on the Committees recommendation and publicly disclose its decision within 90 days from the date of certification of the election results.  If the resignation is accepted, the resulting vacancy on the Board can be filled by action of the remaining members of the Board.
The foregoing description of the amendments to the Companys bylaws and the Third Amended and Restated Bylaws of the Company does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Third Amended and Restated Bylaws of the Company, a copy of which is filed as Exhibit 3.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9
 Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01 
Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits
 
 
2
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
3
 
 
EXHIBIT INDEX
 
 
3.1           Third Amended and Restated Bylaws of American Public Education, Inc.
 
 
4

Exhibit 3.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
-i-
 
 
 
 
-ii-
 
 
 
 
 
 
The name and address of the current registered agent in the State of Delaware are: Corporation Service Company, 2711 Centerville Road, Wilmington, Delaware 19808.
 
 
The Corporation may also have offices at such other places, both within and without the State of Delaware, as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine or as may be necessary or useful in connection with the business of the Corporation.
 
 
 
All meetings of the stockholders shall be held at such place as may be fixed from time to time by the Board of Directors, the Chairperson, the Chief Executive Officer or the President. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Board of Directors may determine that the meeting shall not be held at any place, but may instead be held by means of remote communication.
 
 
The Corporation shall hold annual meetings of stockholders on such date and at such time as shall be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors, the Chairperson, the Chief Executive Officer or the President, at which stockholders shall elect a Board of Directors and transact such other business as may properly be brought before the meeting.
 
Any stockholder wishing to bring business before an annual meeting of stockholders must deliver to the Secretary a written notice of the stockholders intention to do so.  To be timely, the stockholders notice must be delivered to or mailed and received by the Corporation not more than 120 days, and not less than 90 days, before the anniversary date of the preceding annual meeting, except that if the annual meeting is set for a date that is not within 30 days before or 60 days after such anniversary date, the Corporation must receive the notice not later than the close of business on the tenth day following the day on which the Corporation provides notice or public disclosure of the date of the meeting.  The notice must include the following information: (i) the name and address of the stockholder who is making a proposal and the nature of the business being proposed; (ii) a representation that the stockholder is a holder of record of Corporation capital stock entitled to vote at such meeting and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the meeting to introduce the business specified in the notice; (iii) such other information regarding each matter of business to be proposed by such stockholder as would be required to be included in a proxy statement filed under the Securities and Exchange Commissions (the ) proxy rules if the matter had been proposed, or intended to be proposed, by the Board of Directors; and (vi) such other information that the Board of Directors may request in its discretion.
SEC
 
 
1
 
 
 
 
A special meeting of the stockholders of the Corporation may be called at any time by the Board of Directors pursuant to a resolution adopted by the Board of Directors, but such special meeting may not be called by any other person or persons.
 
 
Notice of any meeting of stockholders, stating the place, if any, date and hour of the meeting, the means of remote communication, if any, by which stockholders and proxyholders may be deemed to be present in person and vote at such meeting, and (if it is a special meeting) the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given to each stockholder entitled to vote at such meeting not less than ten nor more than sixty days before the date of the meeting (except to the extent that such notice is waived or is not required as provided in the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (the ) or these Bylaws).  Such notice shall be given in accordance with, and shall be deemed effective as set forth in, Sections 222 and 232 (or any successor section or sections) of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
Delaware General Corporation Law
 
 
Whenever the giving of any notice is required by statute, the Certificate of Incorporation or these Bylaws, a written waiver thereof signed by the person or persons entitled to said notice, or a waiver thereof by electronic transmission  by the person entitled to said notice, delivered to the Corporation, whether before or after the event as to which such notice is required, shall be deemed equivalent to notice.  Attendance of a stockholder at a meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice (1) of such meeting, except when the stockholder at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting, and (2) (if it is a special meeting) of consideration of a particular matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice, unless the stockholder objects to considering the matter at the beginning of the meeting.
 
 
2
 
 
 
Business transacted at any special meeting of stockholders shall be limited to the purposes stated in the notice (except to the extent that such notice is waived or is not required as provided in the Delaware General Corporation Law or these Bylaws).
 
 
After the record date for a meeting of stockholders has been fixed, at least ten days before such meeting, the officer who has charge of the stock ledger of the Corporation shall make a list of all stockholders entitled to vote at the meeting, arranged in alphabetical order and showing the address of each stockholder (but not the electronic mail address or other electronic contact information, unless the Board of Directors so directs) and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder.  Such list shall be open to the examination of any stockholder for any purpose germane to the meeting for a period of at least ten days prior to the meeting: (1) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to such list is provided with the notice of the meeting, or (2) during ordinary business hours, at the principal place of business of the Corporation.  If the meeting is to be held at a place, then such list shall also, for the duration of the meeting, be produced and kept open to the examination of any stockholder who is present at the time and place of the meeting.  If the meeting is to be held solely by means of remote communication, then such list shall also be open to the examination of any stockholder during the whole time of the meeting on a reasonably accessible electronic network, and the information required to access such list shall be provided with the notice of the meeting.
 
 
Stockholders may take action on a matter at a meeting only if a quorum exists with respect to that matter. Except as otherwise provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation, the holders of a majority of the shares entitled to vote at the meeting, and who are present in person or represented by proxy, shall constitute a quorum at all meetings of the stockholders for the transaction of business.  Where a separate vote by a class or series or classes or series is required, a majority of the outstanding shares of such class or series or classes or series, present in person or represented by proxy, shall constitute a quorum entitled to take action with respect to that vote on that matter.  Once a share is represented for any purpose at a meeting (other than solely to object (1) to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting, or (2) (if it is a special meeting) to consideration of a particular matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice), it is deemed present for quorum purposes for the remainder of the meeting and for any adjournment of that meeting unless a new record date is or must be set for the adjourned meeting. The holders of a majority of the voting shares represented at a meeting, whether or not a quorum is present, may adjourn such meeting from time to time.
 
 
 
3
 
 
 
Unless otherwise provided in the Delaware General Corporation Law or in the Corporation's Certificate of Incorporation, and subject to the other provisions of these Bylaws, each stockholder shall be entitled to one vote on each matter, in person or by proxy, for each share of the Corporation's capital stock that has voting power and that is held by such stockholder.  No proxy shall be voted or acted upon after three years from its date, unless the proxy provides for a longer period.  A duly executed appointment of proxy shall be irrevocable if the appointment form states that it is irrevocable and if, and only as long as, it is coupled with an interest sufficient in law to support an irrevocable power.  If authorized by the Board of Directors, and subject to such guidelines as the Board of Directors may adopt, stockholders and proxyholders not physically present at a meeting of stockholders may, by means of remote communication, participate in a meeting of stockholders and be deemed present in person and vote at such meeting whether such meeting is held at a designated place or solely by means of remote communication, provided that (1) the Corporation implements reasonable measures to verify that each person deemed present and permitted to vote at the meeting by means of remote communication is a stockholder or proxyholder, (2) the Corporation implements reasonable measures to provide such stockholders and proxyholders a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the stockholders, including an opportunity to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting substantially concurrently with such proceedings, and (3) if any stockholder or proxyholder votes or takes other action at the meeting by means of remote communication, a record of such vote or other action is maintained by the Corporation.
 
 
 
Except as provided in the second paragraph of this Section 2.10 or as otherwise provided in these Bylaws or required by law,hen a quorum is present at any meeting of stockholders, all matters shall be determined, adopted and approved by the affirmative vote (which need not be by ballot) of the holders of a majority of the shares present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting and entitled to vote with respect to the matter, unless the proposed action is one upon which, by express provision of statutes or of the Certificate of Incorporation, a different vote is specified and required, in which case such express provision shall govern and control with respect to that vote on that matter.  If the Certificate of Incorporation provides for more or less than one vote for any share, on any matter, every reference in these Bylaws to a majority or other proportion of stock, voting stock or shares shall refer to a majority or other proportion of the votes of such stock, voting stock or shares.  Where a separate vote by a class or classes is required, the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the shares of such class or classes present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting shall be the act of such class.
w
 
Except as provided in Section 3.4 hereof or as otherwise required by law or by the Certificate of Incorporation, each director shall be elected by the vote of the majority of the votes cast with respect to that directors election at any meeting for the election of directors at which a quorum is present; , that if, as of the tenth (10th) day preceding the date the Corporation first mails its notice of meeting for such meeting to the stockholders of the Corporation, the number of nominees exceeds the number of directors to be elected (a ), the directors shall be elected by the vote of a plurality of the votes cast.  For purposes of this Section 2.10, a majority of votes cast shall mean that the number of votes cast for a directors election exceeds the number of votes cast against that directors election (with abstentions and broker nonvotes not counted as a vote cast either for or against that directors election).
provided
Contested Election
 
 
4
 
 
 
 
The business and affairs of the Corporation shall be managed by or under the direction of the Board of Directors, which may exercise all such powers of the Corporation and do all such lawful acts and things, subject to any limitation set forth in the Certificate of Incorporation or as otherwise may be provided in the Delaware General Corporation Law.
 
 
The number of directors which shall constitute the whole Board of Directors shall be determined by resolution of the Board of Directors.
 
 
The Board of Directors shall nominate candidates to stand for election as directors; and other candidates also may be nominated by any Corporation stockholder.  Any stockholder wishing to nominate persons for election as directors at an annual meeting must deliver to the Secretary a written notice of such stockholders intention to do so.  To be timely, the stockholders notice must be delivered to or mailed and received by the Corporation not more than 120 days, and not less than 90 days, before the anniversary date of the preceding annual meeting, except that if the annual meeting is set for a date that is not within 30 days before or 60 days after such anniversary date, the Corporation must receive the notice not later than the close of business on the tenth day following the day on which the Corporation provides notice or public disclosure of the date of the meeting.  The notice must include the following information:  (i)  the name and address of the stockholder who intends to make the nomination and the name and address of the person or persons to be nominated; (ii) a representation that the stockholder is a holder of record of Corporation capital stock entitled to vote at such meeting and intends to appear in person or by proxy at the meeting to nominate the person or persons; (iii) if applicable, a description of all arrangements or understandings between the stockholder and each nominee and any other person or persons, naming such person or persons, pursuant to which the nomination is to be made by the stockholder; (iv) such other information regarding each nominee to be proposed by such stockholder as would be required to be included in a proxy statement filed under the SECs proxy rules if the nominee had been nominated, or intended to be nominated, by the Board of Directors; (v) if applicable, the consent of each nominee to serve as a director if elected; (vi) a statement whether such person, if elected, intends to tender, promptly following such persons election or re-election, an irrevocable resignation in the form required of incumbent directors set forth this Section 3.3 and (vii) such other information that the Board of Directors may request in its discretion.  The Board of Directors may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as it may reasonably require to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as one of its directors.
 
 
5
 
 
In order for any incumbent director to become a nominee of the Board of Directors for further service on the Board of Directors, such person must submit an irrevocable resignation, contingent on (i) that person not receiving a majority of the votes cast in an election that is not a Contested Election, and (ii) acceptance of that resignation by the Board of Directors in accordance with the policies and procedures adopted by the Board of Directors for such purpose.  In the event an incumbent director fails to receive a majority of the votes cast in an election that is not a Contested Election, the nominating and governance committee, or such other committee designated by the Board of Directors pursuant to these Bylaws, shall make a recommendation to the Board of Directors as to whether to accept or reject the resignation of such incumbent director, or whether other action should be taken.  The Board of Directors shall act on the resignation, taking into account the committees recommendation, and publicly disclose (by a press release and filing an appropriate disclosure with the Securities and Exchange Commission) its decision regarding the resignation and, if such resignation is rejected, the rationale behind the decision within ninety (90) days following certification of the election results.  The committee in making its recommendation and the Board of Directors in making its decision each may consider any factors and other information that they consider appropriate and relevant.
 
If the Board of Directors accepts a director's resignation pursuant to this Section 2.10, or if a nominee for director is not elected and the nominee is not an incumbent director, then the Board of Directors may fill the resulting vacancy pursuant to Section 3.4 of these Bylaws.
 
 
Vacancies and newly created directorships resulting from any increase in the authorized number of directors elected by all of the stockholders having the right to vote as a single class may be filled by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors then in office, although fewer than a quorum, or by a sole remaining director.  Whenever the holders of any class or classes of stock or series thereof are entitled to elect one or more directors by the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation, vacancies and newly created directorships of such class or classes or series may be filled by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors elected by such class or classes or series thereof then in office, or by a sole remaining director so elected.  Each director so chosen shall hold office until the next election of directors of the class to which such director was appointed, and until such director's successor is elected and qualified, or until the director's earlier death, resignation or removal.  In the event that one or more directors resign from the Board of Directors, effective at a future date, a majority of the directors then in office, including those who have so resigned, shall have power to fill such vacancy or vacancies, the vote thereon to take effect when such resignation or resignations shall become effective, and each director so chosen shall hold office until the next election of directors, and until such director's successor is elected and qualified, or until the director's earlier death, resignation or removal.
 
 
6
 
 
 
 
Regular meetings of the Board of Directors may be held without notice at such time and at such place as shall from time to time be determined by the Board of Directors.
 
 
Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called by the Chairperson, the Chief Executive Officer or the President on one day's notice to each director, either personally or by telephone, express delivery service (so that the scheduled delivery date of the notice is at least one day in advance of the meeting), telegram, facsimile transmission, electronic mail (effective when directed to an electronic mail address of the director), or other electronic transmission, as defined in Section 232(c) (or any successor section) of the Delaware General Corporation Law (effective when directed to the director), and on five days' notice by mail (effective upon deposit of such notice in the mail).  The notice need not describe the purpose of a special meeting.
 
 
Members of the Board of Directors may participate in a meeting of the Board of Directors by any communication by means of which all participating directors can simultaneously hear each other during the meeting.  A director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.
 
 
Any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the Board of Directors may be taken without a meeting if the action is taken by all members of the Board of Directors.  The action must be evidenced by one or more consents in writing or by electronic transmission describing the action taken, signed by each director, and delivered to the Corporation for inclusion in the minute book.
 
 
A director may waive any notice required by statute, the Certificate of Incorporation or these Bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice.  Except as set forth below, the waiver must be in writing, signed by the director entitled to the notice, or made by electronic transmission by the director entitled to the notice, and delivered to the Corporation for inclusion in the minute book.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, a director's attendance at or participation in a meeting waives any required notice to the director of the meeting unless the director at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting.
 
 
7
 
 
 
At all meetings of the Board of Directors, a quorum of the Board of Directors consists of a majority of the total number of directors prescribed pursuant to of these Bylaws.  The vote of a majority of the directors present at any meeting at which there is a quorum shall be the act of the Board of Directors, except as may be otherwise specifically provided by statute or by the Certificate of Incorporation or by these Bylaws.
Section 
3.2
 
 
The Board of Directors may designate one or more committees, each committee to consist of one or more directors.  The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee.  If a member of a committee shall be absent from any meeting, or disqualified from voting thereat, the remaining member or members present and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may, by unanimous vote, appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in the place of such absent or disqualified member.  Any such committee, to the extent provided in the resolution of the Board of Directors, shall have and may exercise all the powers and authority of the Board of Directors in the management of the business and affairs of the Corporation, and may authorize the seal of the Corporation to be affixed to all papers which may require it; but no such committee shall have the power or authority in reference to approving or adopting, or recommending to the stockholders, any action or matter (other than the election or removal of directors) expressly required by the Delaware General Corporation Law to be submitted to stockholders for approval or adopting, amending or repealing any bylaw of the Corporation; and unless the resolution designating the committee, these bylaws or the Certificate of Incorporation expressly so provide, no such committee shall have the power or authority to declare a dividend, to authorize the issuance of stock, or to adopt a certificate of ownership and merger pursuant to Section 253 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.  Such committee or committees shall have such name or names as may be determined from time to time by resolution adopted by the Board of Directors.  Each committee shall keep regular minutes of its meetings and report the same to the Board of Directors, when required.  Unless otherwise specified in the Board of Directors resolution appointing the Committee, all provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law and these Bylaws relating to meetings, action without meetings, notice (and waiver thereof), and quorum and voting requirements of the Board of Directors apply, as well, to such committees and their members.  Unless otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation, these Bylaws, or the resolution of the Board of Directors designating the committee, a committee may create one or more subcommittees, each subcommittee to consist of one or more members of the committee, and delegate to a subcommittee any or all of the powers and authority of the committee.
 
 
8
 
 
 
 
The Board of Directors shall have the authority to fix the compensation of directors.  No such payment shall preclude any director from serving the Corporation in any other capacity and receiving compensation therefor. 
 
 
 
The officers of the Corporation shall be a Chairperson, a Chief Executive Officer, a President, a Secretary and a Treasurer, and such other officers as the Board of Directors (or an officer authorized by the Board of Directors) from time to time may appoint, including one or more Vice Chairmen, Executive Vice Presidents, Vice Presidents, Assistant Secretaries and Assistant Treasurers.  Each such officer shall exercise such powers and perform such duties as shall be set forth below and such other powers and duties as from time to time may be specified by the Board of Directors or by any officer(s) authorized by the Board of Directors to prescribe the duties of such other officers.  Any number of offices may be held by the same person, except that in no event shall the President and the Secretary be the same person.  As set forth below, each of the Chairperson, Chief Executive Officer, President, and/or any Vice President may execute bonds, mortgages and other contracts under the seal of the Corporation, if required, except where required or permitted by law to be otherwise executed and except where the execution thereof shall be expressly delegated by the Board of Directors to some other officer or agent of the Corporation.
 
 
The Chairperson shall (when present) preside at all meetings of the Board of Directors and stockholders, and shall ensure that all orders and resolutions of the Board of Directors and stockholders are carried into effect.  The Chairperson may execute bonds, mortgages and other contracts, under the seal of the Corporation, if required, except where required or permitted by law to be otherwise signed and executed and except where the signing and execution thereof shall be expressly delegated by the Board of Directors to some other officer or agent of the Corporation.
 
 
9
 
 
 
The Chairperson, President or other officer of the Corporation may be designated by the Board of Directors as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation.  The Chief Executive Officer shall have general supervision, direction and control of the business of the Corporation.  The Chief Executive Officer may execute bonds, mortgages and other contracts, under the seal of the Corporation, if required, except where required or permitted by law to be otherwise signed and executed and except where the signing and execution thereof shall be expressly delegated by the Board of Directors to some other officer or agent of the Corporation.
 
 
 
The President shall be the chief operating officer of the Corporation and shall have full responsibility and authority for management of the day-to-day operations of the Corporation, subject to the authority of the Board of Directors and the Chief Executive Officer, if different.  The President may execute bonds, mortgages and other contracts, under the seal of the Corporation, if required, except where required or permitted by law to be otherwise signed and executed and except where the signing and execution thereof shall be expressly delegated by the Board of Directors to some other officer or agent of the Corporation.
 
 
In the absence of the President or in the event of the President's inability or refusal to act, the Vice President (or in the event there be more than one Vice President, the Vice Presidents in the order designated, or in the absence of any designation, then in the order of their election) shall perform the duties of the President, and when so acting shall have all the powers of, and be subject to all the restrictions upon, the President.
 
 
The Secretary shall have responsibility for preparation of minutes of meetings of the Board of Directors and of the stockholders and for authenticating records of the Corporation.  The Secretary shall give, or cause to be given, notice of all meetings of the stockholders and special meetings of the Board of Directors.  The Secretary or an Assistant Secretary may also attest all instruments signed by any other officer of the Corporation.
 
 
The Assistant Secretary, or if there be more than one, the Assistant Secretaries in the order determined by the Board of Directors (or if there shall have been no such determination, then in the order of their election), shall, in the absence of the Secretary or in the event of the Secretary's inability or refusal to act, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the Secretary.
 
 
10
 
 
 
The Treasurer shall be the chief financial officer of the Corporation and shall have responsibility for the custody of the corporate funds and securities and shall see to it that full and accurate accounts of receipts and disbursements are kept in books belonging to the Corporation.  The Treasurer shall render to the Chief Executive Officer, the President, and the Board of Directors, upon request, an account of all financial transactions and of the financial condition of the Corporation.
 
 
The Assistant Treasurer, or if there shall be more than one, the Assistant Treasurers in the order determined by the Board of Directors (or if there shall have been no such determination, then in the order of their election), shall, in the absence of the Treasurer or in the event of the Treasurer's inability or refusal to act, perform the duties and exercise the powers of the Treasurer.
 
 
The officers of the Corporation shall hold office until their successors are chosen and qualify or until their earlier resignation or removal.  Any officer may resign at any time upon written notice to the Corporation.  Any officer elected or appointed by the Board of Directors may be removed at any time, with or without cause, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Board of Directors.
 
 
 
The compensation of officers of the Corporation shall be fixed by the Board of Directors or by any officer(s) authorized by the Board of Directors to prescribe the compensation of such other officers.
 
 
The Corporation may secure the fidelity of any or all of its officers or agents by bond or otherwise.
 
 
 
The shares of the Corporation shall be represented by certificates, provided that the Board of Directors may provide by resolution that some or all of any or all classes or series of the Corporation's stock shall be uncertificated shares.  Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by a certificate until such certificate is surrendered to the Corporation.  Every holder of stock represented by certificates shall be entitled to have a certificate (representing the number of shares registered in certificate form) signed in the name of the Corporation by the Chairperson, Chief Executive Officer, President or any Vice President, and by the Treasurer, Secretary or any Assistant Treasurer or Assistant Secretary of the Corporation.  Any or all the signatures on the certificate may be a facsimile.  In case any officer, transfer agent or registrar whose signature or facsimile signature appears on a certificate shall have ceased to be such officer, transfer agent or registrar before such certificate is issued, it may be issued by the Corporation with the same effect as if such person were such officer, transfer agent or registrar at the date of issue.
 
 
11
 
 
 
 
The Board of Directors, Chairperson, Chief Executive Officer, President or Secretary may direct a new certificate of stock to be issued in place of any certificate theretofore issued by the Corporation and alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed, upon the making of an affidavit of that fact by the person claiming that the certificate of stock has been lost, stolen or destroyed.  When authorizing such issuance of a new certificate, the Board of Directors or any such officer may, as a condition precedent to the issuance thereof, require the owner of such lost, stolen or destroyed certificate or certificates, or such owner's legal representative, to advertise the same in such manner as the Board of Directors or such officer shall require and/or to give the Corporation a bond or indemnity, in such sum or on such terms and conditions as the Board of Directors or such officer may direct, as indemnity against any claim that may be made against the Corporation on account of the certificate alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed or on account of the issuance of such new certificate or uncertificated shares.
 
 
 
In order that the Corporation may determine the stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors, and which record date shall not be more than sixty days nor less than ten days before the date of such meeting.  If no record date is fixed by the Board of Directors, the record date for determining stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall be the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held.  A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting, unless the Board of Directors fixes a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
 
 
12
 
 
 
In order that the Corporation may determine the stockholders entitled to receive payment of any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights or the stockholders entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action, the Board of Directors may fix a record date, which record date shall not precede the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted, and which record date shall be not more than sixty days prior to such action.  If no record date is fixed, the record date for determining stockholders for any such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
 
 
The Corporation shall be entitled to recognize the exclusive right of a person registered on its books as the owner of shares to receive dividends, to receive notifications, to vote as such owner, and to exercise all the rights and powers of an owner.  The Corporation shall not be bound to recognize any equitable or other claim to or interest in such share or shares on the part of any other person, whether or not it shall have express or other notice thereof, except as otherwise may be provided by the Delaware General Corporation Law.
 
 
 
Each person who was or is a party or is threatened to be made a party to or is involved in any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative and whether by or in the right of the Corporation or otherwise (a proceeding), by reason of the fact that he or she, or a person of whom he or she is the legal representative, is or was a director or officer of the Corporation or is or was serving at the request of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, partner (limited or general) or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, limited liability company, trust or other enterprise, including service with respect to an employee benefit plan, shall be (and shall be deemed to have a contractual right to be) indemnified and held harmless by the Corporation (and any successor to the Corporation by merger or otherwise) to the fullest extent authorized by, and subject to the conditions and (except as provided herein) procedures set forth in the Delaware General Corporation Law, as the same exists or may hereafter be amended (but any such amendment shall not be deemed to limit or prohibit the rights of indemnification hereunder for past acts or omissions of any such person insofar as such amendment limits or prohibits the indemnification rights that said law permitted the Corporation to provide prior to such amendment), against all expenses, liabilities and losses (including attorneys' fees, judgments, fines, ERISA taxes or penalties and amounts paid or to be paid in settlement) reasonably incurred or suffered by such person in connection therewith; , that the Corporation shall indemnify any such person seeking indemnification in connection with a proceeding (or part thereof) initiated by such person (except for a suit or action pursuant to hereof) only if such proceeding (or part thereof) was authorized by the Board of Directors of the Corporation.  Persons who are not directors or officers of the Corporation and are not so serving at the request of the Corporation may be similarly indemnified in respect of such service to the extent authorized at any time by the Board of Directors of the Corporation.  The indemnification conferred in this also shall include the right to be paid by the Corporation (and such successor) the expenses (including attorneys' fees) incurred in the defense of or other involvement in any such proceeding in advance of its final disposition; , that, if and to the extent the Delaware General Corporation Law requires, the payment of such expenses (including attorneys' fees) incurred by a director or officer in advance of the final disposition of a proceeding shall be made only upon delivery to the Corporation of an undertaking by or on behalf of such director or officer to repay all amounts so paid in advance if it shall ultimately be determined that such director or officer is not entitled to be indemnified under this or otherwise; and , that, such expenses incurred by other employees and agents may be so paid in advance upon such terms and conditions, if any, as the Board of Directors deems appropriate.
provided,
however
Section 6.2
Section 6.1
provided,
however
Section 6.1
provided
further
 
 
13
 
 
 
 
If a claim under is not paid in full by the Corporation within sixty days after a written claim has been received by the Corporation, the claimant may at any time thereafter bring an action against the Corporation to recover the unpaid amount of the claim and, if successful in whole or in part, the claimant shall be entitled to be paid also the expense of prosecuting such action.  It shall be a defense to any such action (other than an action brought to enforce a claim for expenses incurred in connection with any proceeding in advance of its final disposition where the required undertaking, if any is required, has been tendered to the Corporation) that the claimant has not met the standards of conduct which make it permissible under the Delaware General Corporation Law for the Corporation to indemnify the claimant for the amount claimed or is otherwise not entitled to indemnification under , but the burden of proving such defense shall be on the Corporation.  The failure of the Corporation (in the manner provided under the Delaware General Corporation Law) to have made a determination prior to or after the commencement of such action that indemnification of the claimant is proper in the circumstances because he or she has met the applicable standard of conduct set forth in the Delaware General Corporation Law shall not be a defense to the action or create a presumption that the claimant has not met the applicable standard of conduct.  Unless otherwise specified in an agreement with the claimant, an actual determination by the Corporation (in the manner provided under the Delaware General Corporation Law) after the commencement of such action that the claimant has not met such applicable standard of conduct shall not be a defense to the action, but shall create a presumption that the claimant has not met the applicable standard of conduct. 
Section 6.1
Section 6.1
 
 
14
 
 
 
The rights to indemnification and advance payment of expenses provided by hereof shall not be deemed exclusive of any other rights to which those seeking indemnification and advance payment of expenses may be entitled under any bylaw, agreement, vote of stockholders or disinterested directors or otherwise, both as to action in his or her official capacity and as to action in another capacity while holding such office.
Section 6.1
 
 
The indemnification and advance payment of expenses and rights thereto provided by, or granted pursuant to, hereof shall, unless otherwise provided when authorized or ratified, continue as to a person who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, partner or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the personal representatives, heirs, executors and administrators of such person.
Section 6.1
 
 
The Corporation shall have power to purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the Corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, partner (limited or general) or agent of another corporation or of a partnership, joint venture, limited liability company, trust or other enterprise, against any liability asserted against such person or incurred by such person in any such capacity, or arising out of such person's status as such, and related expenses, whether or not the Corporation would have the power to indemnify such person against such liability under the provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
 
 
 
 
Any stockholder, in person or by attorney or other agent, shall, upon written demand under oath stating the purpose thereof, have the right during the usual hours for business to inspect for any proper purpose, and to make copies or extracts from:  (1) the Corporation's stock ledger, a list of its stockholders, and its other books and records; and (2) other documents as required by law.  A proper purpose shall mean a purpose reasonably related to such person's interest as a stockholder.  In every instance where an attorney or other agent shall be the person who seeks the right to inspection, the demand under oath shall be accompanied by a power of attorney or such other writing which authorizes the attorney or other agent to so act on behalf of the stockholder.  The demand under oath shall be directed to the Corporation at its registered office or at its principal place of business.
 
 
15
 
 
 
 
The Board of Directors may declare dividends upon the capital stock of the Corporation, subject to the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation and the laws of the State of Delaware.
 
 
The directors of the Corporation may set apart, out of the funds of the Corporation available for dividends, a reserve or reserves for any proper purpose and may abolish any such reserve.
 
 
All checks, drafts or other orders for the payment of money, and promissory notes of the Corporation shall be signed by such officer or officers or such other person or persons as the Board of Directors may from time to time designate.
 
 
 
The fiscal year of the Corporation shall end on December 31 of each year, unless otherwise fixed by resolution of the Board of Directors.
 
 
 
The corporate seal, if any, shall be in such form as the Board of Directors shall approve.  The seal may be used by causing it or a facsimile thereof to be impressed or affixed or otherwise reproduced.
 
16
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20120510160548.txt.gz
TIME:20120510160548
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
May 10, 2012
(Date of earliest event reported)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On May 10, 2012, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2012.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 5:00 p.m. Eastern time on May 10, 2012 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.  In addition, American Public Education provides an investor fact sheet on its investor relations website, .  A copy of the investor fact sheet is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.3 and is incorporated in this report by reference.
www.americanpubliceducation.com
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports First Quarter 2012 Results
CHARLES TOWN, W.V.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--May 10, 2012--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System (APUS), which operates through American Military University (AMU) and American Public University (APU)  announced financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2012.
Recent Highlights:
Net course registrationsincreased to approximately 101,000 in the first quarter of 2012, a year-over-year increase of 24%.
Net course registrations by new students in the first quarter of 2012 increased to approximately 20,500, an increase of approximately 15% over the same period of 2011.
As of March 31, 2012, there were a total of approximately 119,200 active students at American Public University System, a year-over-year increase of 32%.
First quarter 2012 revenues increased 29% to $75.8 million, compared to $58.7 million in the first quarter of 2011.
Income from operations before interest income and income taxes in the first quarter of 2012 increased 14% to $14.9 million, compared to $13.1 million in the same period of 2011.
Net income for the first quarter of 2012 increased 15% to $9.1 million, or $0.50 per diluted share, compared to $7.9 million, or $0.43 per diluted share, in the same period of 2011.
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the first quarter of 2012 increased 29% to $75.8 million, compared to total revenues of $58.7 million in the first quarter of 2011. Income from operations before interest income and income taxes in the first quarter of 2012 increased 14% to $14.9 million, compared to $13.1 million in the same period of 2011. Stock-based compensation expense reduced operating income by $1.0 million in the first quarter of 2012 and $862,000 in the first quarter of 2011.
Net income for the first quarter of 2012 increased 15% to $9.1 million, or $0.50 per diluted share, which includes $613,000, or $0.03 per diluted share, in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. This compares to net income of $7.9 million, or $0.43 per diluted share for the first quarter of 2011, including $528,000, or $0.03 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the first quarter of 2012 and 2011 were approximately 18.2 million and 18.4 million, respectively.
Total cash and cash equivalents as of March 31, 2012 were approximately $125.8 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the three months ended March 31, 2012 was approximately $14.8 million, compared to $19.9 million in the same period of 2011. Capital expenditures were approximately $6.6 million for the three months ended March 31, 2012, compared to $3.6 million in the prior year period. Depreciation and amortization was $2.7 million for the three months ended March 31, 2012 and $2.1 million for the same period of 2011.
Net Course Registrations:
For the three months ended March 31,
Note: Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty. Net course registrations and net course registration growth rates include registrations for certain one-credit courses (non-lab courses) and other non-credit registrations in the current and prior year periods.
Second Quarter 2012 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason.
American Public Education anticipates second quarter 2012 net course registrations by new students to increase between approximately 2% and 4% year-over-year; net course registrations to increase between approximately 12% and 18% year-over-year; revenues to increase between approximately 14% and 22% over the prior year period; and net income to be between $0.41 and $0.47 per diluted share.
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys first quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast today at 5:00 p.m. Eastern time. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, operates through (AMU) and (APU). APUS serves more than 119,000 adult learners worldwide and offers 87 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts. Nationally recognized for its best practices in online higher education, APUS provides an affordable education through classes taught by experienced faculty who are committed to the academic achievement of their students.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
American Public University System is accredited by The Higher Learning Commission and is a member of the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools (). For more information about APUS graduation rates, median debt of students who completed programs, and other important information, visit .
www.ncahlc.org
www.apus.edu/disclosure
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, Inc., or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education, Inc. and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements regarding expected growth, expected revenues and expected earnings. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2012, and other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: American Public Education, Inc. Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304-724-3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Associate Vice President, Investor Relations 703-334-3880

Exhibit 99.2
Slide:    1         FIRST QUARTER 2012 CONFERENCE CALLMAY 10, 2012
Slide:    2         First quarter 2012 conference call     MAY 10, 2012         SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT         Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, Inc. or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements are sometimes identified by words such as anticipate, believe, could", estimate, expect, intend, may, should, will and would. These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on slide Second Quarter 2012 Outlook, as well as statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the Risk Factors section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011 as filed with the SEC, quarterly report on Form 10-Q for the three months ended March 31, 2012, and in the Companys other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.Other Placeholder:     2
 Slide:   3         First Quarter 2012 Results: Civilian students continued to drive diversification of overall student population at APUS. Recent measures appear effective at decreasing the number of FSA fraud and abuse students.AMUs leadership within the Military and Veteran communities continued to expand.New partnerships:National Environmental Health Association (NEHA)Hispanic Information & Telecommunications Network (HITN)EdAssist (a service of Bright Horizons)APUS continues with its strategic focus on academic quality, customer satisfaction, and affordability.            For three months ending March 31, 2012           Net Course Registrations by Primary Funding Source          Cash & Other14%     FSA/Title IV34%     Military/TA40%      VA12%     First quarter 2012 conference call     MAY 10, 2012 Other Placeholder:          3
Slide:    4         Strong Academic Foundations Lead to Growing Recognition    New full-time faculty members hired in the first quarter are now fully engaged in teaching and serving as course leads.APUS applied and was admitted to the Association of American Colleges and Universities (AAC&Us) Summer Institute for General Education and Assessment in June.APUS Vice President of Research and Development, Dr. Phil Ice, honored by United States Distance Learning Association (USDLA) for Outstanding Leadership in Distance Learning. Disaster Recovery Journal presented the 2011 Annual Best Practices Award to Anthony Mangeri, APUS Manager of Fire & Emergency Management Outreach.AMU was the recipient of the Council of College and Military Educators (CCME) 2012 Institution Award at their Annual Symposium.  First quarter 2012 conference call     MAY 10, 2012 Other Placeholder:          4
Slide:    5         First quarter 2012 conference call     MAY 10, 2012         Assembling Pillars for Long-Term Growth           ePress Initiative to Combat Textbook Inflation Investing to Optimize Title IV ProcessingTechnology Fee to Support  Administrative ServicesExpanding Domestic Growth Market segments where affordability resonates Underserved markets, U.S. Latino communitiesHospitality and Tourism, Healthcare, and Nursing Expanding RelationshipsCorporations Non-Profit OrganizationsCommunity CollegesInternational Opportunities Affordable, online degrees programs from an  accredited U.S. University          Academic Quality/        Growing Recognition     Tech Fee Title IV Automation           Enter New Markets   International PartnershipsUS Domestic Other Placeholder:   5
Slide:    6         First Quarter 2012 Financial Results    First quarter 2012 conference call     MAY 10, 2012         Revenues increased 29% to $75.8 million Income from operations before interest income and income taxes increased 14% to $14.9 millionNet income increased 15% to $9.1 million or $0.50 per diluted shareCash and Cash Equivalents of $125.8 million or $6.91 per diluted shareNo long-term debt Other Placeholder:    6
Slide:    7         Second Quarter 2012 Outlook The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially.                                         Approximate Growth (y/y) Net course registration growth by new students         2%-4%Net course registration growth     12%-18% Revenue growth        14%-22%Earnings per diluted share       $0.41 to $0.47      First quarter 2012 conference call     MAY 10, 2012 Other Placeholder:          7 Other Placeholder:          7         Additional ConsiderationsSome individuals and groups attempt to abuse the Title IV system and the Company believes net course registrations in the prior year period would have been lower absent this factor.A fraud prevention measure implemented during the quarter may have also impacted the ability of certain new students to register for classes, especially during the month of June  this particular measure has recently been modified.
Slide:    8         2012 Net Course Registrations           First quarter 2012 conference call     MAY 10, 2012 Other Placeholder:          8         Net course registration by new students are believed to have been impacted, in part, by a recently implemented fraud prevention measure.  This item has been modified, while most other steps and processes remain in place.          1 Net course registrations for the months presented are not final and are subject to change as registration periods have not closed.        NOTE: Net course registration growth may be impacted by changes to FSA processing and verification requirements implemented by APUS, as well as by competition, market conditions, and various other factors.   Net Course Registration Growth (y/y) by:
Slide:    9         First quarter 2012 conference call     MAY 10, 2012         Assembling Pillars for Long-Term Growth           ePress Initiative to Combat Textbook Inflation Investing to Optimize Title IV ProcessingTechnology Fee to Support  Administrative ServicesExpanding Domestic Growth Market segments where affordability resonates Underserved markets, U.S. Latino communitiesHospitality and Tourism, Healthcare and Nursing Expanding RelationshipsCorporations Non-Profit OrganizationsCommunity CollegesInternational Opportunities Affordable, online degrees programs from an  accredited U.S. University Academic Quality/        Growing Recognition     Tech Fee Title IV Automation           Enter New Markets   International PartnershipsUS Domestic Other Placeholder:   9         ePress
Slide:    10        FIRST QUARTER 2012 CONFERENCE CALLMAY 10, 2012

Exhibit 99.3
American Public Education, Inc. is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. American Public University System (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, operates through American Military University (AMU) and American Public University (APU). APUS mission is to provide quality higher education with emphasis on educating the nations military and public service communities by offering respected, relevant, accessible and affordable, student-focused online programs, which prepare them for service and leadership in a diverse, global society. American Public University System is accredited by The Higher Learning Commission and is a member of the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools (NCA), www.ncahlc.org. APUS REGISTRATIONS AND STUDENT ENROLLMENTFor the three months ended March 31, 2011 2012 % ChangeNet Course Registrations from New Students 17,800 20,500 15% Net Course Registrations 81,700 101,000 24%As of March 31, 2011 2012 % ChangeActive Student Enrollment 90,600 119,200 32%APUS REGISTRATIONS BY PRIMARY FUNDING SOURCE For the three months ended March 31, 2012 % of TotalFederal Student Aid (Title IV) 34% Department of Defense Tuition Assistance (TA) 40% Veterans Benefits (VA) 12% Cash & Other Sources 14% FINANCIAL METRICS (in millions, except per share data)Three Months Ended 3/31/2012 Y/Y Growth Revenues $75.8 29% Net Income $ 9.1 15% Diluted EPS (per diluted share) $0.50Balance Sheet, as of 3/31/2012 12/31/2011Cash & Equiv. $ 125.8 $ 119.0 Total Assets $208.8 $198.9 Total Corp. Debt $ 0 $ 0Full Year Ended 12/31/2011 Y/Y Growth Revenues $260.4 31% Net Income $ 40.8 36% Diluted EPS (per diluted share) $ 2.23AFFORDABLE TUITION Undergraduate Tuition: $250/credit hour Graduate Tuition: $325/credit hourAvg. Age: 32 yearsAvg. Undergraduate Class Size: 15 studentsGender Ratio: 67 male/33 femaleAvg. Courses Per Year: 3 Military/4 CivilianFaculty: 315 Full-Time/1,475 AdjunctStaff: 800 Full-Time/20 Part-TimeAMU & APU GRADUATES21,000+ Alumni6,30002 03 04 05 06 07 08 09 10 111009006003004,8003,4002,1001,7001,100


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20120514161946.txt.gz
TIME:20120514161946
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
May 14, 2012
(Date of earliest event reported)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Section 8  Other Events
Item 8.01. Other Events.
On May 14, 2012, American Public Education, Inc. (the Company) announced that its Board of Directors has authorized a program to repurchase up to $20 million of shares of the Company's common stock. Subject to market conditions, applicable legal requirements and other factors, the repurchases may be made in open market transactions or privately negotiated transactions. The authorization does not obligate the Company to acquire any shares, and purchases may be commenced or suspended at any time based on market conditions and other factors that the Company deems appropriate. As of March 31, 2012 there were approximately 18.2 million diluted shares outstanding of the Companys common stock.  The Companys press release announcing the repurchase program is attached as Exhibit 99.1.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Other Exhibits
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
99.1     Press Release of American Public Education, Inc. dated May 14, 2012
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
2
EXHIBIT INDEX
3

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Announces Share Repurchase Program
CHARLES TOWN, W. Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--May 14, 2012--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System (APUS), which operates through American Military University (AMU) and American Public University (APU)  announces that its Board of Directors has authorized a program to repurchase up to $20 million worth of shares of the Company's common stock. Subject to market conditions, applicable legal requirements and other factors, the repurchases may be made in open market transactions or privately negotiated transactions. The authorization does not obligate the Company to acquire any shares, and purchases may be commenced or suspended at any time based on market conditions and other factors that the Company deems appropriate. As of March 31, 2012 there were approximately 18.2 million diluted shares outstanding of American Public Education common stock.
American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, operates through (AMU) and (APU). APUS serves more than 119,000 adult learners worldwide and offers 87 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts. Nationally recognized for its best practices in online higher education, APUS provides an affordable education through classes taught by experienced faculty who are committed to the academic achievement of their students.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
American Public University System is accredited by The Higher Learning Commission and is a member of the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools (). For more information about APUS graduation rates, median debt of students who completed programs, and other important information, visit .
www.ncahlc.org
www.apus.edu/disclosure
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, Inc., or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education, Inc. and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements regarding expected growth, expected revenues and expected earnings. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2012, and other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: American Public Education, Inc. Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304-724-3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Associate Vice President, Investor Relations 703-334-3880


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20120517060457.txt.gz
TIME:20120517060457
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.07 Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
The Annual Meeting of the stockholders of American Public Education, Inc. (the "Company") was held on May 11, 2012 (the "Annual Meeting"). As of March 16, 2012, the date of record for determining the stockholders entitled to vote on the proposals presented at the Annual Meeting, there were 17,886,107 shares of Company common stock issued and outstanding and entitled to vote at the Annual Meeting. The holders of 16,794,484 shares of the Company's issued and outstanding common stock were represented in person or by proxy at the Annual Meeting, constituting a quorum. The proposals are described in detail in the Company's definitive proxy statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 26, 2012. The vote results detailed below represent final results as certified by the Inspector of Elections.
Proposal 1.
The Company's stockholders elected the following persons, who were listed in the Company's proxy statement for the Annual Meeting, to the Company's Board of Directors to hold office for the term expiring at the 2013 Annual Meeting of Stockholders or until their successors are elected and qualified or until his or her earlier death, resignation or removal:
 
Proposal 2.
The Company's stockholders approved in an advisory (non-binding) vote the compensation of the Company's named executive officers. The votes regarding this proposal were as follows:
 
Proposal 3.
The Company's stockholders ratified the appointment of McGladrey & Pullen, LLP as the Company's independent registered public accounting firm for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2012. The votes regarding this proposal were as follows:
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20120620093017.txt.gz
TIME:20120620093017
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
 June 20, 2012
Registrants telephone number, including area code:  304-724-3700
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item 5.02     Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On June 14, 2012, the Board of Directors of American Public Education, Inc. appointed Eric C. Andersen to serve as a director of the Company until the 2013 annual meeting of stockholders and until his successor is duly elected and qualified.
Consistent with the Companys compensation policy for non-employee directors, Mr. Andersen will be compensated under the terms of the Companys compensation policy for non-employee directors as in effect from time to time, which currently provides for an annual retainer of $32,250. The annual retainer is payable in quarterly installments, and Mr. Andersen will have the alternative to elect to receive his annual retainer in common stock having the same value as the portion of the annual retainer to be paid.  Non-employee directors also receive an annual grant of restricted stock having a value of $41,750.
In connection with Mr. Andersens appointment to the Board, he and the Company are entering into the Companys standard form of indemnification agreement for executive officers and directors, the form of which was previously filed as Exhibit 10.3 to the Companys registration statement on Form S-1 (File No. 333-145185).
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
2
EXHIBIT INDEX
3

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Announces Addition to its Board of Directors
CHARLES TOWN, W. Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--June 20, 2012--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) today announced the election of Eric C. Ric Andersen to its Board of Directors.
We are pleased that Ric Andersen has accepted a position on American Public Educations Board. He brings with him a wealth of experience and expertise, particularly in outsourcing, business processes and international operations, which will make him a great asset to the Board, said J. Christopher Everett, APEIs Chairman of the Board.
Mr. Andersen is a partner with Milestone Partners, a lower middle market private equity firm that specializes in making control equity investments in established operating businesses. Prior to joining Milestone Partners in 2011, from 2006 to 2011 Mr. Andersen served as a Managing Director of private equity firm Silver Lake Partners, before which he worked in the consulting industry with IBM Business Consulting Services (BCS), serving as Managing Partner, Asia Pacific responsible for IBMs business solutions and business process outsourcing business across Asia Pacific, and Managing Partner, Distribution Sector responsible for IBMs consulting business in the pharmaceutical, retail, consumer goods and travel/transportation industries. Before working with IBM, Mr. Andersen was a senior partner at PWC Consulting, where he served in a variety of positions.
American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. American Public University System (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, operates through American Military University (AMU) and American Public University (APU). APUS serves more than 119,000 adult learners worldwide and offers 87 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts. Nationally recognized for its best practices in online higher education, APUS provides an affordable education through classes taught by experienced faculty who are committed to the academic achievement of their students.
American Public University System is accredited by The Higher Learning Commission and is a member of the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools (www.ncahlc.org). For more information about APUS graduation rates, median debt of students who completed programs, and other important information, visit www.apus.edu/disclosure.
CONTACT: American Public Education, Inc. Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304-724-3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Associate Vice President, Investor Relations 703-334-3880


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20120808070051.txt.gz
TIME:20120808070051
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
(Date of earliest event reported)
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
August 8, 2012
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On August 8, 2012, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2012.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 9:00 a.m. Eastern time on August 8, 2012 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.  In addition, American Public Education provides an investor fact sheet on its investor relations website, .  A copy of the investor fact sheet is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.3 and is incorporated in this report by reference.
www.americanpubliceducation.com
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)     Exhibits
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports Second Quarter 2012 Results
CHARLES TOWN, W.Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--August 8, 2012--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System (APUS), which operates through American Military University (AMU) and American Public University (APU)  announced financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2012.
Recent Highlights:
Net course registrationsincreased to approximately 92,900 in the second quarter of 2012, a year-over-year increase of 18%.
Net course registrations by new students in the second quarter of 2012 increased to approximately 19,600, an increase of approximately 4% over the same period of 2011.
Second quarter 2012 revenues increased 23% to $74.6 million, compared to $60.8 million in the second quarter of 2011.
Income from operations before interest income and income taxes in the second quarter of 2012 increased to $15.0 million, compared to $14.9 million in the same period of 2011.
Net income for the second quarter of 2012 increased to $9.2 million, or $0.51 per diluted share, compared to $9.0 million, or $0.49 per diluted share, in the same period of 2011.
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the second quarter of 2012 increased 23% to $74.6 million, compared to total revenues of $60.8 million in the second quarter of 2011. Income from operations before interest income and income taxes in the second quarter of 2012 increased to $15.0 million, compared to $14.9 million in the same period of 2011. Stock-based compensation expense reduced operating income by $917,000 in the second quarter of 2012 and $746,000 in the second quarter of 2011.
Net income for the second quarter of 2012 increased to $9.2 million, or $0.51 per diluted share, which includes $0.03 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. This compares to net income of $9.0 million, or $0.49 per diluted share for the second quarter of 2011, including $0.02 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the second quarter of 2012 and 2011 were approximately 18.2 million and 18.3 million, respectively.
For the six months ended June 30, 2012, total revenues were $150.4 million, an increase of 26% compared to total revenues of $119.5 million in the same period of 2011. Income from operations before interest income and income tax for the six months ended June 30, 2012 increased to $29.9 million, compared to $28.0 million in the same period of 2011. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each period's operating income by $1.9 million and $1.6 million, respectively.
Net income for the six months ended June 30, 2012 to $18.3 million, or $1.01 per diluted share, which includes $0.07 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. This compares to net income of $16.8 million, or $0.92 per diluted share, in the same period of 2011, including $0.05 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the six months ended June 30, 2012 and 2011 were approximately 18.2 million and 18.4 million, respectively.
Total cash and cash equivalents as of June 30, 2012 were approximately $116.7 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the six months ended June 30, 2012 was approximately $22.7 million, compared to $25.7 million in the same period of 2011. Capital expenditures were approximately $18.9 million for the six months ended June 30, 2012, compared to $6.8 million in the prior year period. Depreciation and amortization was $5.4 million for the six months ended June 30, 2012 and $4.3 million for the same period of 2011.
Note: Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty. Net course registrations and net course registration growth rates include registrations for certain one-credit courses (non-lab courses) and other non-credit registrations in the current and prior year periods.
Third Quarter 2012 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason.
American Public Education anticipates third quarter 2012 net course registrations by new students to be approximately flat year-over-year; net course registrations to increase between approximately 16% and 18% year-over-year; revenues to increase between approximately 16% and 19% over the prior year period; and net income to be between $0.46 and $0.51 per diluted share.
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys second quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast today at 9:00 a.m. Eastern time. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, operates through (AMU) and (APU). APUS serves more than 100,000 adult learners worldwide and offers 87 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts. Nationally recognized for its best practices in online higher education, APUS provides an affordable education through classes taught by experienced faculty who are committed to the academic achievement of their students.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
American Public University System is accredited by The Higher Learning Commission and is a member of the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools (). For more information about APUS graduation rates, median debt of students who completed programs, and other important information, visit .
www.ncahlc.org
www.apus.edu/disclosure
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, Inc., or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education, Inc. and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements regarding expected growth, expected revenues and expected earnings. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2012, and other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: American Public Education, Inc. Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304-724-3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Associate Vice President, Investor Relations 703-334-3880

Exhibit 99.2
S E C O N D Q U A R T E R 2 0 1 2 C O N F E R E N C E C A L L A u g u s t 8 , 2 0 1 2
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, Inc. or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements are sometimes identified by words such as anticipate, believe, could", estimate, expect, intend, may, should, will and would. These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on slide Second Quarter 2012 Outlook, as well as statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the Risk Factors section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011 as filed with the SEC, quarterly report on Form 10-Q for the three months ended June 30, 2012, and in the Companys other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future. 2
Second Quarter and YTD Results: AMUs leadership within the Military and Veteran communities continues to expand AMU students featured in EDGE magazine AMU ranked #1 most popular colleges Civilian students continue to drive diversification of overall student population at APUS Enrollment of students with intent to pursue a degree increase First course persistence rate increase Measures to reduce FSA fraud and abuse appear effective New partnerships: Dollar General Corporation ManTech International Corporation SAIC Net Course Registrations by Primary Funding Source Military/TA 39% VA 13% Cash & Other 14% FSA/Title IV 34% For six months ending June 30, 2012 Pay Type YTD 2012 Growth (y/y) FSA/Title IV 31% VA 90% Military/TA 6% Cash & Other 8% 3
Greatest Asset is Academic Quality Implementing Lumina Foundations Degree Qualifications Profiles (DQP) APUS to participate in John Gardners Foundations of Excellence program http://www.fyfoundations.org/ Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation awarded WCET grant to continue work on Predictive Analytics Reporting (PAR) Framework. APUS participated in Service members Opportunity Colleges (SOC) working group to study and improve the academic success of service members and Veterans. http://www.soc.aascu.org/pubfiles/socmisc/SOC_Ed_Attainment_2012-07.pdf Continuing to lay groundwork for quality and innovation Professional development in COI for faculty Approximately 100 classes as research pilot to improve online learning Participating in NSSE pilot program APUS Library earns recognition from IMS Global Learning Consortium www.imsglobal.org 4
Initiatives Support Student Experience, Efficiencies, and New Markets ePress Initiative to Combat Textbook Inflation Investing to Optimize Title IV Processing Technology Fee to Support Administrative Services Expanding Domestic Growth Market segments where affordability resonates Underserved markets, U.S. Latino communities Hospitality and Tourism, Healthcare, and Nursing Expanding Relationships Corporations Non-Profit Organizations Community Colleges International Opportunities Affordable, online degrees programs from an accredited U.S. University International Partnerships US Domestic Academic Quality Tech Fee Title IV Automation Enter New Markets ePress 5
Second Quarter 2012 Financial Results Revenues increased 23% to $74.6 million Income from operations before interest income and income taxes increased to $15.0 million Net income increased $9.2 million or approximately $0.51 per diluted share Cash and Cash Equivalents of $116.7 million or $6.41 per diluted share No long-term debt Purchased 153,426 shares during the second quarter 2012 As of June 30, 2012, approximately $15.5 million may yet be purchased 6
Third Quarter 2012 Outlook The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. Approximate Growth (y/y) Net course registration growth by new students approximately flat Net course registration growth 16%-18% Revenue growth 16%-19% Earnings per diluted share $0.46 to $0.51 Additional Considerations Some individuals and groups attempt to abuse the Title IV system and the Company believes net course registrations in the prior year period would have been lower absent this factor. 7
Initiatives Support Student Experience, Efficiencies, and New Markets ePress Initiative to Combat Textbook Inflation Investing to Optimize Title IV Processing Technology Fee to Support Administrative Services Expanding Domestic Growth Market segments where affordability resonates Underserved markets, U.S. Latino communities Hospitality and Tourism, Healthcare, and Nursing Expanding Relationships Corporations Non-Profit Organizations Community Colleges International Opportunities Affordable, online degrees programs from an accredited U.S. University International Partnerships US Domestic Academic Quality Tech Fee Title IV Automation Enter New Markets ePress 8
S E C O N D Q U A R T E R 2 0 1 2 C O N F E R E N C E C A L L A u g u s t 8 , 2 0 1 2

Exhibit 99.3
FACT SHEET: June 2012 TICKER: APEI EXCHANGE: NASDAQ IPO DATE/PRICE: Nov 11, 2007 @ $20 American Public Education, Inc. is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. American Public University System (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, operates through American Military University (AMU) and American Public University (APU). APUS mission is to provide quality higher education with emphasis on educating the nations military and public service communities by offering respected, relevant, accessible and affordable, student-focused online programs, which prepare them for service and leadership in a diverse, global society. American Public University System is accredited by The Higher Learning Commission and is a member of the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools (NCA), www.ncahlc.org. APUS REGISTRATIONS For the three months ended June 30, 2012 2011 % Change Net Course Registrations from New Students 19,600 18,900 4% Net Course Registrations 92,900 78,400 18% APUS REGISTRATIONS BY PRIMARY FUNDING SOURCE For the six months ended June 30, 2012 % of Total Federal Student Aid (Title IV) 34% Department of Defense Tuition Assistance (TA) 39% Veterans Benefits (VA) 13% Cash & Other Sources 14% 50%+ OF APUS UNDERGRADUATE ALUMNI RETURN FOR SECOND DEGREE 40%+ OF APUS STUDENTS REFERRED BY OTHERS FINANCIAL METRICS (in millions, except per share data) Three Months Ended 6/30/2012 Y/Y Growth Revenues $74.6 23% Net Income $ 9.2 2% Diluted EPS (per diluted share) $0.51 Balance Sheet, as of 6/30/2012 12/31/2011 Cash & Equiv. $ 116.7 $ 119.0 Total Assets $211.0 $198.9 Total Corp. Debt $ 0 $ 0 Full Year Ended 12/31/2011 Y/Y Growth Revenues $260.4 31% Net Income $ 40.8 36% Diluted EPS (per diluted share) $ 2.23 UNIVERSITY PROFILE As of December 31, 2011 Enrollment by degree level Associates Bachelors Masters 20% 21% 59% Enrollment by status Military Civilian 58% 42% Enrollment by school 21%Arts & Humanities 20%Security & Global Studies 19%Public Service & Health 14%Management 12%Business 10%Science & Technology 4%Education 4% 10% 21% 12% 20% 14% 19% AFFORDABLE TUITION Undergraduate Tuition: $250/credit hour Graduate Tuition: $325/credit hour Avg. Age: 32 years Avg. Undergraduate Class Size: 16 students Gender Ratio: 67 male/33 female Avg. Courses Per Year: 3 Military/4 Civilian Faculty: 450 Full-Time/1,400 Adjunct Staff: 800 Full-Time/20 Part-Time AMU & APU GRADUATES 24,000+ Alumni 6,300 4,800 3,400 2,100 1,700 1,100 900 600 300 100 02 03 04 05 06 07 08 09 10 11 *Represents returning undergraduate students from 2009 conferrals. NOTE: Past performance is not indicative of future results. Additional information, including important details about risk factors, can be found in the companys filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, www.sec.gov. Contact Chris Symanoskie 703-334-3880 or csymanoskie@apus.edu.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20121108080035.txt.gz
TIME:20121108080035
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
(Date of earliest event reported)
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
November 8, 2012
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On November 8, 2012, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2012.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 9:00 a.m. Eastern time on November 8, 2012 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.  In addition, American Public Education provides an investor fact sheet on its investor relations website, www.americanpubliceducation.com.  A copy of the investor fact sheet is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.3 and is incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports Third Quarter 2012 Results
CHARLES TOWN, W. Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--November 8, 2012--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System (APUS), which operates through American Military University (AMU) and American Public University (APU)  announced financial results for the quarter ended September 30, 2012.
Recent Highlights:
Net course registrationsincreased to approximately 103,000 in the third quarter of 2012, a year-over-year increase of 17%.
Net course registrations by new students in the third quarter of 2012 increased to approximately 24,000, a slight increase over the same period of 2011.
Third quarter 2012 revenues increased 18% to $77.1 million, compared to $65.3 million in the third quarter of 2011.
Income from operations before interest income and income taxes in the third quarter of 2012 increased 17% to $17.5 million, compared to $15.0 million in the same period of 2011.
Net income for the third quarter of 2012 was $10.8 million, or $0.60 per diluted share, compared to $10.9 million, or $0.60 per diluted share, in the same period of 2011.
American Public University announced that it renewed its multi-year partnership agreement with Walmart Stores, Inc. to offer academic courses and degree programs to its associates through the Lifelong Learning Partnership.
American Public Education announced a focus on international students, including a new investment in, and relationship with, New Horizons Worldwide, Inc., a global independent I.T. training company.
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the third quarter of 2012 increased 18% to $77.1 million, compared to total revenues of $65.3 million in the third quarter of 2011. Income from operations before interest income and income taxes in the third quarter of 2012 increased 17% to $17.5 million, compared to $15.0 million in the same period of 2011. Stock-based compensation expense reduced operating income by $940,000 in the third quarter of 2012 and $812,000 in the third quarter of 2011.
Net income for the third quarter of 2012 was $10.8 million, or $0.60 per diluted share, which includes $0.03 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. This compares to net income of $10.9 million, or $0.60 per diluted share for the third quarter of 2011, including $0.03 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. The third quarter of 2011 included a tax benefit of approximately $1.8 million, or $0.10 per diluted share, resulting from state tax, and research and development tax credits recorded during the third quarter of 2011. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the third quarter of 2012 and 2011 were approximately 18.0 million and 18.3 million, respectively.
For the nine months ended September 30, 2012, total revenues were $227.5 million, an increase of 23% compared to total revenues of $184.7 million in the same period of 2011. Income from operations before interest income and income tax for the nine months ended September 30, 2012 increased to $47.4 million, compared to $43.0 million in the same period of 2011. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each period's operating income by $2.9 million and $2.4 million, respectively.
Net income for the nine months ended September 30, 2012 to $29.1 million, or $1.61 per diluted share, which includes $0.10 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. This compares to net income of $27.8 million, or $1.52 per diluted share, in the same period of 2011, including $0.08 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the nine months ended September 30, 2012 and 2011 were approximately 18.1 million and 18.3 million, respectively.
Total cash and cash equivalents as of September 30, 2012 were approximately $101.6 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the nine months ended September 30, 2012 was approximately $34.5 million, compared to $47.5 million in the same period of 2011. Capital expenditures were approximately $28.5 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2012, compared to $13.8 million in the prior year period. Depreciation and amortization was $8.1 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2012 and $6.7 million for the same period of 2011.
During the third quarter of 2012, APEI made a $6.75 million, or 19.9% minority investment, in NWHW Holdings, Inc., which was formed to acquire New Horizons Worldwide, Inc., a global, independent IT-training company. In connection with that investment, APEI also extended $6.0 million in credit to New Horizons Worldwide in exchange for a subordinated note.
Note: Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty. Net course registrations and net course registration growth rates include registrations for certain one-credit courses (non-lab courses) and other non-credit registrations in the current and prior year periods.
Fourth Quarter 2012 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason.
American Public Education anticipates fourth quarter 2012 net course registrations by new students to be between -7% and -3% year-over-year; net course registrations to increase between approximately 8% and 12% year-over-year; revenues to increase between approximately 9% and 13% over the prior year period; and net income to be between $0.64 and $0.67 per diluted share. In addition, the Company anticipates full-year 2012 net income to be between $2.25 and $2.28 per diluted share.
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys third quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast today at 9:00 a.m. Eastern time. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, operates through (AMU) and (APU). APUS serves more than 100,000 adult learners worldwide and offers 87 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts. Nationally recognized for its best practices in online higher education, APUS provides an affordable education through classes taught by experienced faculty who are committed to the academic achievement of their students.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
American Public University System is accredited by The Higher Learning Commission and is a member of the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools (). For more information about APUS graduation rates, median debt of students who completed programs, and other important information, visit .
www.ncahlc.org
www.apus.edu/disclosure
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, Inc., or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education, Inc. and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements regarding expected growth, expected revenues and expected earnings. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011, Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2012, and other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: American Public Education, Inc. Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304-724-3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Associate Vice President, Investor Relations 703-334-3880

Exhibit 99.2
T H I R D Q U A R T E R 2 0 1 2 C O N F E R E N C E C A L L N o v e m b e r 8 , 2 0 1 2 Mission-Driven APEI American Public Education, Inc.
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, Inc. or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements are sometimes identified by words such as anticipate, believe, could", estimate, expect , intend , may , should ,  will and would . These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on slide  Fourth Quarter 2012 Outlook , as well as statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the Risk Factors section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011 as filed with the SEC, quarterly report on Form 10-Q for the three months ended September 30, 2012, and in the Companys other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future. 2
Third Quarter 2012 Highlights:  Civilian students continue to drive diversification of overall student population.  AMUs leadership within the Military and Veteran communities continues to expand.  Several New Partnership Agreements:  National Football League Players Association (NFLPA)  APEI broadens focus on international students, including through a new relationship with New Horizons  a global, independent I.T. training company. Pay Type YTD 2012 Growth (y/y) FSA/Title IV 23% VA 91% Military/TA 8% Cash & Other 7% For nine months ending September 30, 2012 Net Course Registrations by Primary Funding Source Cash & Other 13% FSA/Title IV 35% Military/TA 39% VA 13% 3
Earning Recognition & Advancing The Learning Environment  APUS to launch new faculty scheduling software and Faculty Connect, an online social and professional network for APUS faculty.  APUS Bachelor of Science in Nursing was awarded accreditation by The Board of Commissioners of the Commission on Collegiate Nursing Education (CCNE).  The National University Technology Network honored the APUS Library with the annual Innovation in Distance Education Award.  APU renewed its multi-year agreement with Walmart Stores to offer courses and degree programs to their associates through the Lifelong Learning Partnership.  Walmart and APU recently mapped APUS management courses to competencies for professional development of Walmart managers. The courses are available for enrollment with tuition being provided directly by Walmart. 4
Building Corporate Relationships, Expanding Education Opportunities Worldwide  APEI intends to build relationships with New Horizons established network of business customers and work with a selection of their global franchise centers to expand outreach to students worldwide.  Over 260 locations in 41 states and 63 countries  Business customers include Fortune 500 companies, government agencies, small and mid-sized businesses, and associations serving the public service sector  Offering a wide variety of courses from Microsoft Office instruction to advanced Cisco and Microsoft Certifications  Award winning organization dedicated to lifelong learning 5  Creates new platform for international student referrals, potentially lowering marketing costs.  Corporate tuition benefit programs and international students should increase the percentage of tuition paid by cash.  International students enhance the learning experience through increased student diversity and international perspectives contributed in the classroom. Worlds largest independent IT training company
Vision for American Public Education: Respected and Affordable with Focus on Building Relationships  Honor AMUs Military Heritage and Public Service Focus  Utilize Successful Relationship-oriented Approaches in Civilian Communities  Corporate, Non-Profit, and Community College Relationships  Key Influencers - Professional associations, as well as online groups and alumni through interactive media  Expand International Relationships:  New Horizons Partnership  Local and National Governments  Universities and Non-profits  Provide Online Learning Service Model 6 Civilian Communities Corporate Partnerships Online Learning Services International Students Partnerships Civilian Communities Military Community 1991 2020 2012
Third Quarter 2012 Financial Highlights:  Revenues increased 18% to $77.1 million, compared to the third quarter of 2011.  Bad debt expense declined to 4.4% of revenue, compared to 5.1% of revenue in the second quarter of 2012, primarily as a result of lower FSA fraud and abuse.  Instructional costs and services declined to 34.2% of revenue, compared to the third quarter of 2011, as a result of efficiencies gained from ePress and improvements in student support services.  Income from operations before interest income and income taxes increased 17% to $17.5 million, compared to the third quarter of 2011.  Net income was $10.8 million or approximately $0.60 per diluted share.  Cash and Cash Equivalents of $101.6 million with no long-term debt.  Purchased 169,177 shares during the third quarter 2012. As of September 30, 2012, approximately $10.7 million may yet be purchased under current programs. 7
APEI Invests in Global Information Technology Training Company  As a member of an investor group, APEI made a $6.75 million or 19.9% minority investment in NWHW Holdings, Inc. to acquire New Horizons.  In connection with the minority investment in NWHW Holdings, APEI also extended $6.0 million in credit to New Horizons in exchange for a subordinated note. 8 U.S. Operations International Operations Relationship Building Investor Group
Fourth Quarter & Year End 2012 Outlook The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. Approximate Growth (y/y) Net course registration growth by new students -7% to -3% Net course registration growth 8% to 12% Revenue growth 9% to 13% Fourth Quarter Earnings per diluted share $0.64 to $0.67 Full-Year Earnings per diluted share $2.25 to $2.28 9 Additional Considerations  Some individuals and groups attempt to abuse the Title IV system and the Company believes net course registrations in the prior year period would have been lower absent this factor.
 ePress Initiative to Combat Textbook Inflation  Optimize Title IV Processing  Expanding Domestic Growth  Market segments where affordability resonates  Underserved markets  Hospitality and Tourism, Healthcare, and Nursing  Building Strong Relationships  Leading Corporations  Non-Profit Associations  Community Colleges  Developing International Opportunities  Online Learning Services for Higher Learning Academic Quality Tech Fee Title IV Automation Enter New Markets  International  Partnerships  US Domestic 10 ePress Current Initiatives Support Student Experience, Future Efficiencies, and New Market Entry
Mission-Driven APEI American Public Education, Inc. Third Quarter 2012 Conference Call November 8, 2012

Exhibit 99.3
American Public Education, Inc. is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. American Public University System (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, operates through American MilitaryUniversity (AMU) and American Public University (APU). APUS mission is to provide quality higher education with emphasis on educating the nations military and public service communities by offering respected, relevant, accessible and affordable, student-focused online programs, which prepare them for service and leadership in a diverse, global society. American Public University System is accredited by The Higher Learning Commission and is a member of the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools (NCA), www.ncahlc.org. APUS For the three months ended September 30, 2012 2011 % Change Net Course Registrations from New Students 24,000 23,900 0% Net Course Registrations 103,000 87,800 17% For the nine months ended September 30, 2012 2011 % Change Net Course Registrations from New Students 64,100 60,600 6% Net Course Registrations 296,900 247,900 20% APUS RegiStRAtionS by PRimARy FUnding SoURce For the nine months ended September 30, 2012 % of Total Federal Student Aid (Title IV) 35% Department of Defense Tuition Assistance (TA) 39% Veterans Benefits (VA) 13% Cash & Other Sources 13% FinAnciAl metRicS (in millions, except per share data) Three Months Ended 9/30/2012 9/30/2011 Revenues $77.1 $65.3 Net Income $10.8 $10.9 Diluted EPS (per diluted share) $0.60 $0.60 Balance Sheet, as of 9/30/2012 12/31/2011 Cash & Equiv. $ 101.6 $ 119.0 Total Assets $229.1 $198.9 Total Corp. Debt $ 0 $ 0 Full Year Ended 12/31/2011 Y/Y Growth Revenues $260.4 31% Net Income $ 40.8 36% Diluted EPS (per diluted share) $ 2.23 AFFoRdAble tUition Undergraduate Tuition: $250/credit hour Graduate Tuition: $325/credit hour Avg. Age: 32 years Avg. Class Size: 16 students Gender Ratio: 67 male/33 female Avg. Courses Per Year: 3 Military/4 CivilianFaculty: 440 Full-Time/1,470 Adjunct Staff: 925 Full-Time/18 Part-Time AmU & APU gRAdUAteS 24,000+ Alumni 6,300 02 03 04 05 06 07 08 09 10 11 100 900 600 300 4,800 3,400 2,100 1,700 1,100 UniveRSity ProFile As of December 31, 2011 Enrollment by degree level  Associates  Bachelors  Masters 21% 20% 59% Enrollment by school  21%Arts & Humanities  20%Security & Global Studies  19%Public Service & Health  14%Management  12%Business  10%Science & Technology  4%Education 19% 21% 20% 14% 12% 10% 4% Enrollment by status  Military  Civilian 42% 58% TICKER: APEI EXCHANGE: NASDAQ IPO DATE/PRICE: Nov 11, 2007 @ $20 *Represents returning undergraduate students from 2009 conferrals. NOTE: Past performance is not indicative of future results. Additional information, including important details about risk factors, can be found in the companys filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, www.sec.gov. FACT SHEET: September 2012 Contact Chris Symanoskie 703-334-3880 or csymanoskie@apus.edu. oF APUS UndeRgRAdUAte AlUmni RetURn FoR Second degRee* 50%+ oF APUS StUdentS ReFeRRed by otheRS 40%+


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20130228160219.txt.gz
TIME:20130228160219
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
(Date of earliest event reported)
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
February 28, 2013
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 28, 2013, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2013.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 5:00 p.m. Eastern time on February 28, 2013 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.  A copy of the investor fact sheet is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.3 and is incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports Fourth Quarter and Full-Year 2012 Results
CHARLES TOWN, W.Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--February 28, 2013--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System (APUS), which operates through American Military University (AMU) and American Public University (APU)  announced financial results for the quarter and year ended December 31, 2012.
Recent Highlights:
Net course registrationsincreased to approximately 105,300 in the fourth quarter of 2012, a year-over-year increase of 10%.
Net course registrations by new students in the fourth quarter of 2012 were approximately 22,600, a decrease of approximately 8% over the same period of 2011.
Fourth quarter 2012 revenues increased 14% to $86.0 million, compared to $75.7 million in the fourth quarter of 2011.
Income from operations before interest income and income taxes in the fourth quarter of 2012 increased 8% to $21.4 million, compared to $19.8 million in the same period of 2011.
Net income for the fourth quarter of 2012 was $13.2 million, or $0.74 per diluted share, compared to $13.0 million, or $0.71 per diluted share, in the same period of 2011.
American Public University System received approval from The Higher Learning Commission to offer a Bachelor of Science in Electrical Engineering.
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the fourth quarter of 2012 increased 14% to $86.0 million, compared to total revenues of $75.7 million in the fourth quarter of 2011. Income from operations before interest income and income taxes in the fourth quarter of 2012 increased 8% to $21.4 million, compared to $19.8 million in the same period of 2011. Stock-based compensation expense reduced operating income by $947,000 in the fourth quarter of 2012, and $769,000 in the fourth quarter of 2011.
Net income for the fourth quarter of 2012 was $13.2 million, or $0.74 per diluted share, which includes $0.03 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. This compares to net income of $13.0 million, or $0.71 per diluted share for the fourth quarter of 2011, including $0.03 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the fourth quarter of 2012 and 2011 were approximately 17.8 million and 18.2 million, respectively.
For the twelve months ended December 31, 2012, total revenues were $313.5 million, an increase of 20% compared to total revenues of $260.4 million in the same period of 2011. Income from operations before interest income and income tax for the twelve months ended December 31, 2012 increased to $68.8 million, compared to $62.9 million in the same period of 2011. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each period's operating income by $3.8 million and $3.2 million, respectively.
Net income for the twelve months ended December 31, 2012 increased to $42.3 million, or $2.35 per diluted share, which includes $0.13 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. This compares to net income of $40.8 million, or $2.23 per diluted share in the same period of 2011, including $0.11 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. Net income for the full year 2011 included a tax benefit of approximately $1.8 million, or $0.10 per diluted share, resulting from state tax, and research and development tax credits recorded during the third quarter of 2011. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the twelve months ended December 31, 2012 and 2011 were approximately 18.0 million and 18.3 million, respectively.
Total cash and cash equivalents as of December 31, 2012 were approximately $114.9 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the twelve months ended December 31, 2012 was approximately $52.9 million, compared to $70.4 million in the same period of 2011. Capital expenditures were approximately $35.0 million for the twelve months ended December 31, 2012, compared to $24.9 million in the prior year period. Depreciation and amortization was $11.1 million for the twelve months ended December 31, 2012 and $9.2 million for the same period of 2011.
Note: Net course registrations represent the aggregate number of classes in which students remain enrolled after the date by which they may drop the course without financial penalty. Net course registrations and net course registration growth rates include registrations for certain one-credit courses (non-lab courses) and other non-credit registrations in the current and prior year periods.
First Quarter 2013 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason.
American Public Education anticipates first quarter 2013 net course registrations by new students to decline between -7% and -5% year-over-year; net course registrations to increase between approximately 7% and 10% year-over-year; revenues to increase between approximately 9% and 13% over the prior year period; and net income to be between $0.55 and $0.58 per diluted share.
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys fourth quarter and full-year earnings conference call will be broadcast today at 5:00 p.m. Eastern time. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, operates through (AMU) and (APU). APUS serves approximately 127,000 adult learners worldwide and offers 87 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts. Nationally recognized for its best practices in online higher education, APUS provides an affordable education through classes taught by experienced faculty who are committed to the academic achievement of their students.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
American Public University System is accredited by The Higher Learning Commission and is a member of the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools (). For more information about APUS graduation rates, median debt of students who completed programs, and other important information, visit .
www.ncahlc.org
www.apus.edu/disclosure
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, Inc., or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education, Inc. and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements regarding expected growth, expected revenues and expected earnings. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012 and other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: American Public Education, Inc. Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 304-724-3722 or Christopher L. Symanoskie Vice President, Investor Relations 703-334-3880

Exhibit 99.2
FOURTH QUARTER 2012 CONFERENCE CALL February 28, 2013
2 SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, Inc. or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements are sometimes identified by words such as anticipate, believe, could", estimate, expect, intend, may, should, will and would. These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on slide First Quarter 2013 Outlook, as well as statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the Risk Factors section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012 as filed with the SEC and in the Companys other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
3 Fourth Quarter 2012 Highlights: AMUs leadership within the Military and Veteran communities continues. New Public-Service Partnerships: Several State Police Chief Organizations Canadian Association of Fire Chiefs International Association of Health and Hospital Safety Professionals Society of Industrial Security Professionals Initiated a new outreach campaign for APUSs RN to B.S. in Nursing degree, which recently received CCNE accreditation. APUS received approval from The Higher Learning Commission to offer a Bachelor of Science in Electrical Engineering. For twelve months ending December 31, 2012 Net Course Registrations by Primary Funding Source Cash & Other 13% FSA/Title IV 36% Military/TA 38% VA 13%
4 Year 2012 Accomplishments Expanding Existing Strengths Several Major Awards & Rankings#22 Online School - U.S. News & World Reports#1 Most Popular School  Military Times Magazine Completed DoDs Third Party Assessment New & Expanded Relationships Walmart (for U.S. Associates) & New Horizons SAIC, NFL Players Association, and Community Colleges, among many.Invested in Operational Improvements Fraud and Abuse Preventione Press and FSA Automation Opened Energy-Efficient Facility  54% CAGR
5 Building Reputational Capital Through Academic Quality  Advancing Education Technology  through continued investments in classroom software, simulations, rich media, and a mobile learning environment. Expanding ePress  to combat the rising cost of textbooks and offer students more options, APUS selected ED MAP and VitalSource as course material providers. Focus on Teaching Excellence - established new standards to enhance student/teacher interaction, and expanded the number of faculty directors to provide greater oversight and guidance to faculty. Broaden Instructional Design  completed a comprehensive course evaluation paving the way for greater course consistency and new programs. Classroom Pilot Programs - resulted in improved course quality, new instructional designs, more effective practices, and a renewed interest in cohort-based learning.
6 Long-Term Focus on FundamentalsCreates Tremendous Social and Economic Value Award Winning Academic Quality Recognized for Best Practices in Online Learning Industry Leading Affordability Diverse Array of Academic Programs Innovative Campus (PAD) & Classroom Technology  Relationship Oriented Approach to Awareness Growing List of Relationships Corporations, Associations, Community Colleges, Universities and Government AgenciesExceptional Academic and Operational LeadershipStrong Balance Sheet and Free Cashflow  Academic Assets Reputational Capital Financial Assets Technology Assets Human Capital Intellectual Property APEIs Value Portfolio
7 American Public Education, Inc.A Passion for Higher Learning and Affordable Access, with a Strong Spirit of Innovation.
8 Fourth Quarter 2012 Financial Highlights: Revenues increased 14% to $86.0 million, compared to the fourth quarter of 2011.Income from operations before interest income and income taxes increased 8% to $21.4 million, compared to the fourth quarter of 2011.As a percent of revenue, general and administrative expenses declined to 17.9% of revenue, compared to 19.5% of revenue in the fourth quarter of 2011.Bad debt expense declined to 3.5% of revenue, compared to 4.3% of revenue in the fourth quarter of 2011.Net income was $13.2 million or approximately $0.74 per diluted share.Cash and cash equivalents of $114.9 million with no long-term debt. During the fourth quarter 2012, 83,855 shares were repurchased.
9 Full-Year 2012 Financial Highlights: Revenues increased 20% to $313.5 million, compared to the same period of 2011. Income from operations before interest income and income taxes increased approximately 10% to $68.8 million, compared to same period of 2011. Net income was $42.3 million or approximately $2.35 per diluted share. For the twelve months ending December 31, 2012, total cash from operations was approximately $52.9 million. Capital expenditures for the year 2012 was approximately $35.0 Million. For the full-year 2012, a total of 493,491 shares were repurchased.
10 First Quarter 2013 Outlook: The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. Approximate Growth (y/y) Net course registration growth by new students -7% to -5% Net course registration growth 7% to 10% Revenue growth 9% to 13% First Quarter Earnings per diluted share $0.55 to $0.58 10 Considerations for Full-Year 2013: APEI currently expects revenue growth, margin expansion,  and share repurchases to drive higher earnings per diluted share. Capital expenditures are currently expected to be lower than the prior year, as a result of reduced capital spending on administrative facilities.
11 Expand Presence in Military & Civilian CommunitiesIncreasing focus on relationships and referrals Programmatic focus on high-demand fields  Build New Relationships & Diversify Revenue Sources Corporations, associations, community colleges, and government agenciesExpand international and corporate training opportunitiesFurther develop school as a service offerings Develop Operational Efficiencies & Innovative Technologies Expand ePress Initiative to combat textbook inflation Optimize financial aid processing Advance academic and distance learning innovations Business & Operational Goals for 2013 Leveraging Unique Strengths and Expanding Opportunities International Outreach Corporate, Agencies &  Professional Associations Education Hosting Universities &Community Colleges Educational Vendors (ex: New Horizons) Support Services Non-Degree Credentialing  New Markets & Segments (ex: Corporate Training) APEI
FOURTH QUARTER 2012 CONFERENCE CALL February 28, 2013

Exhibit 99.3
American Public Education, Inc. is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. American Public University System (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, operates through American Military University (AMU) and American Public University (APU). APUS mission is to provide quality higher education with emphasis on educating the nations military and public service communities by offering respected, relevant, accessible and affordable, student-focused online programs, which prepare them for service and leadership in a diverse, global society. American Public University System is accredited by The Higher Learning Commission and is a member of the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools (NCA), www.ncahlc.org. APUS REGISTRATIONS For the three months ended December 31, 2012 2011 % Change Net Course Registrations by New Students 22,600 24,600 -8%  Net Course Registrations 105,300 95,800 10% For the twelve months ended December 31, 2012 2011 % Change Net Course Registrations by New Students 86,700 85,200 2% Net Course Registrations 402,200 343,700 17% APUS REGISTRATIONS BY PRIMARY FUNDING SOURCE For the twelve months ended December 31, 2012 % of Total Federal Student Aid (Title IV) 36%  Department of Defense Tuition Assistance (TA) 38% Veterans Benefits (VA) 13% Cash & Other Sources 13% FINANCIAL METRICS (in millions, except per share data) Three Months Ended 12/31/2012 12/31/2011 Revenues $86.0 $75.7 Net Income $13.2 $13.0 Diluted EPS (per diluted share) $ 0.74 $0.71 Balance Sheet, as of 12/31/2012 12/31/2011 Cash & Equiv. $ 114.9 $ 119.0 Total Assets $236.6 $198.9 Total Corp. Debt $ 0 $ 0Full Year Ended 12/31/2012 12/31/2011 Revenues $313.5 $260.4 Net Income $ 42.3 $ 40.8 Diluted EPS $ 2.35 $ 2.23 AFFORDABLE TUITION Undergraduate Tuition: $250/credit hour Graduate Tuition: $325/credit hour Avg. Age: 32 years Avg. Undergraduate Class Size: 16 students Gender Ratio: 66 male/34 female Avg. Courses Per Year: 3 Military/4 CivilianFaculty: 430 Full-Time/1,570 AdjunctStaff: 930 Full-Time/20 Part-Time AMU & APU GRADUATES 27,000+ Alumni 7,600 02 03 04 05 06 07 08 09 10 11 12 100 800 600 300 6,100 4,600 2,000 3,300 1,600 1,100 UNIVERSITY PROFILE As of December 31, 2012 Enrollment by degree level Associates  Bachelors  MastersEnrollment by school 21%Arts & Humanities  21%Public Service & Health  17%Security & Global Studies  14%Management  12%Business  11%Science & Technology  4%Education Enrollment by status Military  Civilian 43%57% TICKER: APEI EXCHANGE: NASDAQ IPO DATE/PRICE: Nov 11, 2007 @ $20*Represents returning undergraduate students from 2010 conferrals. NOTE: Past performance is not indicative of future results. Additional information, including important details about risk factors, can be found in the companys filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, www.sec.gov.FACT SHEET: December 2012 Contact Chris Symanoskie 703-334-3880 or csymanoskie@apus.edu. OF APUS UNDERGRADUATE ALUMNI RETURN FOR SECOND DEGREE*50%+ OF APUS STUDENTS REFERRED BY OTHERS 40%+ 23% 18% 59% 17% 21% 21% 14% 12% 11% 4%


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20130311070029.txt.gz
TIME:20130311070029
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
o
 Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
o
 
 
 
 
Section 7  Regulation FD Disclosure
Item 7.01     Regulation FD Disclosure
Investor Presentations
American Public Education, Inc. is expected to present at the 15 Annual Credit Suisse Global Services Conference at 1:30 p.m. Mountain time on March 11, 2013.  Slides used for that and other investor presentations are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and are incorporated in this report by reference.
th
Comments of American Public Education on Recent Military Tuition Assistance Developments
American Public Education, Inc. today commented on the recent disclosures by the U.S. Army and U.S. Marine Corps indicating changes to U.S. Department of Defense (DoD) voluntary education Tuition Assistance (TA) programs.
The Company understands that the U.S. Army and U.S. Marine Corps are suspending new TA enrollments until the current fiscal situation matures.''   The company believes Marines and Soldiers will be allowed to complete current course enrollments using TA, but will not be allowed to submit new requests for TA.
However, the Department of Defense (DoD) Comptroller recently issued guidance indicating that the services should consider significant reductions in funding new TA applicants, effective immediately and for the duration of the current fiscal situation.  The Company believes that other branches are considering changes to tuition assistance.
American Public Education is unable to estimate the potential impact of a suspension or reduction of the tuition assistance benefit, how long the suspensions will remain in place, whether they will become permanent, or whether other services will take similar actions.  The company believes that most service members have access to alternatives when considering how to finance their tuition, including through Veteran GI Bill Education programs, or through Federal Student Aid programs.  However, the Company does not know whether service members will find these alternatives attractive. And, the Company does not know whether the current fiscal situation will impact the availability or timeliness of access to these alternative sources of funding, such as due to delays at the Department of Veterans Affairs in the event of an increase in participation or because of potential staffing cuts.
The following table sets forth the approximate percentage of the Companys full year 2012 revenues from tuition assistance programs by branch of service:
 
 
As an institution of higher learning committed to serving the military community, American Public University System stands ready to help its service members understand these changes and obtain the affordable education that they have so rightly earned through their hard work and service to our country.
American Public Education Announces Increase to Share Repurchase Programs
American Public Education, Inc. today announced that its Board of Directors increased the authorization under its existing share repurchase program by $15 million worth of shares of the Company's common stock. This amount is in addition to the existing authorization, which as of December 31, 2012, permitted the repurchase of up to $8.0 million dollars of shares.
Subject to market conditions, applicable legal requirements and other factors, the repurchases may be made in open market transactions or privately negotiated transactions.
The authorization does not obligate the Company to acquire any shares, and purchases may be commenced or suspended at any time based on market conditions and other factors that the Company deems appropriate.
program to repurchase an amount of shares equivalent to those issued under equity compensation programs during 2013.
This repurchase program is in addition to the previously existing
The total number of shares of American Public Education common stock outstanding as of February 25, 2013, was 17,802,678.
 
 
 
 
 
Forward Looking Statements
 
Statements made in this report regarding American Public Education, Inc., or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education, Inc. and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements regarding TA programs, the availability of alternative sources of funding and activity under share repurchase programs. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012 and other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
 
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
March 11, 2013 15th Annual Credit Suisse Global Services Conference Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and CFO
 
 
 
 
Safe Harbor Statement Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, Inc. or its subsidiaries that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements subsidiaries, based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements are sometimes identified by words such as anticipate, believe, could, estimate, expect, intend, may, should, will and would. These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on the following slides, as well as statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the Risk Factors section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Factors Company s Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012, as filed with the SEC, and in the Companys other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future. LEARN. ADVANCE. LEAD. 1
 
 
 
 
Investment Highlights Distinguishable, Value-driving Strengths Premier market leader with strong academic reputation Effective, low-cost platform for online delivery Significant expansion opportunities: Corporate, educational institutions, partner relationships International opportunities New degree fields and market segments Diversification to drive future growth and mitigate risks Strong balance sheet and free cash flow LEARN. ADVANCE. LEAD. 2
 
 
 
 
Differentiated Growth Platform Positioned for Domestic and International Expansion Poised for Expansion via Select Niche and Highgrowth Opportunities Assetrich platform Agile innovator Significant FCF generation Strong balance sheet American Public University System #2 Largest Fully Online University Eduventures #22 Ranked Online University U.S. News & World Report LEARN. ADVANCE. LEAD. 3
 
 
 
 
Pioneering Leader in Education Affordable Higher Education for Students Worldwide Industry leader; uniquely positioned for challenging economy Positioned to address select high-growth opportunities 100,000+ students LEARN. ADVANCE. LEAD. 4
 
 
 
 
APEIs Unique DNA A Solid Framework for Success Access and Affordability Affordable Tuition and Course Materials in Flexible Formats Diverse Programs Highdemand Programs and Unique Programs, Including Liberal Arts Unyielding Dedication to Academic Quality Recognized for Best Practices, Teaching Excellence and Student Outcomes RelationshipMarketing Relationships Create Awareness; Consultative Approach to Enrollment Innovation and Optimal Performance Automation and Creative Processes Drive Greater Efficiency and Effectiveness Strong Balance Sheet and Free Cash Flow Positioned to Address International and Other Select Growth Opportunities LEARN. ADVANCE. LEAD. 5
 
 
 
 
Total Cost a Key Differentiator Social Mission of Affordability Average Public Four-year In-state Published Tuition Increased 8.3% Between 2010-11 and 2011-12 Undergraduate Cost Tuition, Books and Fees Graduate Cost Tuition, Books and Fees APUS 19% Below In-state Cost APUS 33% Below In-state Cost Based on lowest published tuition rate; other programs and average tuition may be higher. Excludes military scholarship supplements that cover certain tuition costs of military students. Source: The College Board 2012 Trends in College Pricing, NCES Digest of Educational Statistics and Company Estimates. LEARN. ADVANCE. LEAD. 6
 
 
 
 
Expanding Program Diversity Broadens the Learning Experience Unique Programs 87 Degree Programs: Homeland Security, Space Studies, Emergency & Disaster Management, Liberal Arts Classes: Middle East Culture, Explosive Ordinance Disposal, Asymmetric Warfare Unique Faculty Experts in their field: Including, Dr. James Reilly (Astronaut); Dr. Gwen Hall (recognized national security expert); CEOs & Presidents Faculty: 430 full-time and 1,570 part-time faculty Unique Experience Small class sizes: average class 16 students; limit class sizes to 25 students Flexible: 8 and 16 week courses with monthly starts Engaging: simulations, rich media, mobile access Students by Degree Level: Students by School: LEARN. ADVANCE. LEAD. 7
 
 
 
 
Rigorous Measurement and Analysis Drives Continuous Improvement Tools for data-driven decision-making PAD System, data warehouse, dashboards, fact books Semantic mapping, text analyses, predictive modeling Nationally benchmarked surveys/exams Engage various audiences CURCOM (Curriculum Committee) Industry advisory councils Sloan-C and other organizations Accrediting bodies/regulators Analyze and share outcomes WCET/Gates Foundation Sakai open source community Research and pilot programs Cohort-based learning Predictive analytics Adaptive learning MOOCS LEARN. ADVANCE. LEAD. 8
 
 
 
 
Focus on Teaching Excellence Enhances Collaboration and Engagement Scholarly Research 430+ books/articles submitted or published in 2012 180+ awards for professional practice 1,150+ conferences, workshops and panels Support academic and professional communities Faculty Development Faculty hired through rigorous selection criteria Training and development; mentor/coach programs Faculty evaluation through surveys, audits and data Community of Inquiry (COI) culture World-leading eLibrary System Over 120,000 books/e-books Multi-year runs of more than 35,000 scholarly journals Innovative search and personalized tutorial services 24/7 support by a leading corps of online librarians LEARN. ADVANCE. LEAD. 9
 
 
 
 
Strong Student Outcomes Drives Growing Recognition 20072012 ETS Proficiency Profile Bachelors Level Students, Cumulative Mean* Specialty accreditations, for example National Council on Family Relations (NCFR) Foundation For Higher Education Accreditation (FFHEA) Accreditation Council for Business Schools and Programs American Sport Education Program (ASEP) Society of Human Resource Management (SHRM) Council of Education for Public Health (CEPH) Commission on Collegiate Nursing Education (CCNE) Awards and recognition, for example Sloan Consortium Ralph E. Gomory Award Sloan Consortium Effective Practice Award Council of College & Military Educators, Institution Award National University Technology Network, Innovation in Distance Education Award Instructional Management Systems Global Learning Consortium, Global Award for Innovation *The national mean is derived from ETS data and includes all institution types across all grades that administer the ETS PP test. Dates included are July 2007 through June 2012. For more information about national mean data: http://www.ets.org/s/proficiencyprofile/pdf/CredA_CarnA_AllTabs.pdf. *APUS cumulative mean includes data from July 2007 through June 2012. LEARN. ADVANCE. LEAD. 10
 
 
 
 
A Positive Student Experience Reflected in Survey Results Alumni Surveyed 96% agreed/strongly agreed that we met their expectations2 94% would recommend us to family, friends or coworkers2 86% report theyre currently employed fulltime3 68% agree their degree helped them obtain a promotion/job3 APUS Graduates: 27,000+ Alumni Employers of APUS Alumni Surveyed 99% would hire another graduate from APUS4 98% would recommend the university to employees4 97% agree APUS grads possess fieldspecific academic skills4 Graduating Seniors Surveyed 96% evaluated their experience as positive1 95% say they would choose APUS again1 Source: (1) National Survey of Student Engagement (NSSE), June 2012. (2) American Public University System, 1year Postgraduation Survey, January  December 2012.. (3) American Public University System, 2year Postgraduation Survey, June 2012. (4) American Public University System Alumni Employer Survey January December 2012 LEARN. ADVANCE. LEAD. 11
 
 
 
 
 
Student Satisfaction a Priority: More than 50% of Alumni Return for a Second Degree* AMUs Homeland Security curriculum challenged and taught me a lot. Getting a formal degree helped me give greater structure to what I do now and confers a level of respect. David Pectol M.S. in Emergency & Disaster Management, Student B.S. in Homeland Security, 2012 Graduate *Represents returning undergraduate students from 2010 conferrals. LEARN. ADVANCE. LEAD. 12
 
 
 
 
Successful Alumni Create Awareness: Over 40% of New Students Referred by Others I researched many different schools  both online and traditional brick-and-mortar. The reviews that I saw about AMU were so good, they helped me make the decision to attend. Karisa Grundy B.S., Environmental Science, 2011 Green-Life Consultant LEARN. ADVANCE. LEAD. 13
 
 
 
 
Benefits of Quality Growth Improved Results and Enhanced Value Relationships and referrals lead to greater effectiveness, affordable tuition and enhances institutional value APEIs NonTraditional Marketing Relationship Model Focus on key influencers Field representatives develop relationships Encouraging and supporting referrals Faculty engagement and industry involvement Consultative approach to student enrollment Precise Targeting Focus on motivated and engaged students Meticulous approach to ad placement Use of social media, viral marketing Low reliance on traditional marketing Valueenhancing Outcomes Creates Higher Lifetime Value Lowers student acquisition costs Improves persistence/graduation rates Supports Operational Efficiency Improves utilization of resources Lowers bad-debt expense Increases overall referral rates Enhances Institutional Value Improves student experience and satisfaction Strenthens overall regulatory position Supports affordable tuition Increases engagement of key stakeholders LEARN. ADVANCE. LEAD. 14
 
 
 
 
Relationships Key to Quality Growth Agencies Corporations, Associations and Agencies Walmart Largest private U.S. employer and retail company (U.S. associates only) New Horizons Computer Learning Centers Worlds largest independent IT training company 250+ community colleges and several universities LEARN. ADVANCE. LEAD. 15
 
 
 
 
Innovative Leadership Business, Academic & Operational Experience Dr. Wallace E. Boston President and Chief Executive Officer Dr. Karan Powell Executive Vice President and Provost Harry T. Wilkins, CPA Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer Pete W. Gibbons Senior Vice President and Chief Administrative Officer Dr. Sharon van Wyk Executive Vice President and Chief Operations Officer Dr. Gwen Hall Senior Vice President and Academic Operations Officer Carol S. Gilbert Executive Vice President, Programs and Marketing Rick W. Sunderland, Jr., CPA Senior Vice President, Finance LEARN. ADVANCE. LEAD. 16
 
 
 
 
Financial Performance Driven to Enhance Shareholder Value Net Course Registrations (In thousands) Revenue (In millions)  Operating Income* (In millions) *Operating Income: Income from operations before interest income and income taxes. LEARN. ADVANCE. LEAD. 17
 
 
 
 
Attractive Opportunities In Challenging Global Economy Continued Demand for Online Ed Online enrollment growth in the U.S. is expected to continue to grow between 2%7% annually over the next five years. U.S. Employment and Skills Gap Shortage of 7 million skilled workers in 2010, a shortage that is expected to climb to 21 million by 2020. International Opportunities 4.1 million international students in 2010, a 10.8% increase y/y. International enrollment in the U.S. increased 6% in 2011/12. Select Programs in High Demand Registered Nursing is a top occupation through 2020. Other highgrowth fields include Health Care, Wellness, Computer Security, Transportation Logistics, Engineering Education Hosting Support Services 69% of academic leaders say online learning is critical to their institutions longterm strategy. Source: Eduventures, U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics, Sloan Consortium, OECD, American Association of Nursing, Georgetown Public Policy Institute and APEI Estimates. LEARN. ADVANCE. LEAD. 18
 
 
 
 
Business & Operational Goals for 2013 Leveraging Unique Strengths and Expanding Opportunities Expand Presence in Military and Civilian Communities Increasing focus on relationships and referrals Programmatic focus on high-demand fields Build New Relationships and Diversify Revenue Sources Corporations, associations, community colleges and government agencies Expand international and corporate training opportunities Further develop school as a service offerings Develop Operational Efficiencies and Innovative Technologies Expand ePress Initiative to combat textbook inflation Optimize financial aid processing Advance academic and distance learning innovations LEARN. ADVANCE. LEAD. 19
 
 
 
 
For Additional Information: Chris Symanoskie Vice President, Investor Relations 410-215-1405 csymanoskie@apus.edu www.AmericanPublicEducation.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20130402160148.txt.gz
TIME:20130402160148
EVENTS:	Shareholder Nominations Pursuant to Exchange Act Rule 14a-11
TEXT:
ITEM: Shareholder Nominations Pursuant to Exchange Act Rule 14a-11
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported):
April 2, 2013
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Item 5.08  Shareholder Director Nominations
American Public Education, Inc. (the Company) has established June 14, 2013 at 7:30 a.m. local time as the date and time for its annual meeting of stockholders (the Annual Meeting) to be held at the Gaylord National Resort and Convention Center, 201 Waterfront Street, National Harbor, Maryland 20745. The Board of Directors established the close of business on April 22, 2013 as the record date.
Because the Annual Meeting will be held more than 30 days from the calendar date of the Companys 2012 annual meeting of stockholders, the deadline for stockholder nominations or proposals for consideration at the Annual Meeting listed in the Companys 2013 Proxy Statement on Schedule 14A, as filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 26, 2012, no longer applies. If a stockholder intends to nominate a person for election to the Board or to propose other business for consideration at the Annual Meeting, the Company must receive notice of such nomination or proposal by the close of business on April 15, 2013.  Such notice must be provided in writing to the Corporate Secretary at American Public Education, Inc., 111 W. Congress Street, Charles Town, West Virginia 25414, Attn: Corporate Secretary, and must include the information required by our Bylaws with respect to each matter the stockholder proposes to bring before the Annual Meeting. Any notice provided by a stockholder after the close of business on April 15, 2013 will be considered untimely and will not be included in the Companys proxy materials or considered at the Annual Meeting.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
2


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:APEI/APEI-8K-20130509160315.txt.gz
TIME:20130509160315
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
(Date of earliest event reported)
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
May 9, 2013
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 - 
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 - 
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 - 
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Section 2  Financial Information
Item 2.02     Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On May 9, 2013, American Public Education, Inc. issued a press release reporting financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2013.  A copy of American Public Educations press release is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated in this report by reference.  American Public Education has scheduled a conference call and webcast for 5:00 p.m. Eastern time on May 9, 2013 to discuss its financial results, and slides for that call are attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and are incorporated in this report by reference.  A copy of the investor fact sheet is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.3 and is incorporated in this report by reference.
Section 9  Financial Statements and Exhibits
Item 9.01     Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d)     Exhibits
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
American Public Education Reports First Quarter 2013 Results
CHARLES TOWN, W. Va.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--May 9, 2013--American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI)  parent company of online learning provider American Public University System (APUS), which operates through American Military University (AMU) and American Public University (APU)  announced financial results for the quarter ended March 31, 2013.
Recent Highlights:
Net course registrationsincreased to approximately 109,700 in the first quarter of 2013, a year-over-year increase of 9%.
Net course registrations by new students in the first quarter of 2013 were approximately 19,100, a decrease of approximately -7% over the same period of 2012.
First quarter 2013 revenues increased 11% to $83.8 million, compared to $75.8 million in the first quarter of 2012.
Income from operations before interest income and income taxes in the first quarter of 2013 increased 22% to $18.2 million, compared to $14.9 million in the same period of 2012.
Net income for the first quarter of 2013 increased 25% to $11.4 million, or $0.63 per diluted share, compared to $9.1 million, or $0.50 per diluted share, in the same period of 2012.
Financial and Other Results:
Total revenues for the first quarter of 2013 increased 11% to $83.8 million, compared to total revenues of $75.8 million in the first quarter of 2012. Income from operations before interest income and income taxes in the first quarter of 2013 increased 22% to $18.2 million, compared to $14.9 million in the same period of 2012. Stock-based compensation expense reduced each periods operating income by approximately $1.0 million in the first quarter of 2013 and in the first quarter of 2012.
Net income for the first quarter of 2013 was $11.4 million, or $0.63 per diluted share, which includes $0.03 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. This compares to net income of $9.1 million, or $0.50 per diluted share for the first quarter of 2012, including $0.03 per diluted share in stock-based compensation expense, net of tax. The weighted average diluted shares outstanding for the first quarter of 2013 and for the first quarter of 2012 were approximately 18.0 million and 18.2 million, respectively.
Total cash and cash equivalents as of March 31, 2013 were approximately $120.6 million with no long-term debt. Cash from operations for the three months ended March 31, 2013 was approximately $20.6 million, compared to $14.8 million in the same period of 2012. Capital expenditures were approximately $5.9 million for the three months ended March 31, 2013, compared to $6.6 million in the prior year period. Depreciation and amortization was $3.2 million for the three months ended March 31, 2013 and $2.7 million for the same period of 2012.
Second Quarter 2013 Outlook:
The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason.
The Company believes that the temporary suspension of Department of Defense (DoD) voluntary education Tuition Assistance (TA) programs negatively impacted net course registrations in the months of April and May 2013.
As a result of the temporary suspension of TA, sequestration-related events and other possible factors, American Public Education anticipates second quarter 2013 net course registrations by new students to decline between -14% and -10% year-over-year; net course registrations to increase between approximately 9% and 12% year-over-year; and revenues to increase between approximately 10% and 13% over the prior year period.
In the second quarter of 2013, the Company expects net income to be between $0.53 and $0.58 per diluted share, which includes approximately $0.02 to $0.03 per diluted share of legal and financial due diligence expenses incurred in connection with the Company's review of potential transactions.
Webcast:
A live webcast of the Companys first quarter earnings conference call will be broadcast today at 5:00 p.m. Eastern time. This call will be open to listeners who log in through the Company's investor relations website, .
www.AmericanPublicEducation.com
A replay of the live webcast will also be available starting approximately one hour after the conclusion of the live conference call. The replay will be archived and available to listeners for one year.
About American Public Education, Inc.
American Public Education, Inc. (NASDAQ: APEI) is an online provider of higher education focused primarily on serving the military and public service communities. (APUS), wholly owned by APEI, operates through (AMU) and (APU). APUS serves more than 100,000 adult learners worldwide and offers 87 degree programs in fields ranging from homeland security, military studies, intelligence, and criminal justice to technology, business administration, public health, and liberal arts. Nationally recognized for its best practices in online higher education, APUS provides an affordable education through classes taught by experienced faculty who are committed to the academic achievement of their students.
American Public University System
American Military University
American Public University
American Public University System is accredited by The Higher Learning Commission and is a member of the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools (). For more information about APUS graduation rates, median debt of students who completed programs, and other important information, visit .
www.ncahlc.org
www.apus.edu/disclosure
Forward Looking Statements
Statements made in this press release regarding American Public Education, Inc., or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education, Inc. and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements can be identified by words such as "anticipate", "believe", "could", "estimate", "expect", "intend", "may", "should", "will" and "would". These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements regarding expected growth, expected revenues and expected earnings. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the "Risk Factors" section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012 and other filings with the SEC. The Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future.
CONTACT: American Public Education, Inc. Harry T. Wilkins, CPA, 304-724-3722 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer or Christopher L. Symanoskie, 703-334-3880 Vice President, Investor Relations

Exhibit 99.2
First Quarter 2013 Conference Call May 9, 2013
Safe Harbor Statement Statements made in this presentation regarding American Public Education, Inc. or its subsidiaries, that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements based on current expectations, assumptions, estimates and projections about American Public Education and the industry. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that could cause actual future events or results to differ materially from such statements. Forward-looking statements are sometimes identified by words such as  anticipate  , believe, could", estimate, expect, intend, may, should, will and would. These forward-looking statements include, without limitation, statements on slide First Quarter 2013 Outlook, as well as statements regarding expected growth. Actual results could differ materially from those expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements as a result of various factors, including the various risks described in the Risk Factors section and elsewhere in the Companys Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012 as filed with the SEC, quarterly report on Form 10-Q for the three months ended March 31 2013 as filed with the SEC and in the Companys other filings with the SEC The 31, SEC, Company s SEC. Company undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements for any reason, even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future. LEARN. ADVANCE. LEAD. 2
First Quarter 2013 Highlights Continued Execution of LT Strategic Plan Expanding focus on relationships and referrals; programmatic emphasis on high-demand fields New Corporate and Other Relationships: Booz Allen Hamilton National Contract Management Association (NCMA) National Retail Federation Foundation (NRF) Several Chiefs of Police Associations ePress and other initiatives helped drive first quarter operating margin expansion Slightly lower bad debt expense as percent of revenue, compared to the prior year Recent new hires and promotions: Michael P. Miotto, Senior Vice President and CIO Richard Sunderland, Senior Vice President, Finance Net Course Registrations by Primary Funding Source Cash & Other 12% FSA/Title IV 35% VA 15% Military/TA 39% For three months ending March 31, 2013 Pay Type YTD 2013 Growth (y/y) FSA/Title IV 11% VA 33% Military/TA 5% Cash & Other -7% 3
upport Growth Quality Growth Strategy APUS is currently adopting an
mapping all courses to the Lumina Foundation for Educations Degree Qualifications Profile (DQP). APUS is adopting technology to make our websites, campus and classroom easily accessible by multiple devices. Faculty research grants designed to advance online higher education knowledge and practice in key discipline areas were recently awarded to 15 APUS faculty. APEI made an investment in Fidelis Education - a technology platform that assists service members and working adults in completing online university and college coursework. In 2013, 16 APUS students and alumni were selected as Finalists to the Presidential Management Fellows (PMF) program and APUS became the first online school approved to be a charter member of Phi Alpha Delta, an international law fraternity. 4
APEIs 2013 Strategic Goals Leveraging Unique Strengths & Expanding Opportunities Expand Presence in Military & Civilian Communities Increasing focus on relationships and referrals Programmatic focus on high-demand fields Develop Operational Efficiencies & Innovative Technologies Expand ePress initiative to combat textbook inflation Optimize financial aid processing Advance academic and distance learning innovations Build New Relationships & Diversify Revenue Sources Corporations, associations, community colleges, and government agencies Expand international and corporate training opportunities Further develop school as a service offerings Corporate, Agencies & Professional Associations Universities & Community Colleges International Outreach Support Services Education Hosting Educational Vendors (eg: New Horizons) NonDegree Credentialing New Markets & Segments (eg: Corporate Training) 5
First Quarter 2013 Financial Highlights Initiatives Drive Margin Improvement Revenues increased 11% to $83.8 million, compared to the first quarter of 2012. Income from operations before interest income and income taxes increased 22% to $18.2 million, compared to the first quarter of 2012. Overall operating margins improved in the first quarter of 2013: Instructional costs as a percentage of revenue improved in the three months ended March 31, 2013 as a result of increased utilization of full-time faculty and improved textbook costs due to e-press initiatives. Selling and promotional expenses increased as a percent of revenue due in part to higher costs associated with online advertising as well as increased staff focused on strategic relationships. General and administrative expenses as a percentage of revenues decreased in part due to headcount growing at a slower rate than revenue. Bad debt expense declined to 4.3% of revenue, compared to 4.5% of revenue in the first quarter of 2013 and a high of 5.1% of revenue in the second quarter of 2012. Net income was $11.4 million or approximately $0.63 per diluted share. Cash and cash equivalents of $120.6 million with no long-term debt. 6
Second Quarter 2013 Outlook The following statements are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking and actual results may differ materially. Second Quarter 2013 Approximate Growth (y/y) Net course registration growth by new students -14% to -10% Net course registration growth 9% to 12% Revenue growth 10% to 13% Net income per diluted share $0.53 to $0.58 Adjusted net income per diluted share* $0.56 to $0.60 Financial Considerations: APEI believes net course registration growth in the second quarter was adversely impacted by the temporary suspension of tuition assistance programs by certain branches of the U.S. Military. * Adjusted net income per diluted share is a nonGAAP number that excludes approximately $0.02 to $0.03 per diluted share in legal and financial due diligence expenses. The Company believes this adjusted measures is useful to investors as a supplement to, but not as a substitute for, GAAP measures in evaluating the Company's guidance, particularly when comparing to prior periods. 7
First Quarter 2013 Conference Call May 9, 2013

Exhibit 99.3


</DOCUMENT>
